MODULE 1 – HUMAN VALUES

Morals, values and Ethics – Integrity- Academic integrity-Work Ethics- Service

Learning- Civic Virtue- Respect for others- Living peacefully- Caring and Sharing-
Honestly- courage-Cooperation commitment- Empathy-Self Confidence -Social

Expectations.

Ethics in engineering is the ability as well as responsibility of
an engineer to judge his decisions from the context of the general wellbeing of the
society. It is the study of moral issues that confront engineers and engineering
organizations when some crucial decisions are taken. Engineering research and
practice requires that the task being performed considers all the pros and cons of a
certain action and its implementation. Professional engineering bodies like, IEEE,
ASME, IEI etc., have evolved comprehensive ethics codes relevant to their respective
professions, based on the rich experience of their members. Independent organizations
like NSPE have prepared value based ethical codes applicable to all engineering
professions.

WHY ENGINEERING ETHICS? (3 marks)

• The objectives of this course on ‘Professional Ethics and Human Values’ are:
• (a) to understand the moral values that ought to guide the Engineering
profession,
• b) resolve the moral issues in the profession, and
• (c) justify the moral judgment concerning the profession. It is intended to
develop a set of beliefs, attitudes, and habits that engineers should display
concerning morality.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 58

• The prime objective is to increase one’s ability to deal
effectively with moral complexity in engineering practice

PROFESSIONAL ETHICS

• Profession is a commitment to a designated and organized occupation by virtue of
being an authority over a body of knowledge with requisite skills acquired
through specialized training.
• An occupation becomes a profession when a group of people sharing the same
occupation work together in a morally acceptable way with members setting and
following a certain ethics code.
• A professional is a practitioner belonging to a specific profession. Professional
ethics, as opposed to personal values and morality, is a set of ethical standards
and values a practicing engineer is required to follow.
It sets the standards for professional practice, and is only learned in a professional
school or while practicing one’s own profession. Today, it is an essential part of
professional education because it helps students deal with issues they will face.
 Examine the scope of professional ethics. (5 marks)
The scope of professional ethics envelopes diverse activities like
• Engineering as a social experimentation
• Engineers responsibility for safety
• Role of engineers, managers, consultants etc.
• Rights of engineers
• Moral reasoning and ethical theories
• Responsibility to employers
• Global issues and concerns

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 3 of 58

HUMAN VALUES, MORALS, & ETHICS

• For understanding of how in order for individuals, organizations and societies to
endure and function effectively, it is essential that an individual's positive
exalting forces be rediscovered and revitalized. Human values embrace the entire
range of values pertinent to the humancondition, interest, behavior, and aspiration.
• While laws are a set of rules for personal or corporate behavior and working
against such rules will attract recrimination and punishment, morals on the other
hand are a set of standards for personal behavior and ethics are a set of standards
for professional behavior. Morals and ethics are self imposed or regulated and
voluntary when broadly interpreted.
• Human values have been employed in so distinctively different ways in human
discourse. It is often said that a person has a value or an object has a value.
 Define the term value. (3 marks)
• If one wants to know the origin of the term ‘VALUE’, it may be stated very
firmly that the term ‘VALUE’ comes from the Latin word ‘VALERE’ which
means ‘to be of worth’. Whereas, the concise Oxford Dictionary defines the term
VALUE’ as the ‘worth, desirability or utilityof a thing’.
• In fact, it is difficult to define values, for they are as comprehensive in a nature as
our human life. Somewhere, some other dictionary states that Value is that which
renders anything useful, worthy or estimable. It is price, worth or importance of a
thing’.
• Value is “a concept explicit of implicit, distinctive of an individual or
characteristics of a group of those desirable traits which influence the selection
from available modes and ends of action.”
• In fact, value is an abstract term which is commonly regarded as an economic
conception. In the words of John Dewey, “Value means primarily, to price, to

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 4 of 58

esteem, to appraise, to estimate. It means the act of cherishing something holding
it clear and also, the act of passing judgement upon the nature and amount of its
value as compared with something else,” Values are defined as something which
are desirable and worthy of esteem for their own sake. Human values are defined
as those values which help man to live in harmony with the world.
• Values that may be included in the general definition of human values are love,
brotherhood, respect for others — including plants and animals
— Honesty, sincerity, truthfulness, non-violence, gratitude, tolerance, a sense of
responsibility, cooperation, self-reliance, secularism and internationalism.
• Professional engineers possess various skills and capabilities in designing and
processing numerous products. They are equipped with technical skills to solve
and settle the problems in their careers.
• The engineers, who take up challenging administrative posts, are confronted with
various industrial problems such as worker’s unrest and wage disputes. These
problems could be amicably settled, if engineers have a strategic approach, moral
honesty and self-less commitment.
• In short, better knowledge and exposure on the various aspects of human values
would help them form a successful co-ordination and management of
administrative and labour problems. Hence, human values have become an
essential part of the successful career of the professional engineers

MORALS, VALUES & ETHICS

• Morals, values and ethics that form the vital constituents of human values enable
the professional engineers to differentiate right things from wrong things in
order to take a balanced judgment in the industrial conflicts.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 5 of 58

 Define Morals.(3 marks)

MORALS

• Morals are the welfare principles enunciated by the wise people, based on their
experience and wisdom. They were edited, changed or modified or evolved to suit
the geography of the region, rulers (dynasty), and i n accordance with
development of knowledge in science and technology and with time.
• Morality is concerned with principles and practices of morals such as
(a) What ought or ought not to be done in a given situation?
(b) What is right or wrong about the handling of a situation? and
(c) What is good or bad about the people, policies, and ideals involved?
• Morals are the prevailing standards of behavior that enable people to live
cooperatively in groups. Moral refers to what societies sanction as right and
acceptable.
• Most people tend to act morally and follow societal guidelines. Morality often
requires that people sacrifice their own short-term interests for the benefit of
society. People or entities that are indifferent to right and wrong are considered
amoral, while those who do evil acts are considered immoral.
• While some moral principles seem to transcend time and culture, such as fairness,
generally speaking, morality is not fixed. Morality describesthe particular values
of a specific group at a specific point in time.
• Historically, morality has been closely connected to religious traditions, but today
its significance is equally important to the secular world. For example, businesses
and government agencies have codes of ethics that employees are expected to
follow.
• Some philosophers make a distinction between morals and ethics. But many
people use the terms morals and ethics interchangeably when talking about

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 6 of 58

personal beliefs, actions, or principles. For example, it’s common to say, “My
morals prevent me from cheating.” It’s also common to use ethics in this sentence
instead.
• The term morals refers to the philosophical study which focusses on
right and wrong behaviour. An exposure of an engineer to the basic
aspects of moral philosophy provides him the capability to deal with the
financial, industrial and technical formalities. The moral issues enable the
professionally - committed engineers to develop perfect familiarity with the
industrial environment. The various types of moral issues and their interactions
are given below:
 Explain the various types of moral issues? (7 marks)

The various types of moral issues and their interactions are
1. Organization Related Type: This type of moral issues comprises the professionally
employed engineers. The engineers tend to show an enthusiastic interest and
involvement for the upgraded development and growth of their concerned organizations.
This type further restricts the engineers to derive any personnel benefits in an
unauthorized way through the organization
2. Environment Related Type: This type of moral issue underlines the important

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 7 of 58

value of certain environmental factors such as land, air and water. It further emphasizes
that engineers should have the innovative capability to make use of these
natural resources without causing any environmental pollution and
depletion thereby maintaining the ecological balance.
3. Society Related Type: Social awareness and commitment of the professional
engineers is the essence of this type. The engineers who have been employed in various
organizations, are not supposed to be self - motivated and self – centered for the sake of
personnel benefits without minding the social and community welfare.
4. Product Related Type: This type of moral issue focuses on the nature andsafety of the
product and also its functional value and quality. The professional engineers are inclined to
provide top priority about the geniuses and originality of the product there by avoiding
substandard quality of the products.
5. Finance / Cost Related Type: Fixation of correct cost of any product without any
financial burden on the part of the consumers is the objective of this type of moral issue.
This type is also directly associated with the moral honesty in an ethical sense.
6. Customer Related Type: Easy availability of a specific product without any
scarcity, and its correct cost are the main aspects of this type. Black marketing and
duplicate quality of the product are the other factors that are highlighted by this type.
7. Employee Related Type: Provision of safe or protective working atmosphere,
reasonable and justified work-load norms based on the efficiency, proper remuneration
and retirement benefits to the employees of an organization are the important factors

that are mainly emphasized in this type. Fair treatment and proper care for the well-
being of the employees is also much considered in this category.

8. Competitor Related Type: This type enforces strict morality and commitment in
terms of healthy and genuine business activities on the part of the engineers. Engineers
should be restrained from indulging in any unethical activities against the competitor for
the commercial marketing of the products.He must resist to provide any false assurances

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 8 of 58

about the facts and figures of the concerned products to the suppliers or consumers.
9. Government Related Type: This type directly points out the norms and policies of
the government authorities about the manufacturing and distributing the particular
consumer products. This type clearly indicates that the professional engineers should
strictly adhere to the rules and regulations of the government in terms of regular and
prompt payment of central excise duties and taxes as per the existing norms.
Illegal transactions should be strictly prohibited by the professional engineers and all
necessary co-operations should be rendered by them to the customs and central excise
officials, if any controversial disputes arises.
 Write a short note on Values.(7 marks)
VALUES

• Humans have the unique ability to define their identity, choose their values and
establish their beliefs. All three of these directly influence a person’sbehaviour.
• Values which constitute an important component of behavioral andintellectual
status of people, contribute to the stable and justified character.
• These values enable the persons to differentiate several moral issues suchas good
from bad, favorable from unfavorable and honest from dishonest.
• In real ethical sense, the term values strictly refers to the strong beliefs that
influence the persons to take suitable remedies as a guiding force toany critical
problem.
Generally, value has been taken to mean moral ideas, general conceptions or
orientations towards the world or sometimes simply interests, attitudes,
preferences, needs, sentiments and dispositions.

• Values which constitute an important component of behavioral and intellectual status
of people, contribute to the stable and justified character. These values enable the
persons to differentiate several moral issues such as good from bad, favorable

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 9 of 58

from unfavorable and honest from dishonest.
• In real ethical sense, the term values strictly refers to the strong beliefs that influence
the persons to take suitable remedies as a guiding force to any critical problem.
• A value system is viewed as a relatively permanent perceptual frame work which
influences the nature of an individual’s behaviour. The values are the attributes
possessed by an individual and thought desirable. Values are similar to attitudes but
are more permanent and well built in nature.
• “Values are the scales we use to weigh our choices for our actions, whet her to
move towards or away from something.”
 State the importance of values. (5 marks)

IMPORTANCE OF VALUES

• Values lay the foundations for the understanding of attitudes and
motivation.
• Personal value system influences the perception of individuals.
• Value system influences the manager’s perception of the different
situations.
• Personal value system influences the way in which a manager views theother
individuals and the groups of individuals in the organization.
• Value system also influences a manager’s decisions and his solutions tothe
various problems.
• Values influence the attitudes and behaviors. An individual will get morejob
satisfaction if his values align with the organization's policies.
• If the organization's policies are different from his views and values, he
will be disappointed; the disappointment will lead to job dissatisfaction and decline
in performance.
• The challenge and reexamination of established work values constitute important
corner stones of the current management revolution all over the world. Hence, an
understanding of the values becomes a necessity.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 10 of 58

 What are the sources of values? (9 marks)

SOURCES OF VALUES

1.Family Factor: The most important factor which influences the value system of
an individual is his immediate family. Some values are inculcated and a person learn
and develops values from the following sources the individuals from the childhood
and remain in his mind throughout his life. The child rearing practices the parents
adopt shape the personality of the human being. Family is the most influential factor
in theindividual’s learning of social behaviour, values and norms.
2. Social Factors: Out of all the social factors school plays the most important
role in developing the value system of an individual. The child learns the basic
discipline from the school.
Moreover, the interactions with the teachers, classmates and other staff members
in the schools and colleges make the child inculcate values important to the
teaching- learning process. Other social factors which may affect values are
religious economic and political institutional in thesociety.
3.Personal Factors: Personal traits such as intelligence, ability, appearance and
educational level of the person determine his development of values. For
example, if a person is highly intelligent, hewill understand the values faster. If he
is highly educated, high values will be inculcated in him by his school and
college.
4. Cultural Factors: Cultural factors include everything that is learned and
passed on from generation to generation. Culture includes certain beliefs and
other patterns of behaviour. An individual is a participant in social culture, group
culture and organisational culture. Thus, he is known as a composite of many
cultural elements.
Culture is based on certain implicit and explicit values. For example, whether a
person is co-operative, friendly or hostile depends upon to which culture he
belongs to Individual relationships are different in different cultures and within

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 11 of 58

certain groups of society also. Whether, the individual values money making or
doing service to the mankind againdepends upon his cultural background.
5.Religious Factors: Individuals, generally, receive strength and comfort from their
religion. Religion comprises of a formal set of values which arepassed on from
generation to generation. Advancement in technology has under viewed faith in
traditional religious beliefs and values.
6.Life Experiences: A man learns the most from his own personal life experience.
Sometimes man can learn from the experience of others also. Inthe long run, most of
the values which influence our behaviour are validatedby the satisfaction we have
experienced in pursuing them. Individuals work out their values on the basis of what
seems most logical to them.
 Values carry importance in direct proportion to how much faith the individual has
in them. He should have those values which can stand the test of reality. He should
not have rigid values but flexible system whichcan change with the changes in the
individual himself, his life situation and the socio-economic environment.
7. Role Demands: The role demand refers to the behaviour associated with a particular
position in the organization. All organisations have some formal and some informal code
of behaviour. Role demand can create problems when there is a role conflict. Thus, the
managers will have to quickly learn the value system prevalent in the organization. If
they want to move up the ladder of success.
 For example, if the informal code of behaviour says that the manager must mix up
socially with the subordinates, he should learn to do so even though, his personal
value system conflicts with his role as a manager.
8. Halo Effect: The halo effect refers to the tendency of judging people on the
basis of a single trait, which may be good or bad, favorable or un-favorable.
Sometimes, we judge a person by one first impression about him or her. For
example, if a person is kind, he will also be perceived as good, able, helpful,
cheerful, nice, and intelligent and so on. On the other hand, if a person is

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 12 of 58

abrasive, he shall also be perceived as bad, awful, unkind, aggressive, harmful
and wicked. Thus, what one sees in the universe depends partly on one’s inner
needs. Thus, with the help of halo effect, we see certain values in others whichare
actually not there, but we perceive them to be there.
 Explain the major types of values? (5 marks)
VALUES ARE OF TWO TYPES: TERMINAL & INSTRUMENTAL VALUES
 Terminal values comprise factors such as comfortable life, assured family
security, self - respect and sense of wisdom.
 Whereas, factors such as ambitious goal, sense of moral conviction and courage,
undisputable honesty and imaginative thoughts have been included in the
instrumental values.
In addition to this, values are further classified into the
following categories:
1.Theoretical type: It refers to the combination of moral reasoning andthinking to
discover the truth.
2.Economic type: It refers to the practical application of enthusiasmand
interest in terms of earning and procuring wealth.
3.Aesthetic type: It refers to the personal taste of interest to appreciatethe natural
beauty and cultural heritage.
 4. Social type: It refers to the motivated interest for the welfare of thepeople.
 5. Political type: It refers to the obligation of interest towards theselection
of specific political power for the people in a democratic way.
 Write a short note on ethics?(5 marks)
ETHICS

 The word ethics is derived from the Greek word meaning as customs ortraditions.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 13 of 58

The term engineering ethics literally refers to the study that is concerned with
ethical and moral issues pertaining to the professional and engineering
organisations. ethic is a “system of moralprinciples, rules and conduct.” Ethics
is a “science of morals.” The words ethics has emerged from Latin ‘Ethicus’ or in
Greek ‘Ethicos’.
 Ethics is the word that refers to morals, values, and beliefs of the individuals,
family or the society. The word has several meanings. Basically it is an acti
vity and process of inquiry.

 Secondly, it is different from non-
moral problems, when dealing with issues and controversies.

 Thirdly, ethics refers to a particular set of beliefs, attitudes, and habits of
individuals or family or groups concerned with morals.
 Fourth, it is used to mean ‘morally correct
 The engineering ethics strongly focuses on the moral virtues, ideal characters,
committed policies and the social interactions of the individuals and
corporate sectors that are associated with the technical or technological
activities. Engineering ethics lays down the basic moral code of conduct and
professional commitment on the part of all sections of a community such as
workers, technical assistants, public individuals, professional engineers and
government employees.
 Engineering ethics also provides necessary solutions to deal with the conflicts
and confrontations faced by the engineers and corporate managers.
 ‘Right’, ‘Fair’ and ‘Proper’ are three terms normally used to express the
social behaviour of the people. When we tell these words, there are right and
wrong behaviour towards others; fair and unfair actions taken against someone or
for someone; or some fair or unfair decisions.
 The beliefs what is right, what is fair and what is proper are our beliefs and our

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 14 of 58

moral standards. The beliefs differ from individual to individual, place to place and
time to time. What is right in one place or situation may be wrong in other
situation. The moral standards also differ based on moral value an individual
attaches. Any action can be termed good or right or bad or wrong are relative and
moral judgments. The problem has one more side that who is making the
judgment. From different sides the problem is seen in different light and
accordingly the judgment. The distinctions are made as ‘us’ and ‘others’ or
‘benefits’ and ‘obligations’.
 State the importance of ethics. (7 marks)

IMPORTANCE OF ETHICS
1. Part of Society:

 Business is part of society. Whatever ethical principle apply in society apply to
business. Example tax evasion is considered unethical in society. If a company
deliberately evades tax payments the company istreated unethical.

2.Expectations of Public:

 All stakeholders have an eye on the culture and behaviour of a business
organization due to dominance of economics in the society. The public expects a
high level of ethical behaviour from the business organisations.
 ‘Doing the right thing’, ‘Do no harm’ and ‘Good to all’ are the expectations of
general public from business. Example: a company manufacturing a tobacco
based products say ‘pan masalas’ and making advertisements appealing to college
students in not respected. Whereas a company that recalls unsafe product is
respected.
3. Trust of Employees
 High level of morale and productivity can be easily obtained in companies that
treat their all employees with equality, encourage good team and work culture, and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 15 of 58

with ethical practices. The employees in the company as well as those connected
feel good and develop a mutual trust. Employees get attraction to ethically and
socially responsible companies.
4. Image
 An ethical organization command trust and respect of all its stakeholders. The
organization builds image for itself. Ethical good image is important because all
stakeholders stand to gain.
5. Costs

 Deterioration of relationships, damage to reputation and reduction of employee
productivity, loyalty that come out of unethical practices cost companies. An
uncaring employer will find it difficult to employ good professions for his
business.

6. Pride of Best Companies

 The ethically managed companies command respect from public as well as
government organisations. ‘Fortune’ magazine publishes yearly best companies.
Similarly Indian will managed companies are published by ‘Business India’.
These companies have a brand value and accepted as leaders in the industry.
The company policies with regards to profit sharing bonuses, social
responsibility, balance of work and social life arequoted.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 16 of 58

 Differentiate morality & Ethics (7 marks)

 Define Integrity? (3 marks) INTEGRITY
 Integrity is one thing that every business should have. When employees follow
work ethics, they show integrity to the outside world. Customers believe in the
company and also business prospects increase. Every industry has its own ethical
guidelines, and a business should make sure that they follow these standards.
Integrity refers to the upright honesty and fair- mindedness to communicate the
exact truth to the individuals. The integrity would increase the self-respect of an
individual and also would enable him to command respect from others thereby
earning himthe prestigious social status.

ETHICS MORALITY

The word Ethics originated from the Greek
word ethos. The meaning of ethos is a character

The word Morals originated from
the Latin word Mos. The meaning of
Mos is custom.

Legal guidelines and professional rules govern
ethics. The acceptability of ethics is confined
within a particular space and time frame.

When it comes to the acceptability
of Morality it transcends the norms
laid down by culture.

Ethics are dependent on the prism of others. Morality is seen from the
perspective of an individual.

If the contexts are different then the ethics
could be different, hence there is some degree
of flexibility in ethics.

Change in Morality depends on the
change in the beliefs of an
individual.

Ethics are followed because society has decided
that it is the right course of action

Morality is followed because a
person believes that it is the right
course of action.

A person who follows the ethical principles
need not necessarily have strong moral values,
in fact, there are even possibilities that he may
not have any morals.

There could be situations where
ethics are violated by a moral person
to maintain to uphold his moral
values.
Ethics is something usually associated in the
field of law, medicine or business. Ethics does
not have a religious connotation.

Morality has a religious connotation

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 17 of 58

 Integrity is used to describe a person's level of honesty, moral commitments, and
willingness to do what's right. For example, we expect our doctors to be honest
with us about diagnoses, won't try to prescribe medications we don't need, and
will generally work in the best interest of our health and well-being. We expect
this because, in most societies, doctors are perceived to be people of great
integrity with strong moral compasses.
 Define Academic Integrity.(3 marks)
 Explain the five pillars of academic integrity 6 marks)
The integrity is of the following types
 a) ACADEMIC INTEGRITY: This refers to the lack of honesty among the
educational institutions and organizations. There has been an alarming increase in
the dishonesty and several sectors of educational institutes such as students,
workers, teaching faculty members and management. Academic integrity could
contribute to the successful educational career of the students thus paving a
definite way for the academic excellence.
 Academic integrity is the commitment to and demonstration of honest and moral
behavior in an academic setting. This is most relevant at the university level as it
relates to providing credit to other people when using their ideas. In simplest
terms, it requires acknowledging the contributions of other people. Failure to
provide such acknowledgement is considered plagiarism.
 In academic contexts and scholarly work, integrity is of tremendous importance.
For example, when college professors write books or perform experiments, it is
expected that their theories and assertions are backed up by rigorous research for
which they provide citations. In cases where it has been discovered that someone
has falsified research data or outright lied, that person can face a number of
consequences because he or she was expected to work with honesty and integrity.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 18 of 58

FIVE PILLARS OF ACADEMIC INTEGRITY
The International Center for Academic Integrity (ICAI) has identified fivepillars
of academic integrity to generate positive conversations about integrity.

• PILLAR 1

 Honesty is sincerity. All other pillars of academic integrity have somebasis in
honesty. Honest individuals take stock of individual abilities and represent their
effort fairly.

 PILLAR 2

 Trust in other people and in your community eases working relationships. Trust
is established in a system where all members are doing their best work, where
structures and policies are fair and all willbe treated fairly.

• PILLAR 3

 Fairness goes hand in hand with trust. Every individual should believe that they
will be treated fairly and judged by the same standard as all others in the
community. For example, you can trust that your professors will evaluate all
work fairly and not favor one person over another. The best work comes out of a
fair system.

• PILLAR 4

 Respect allows for individual points of view and opinions to be shared. Students
show respect by “listening to other points of view, being prepared, meeting
deadlines, and performing to the best of their ability.” Instructors show respect by
listening to students’ ideas and “providing full and honest feedback.”

• PILLAR 5

 Responsibility means acknowledging your agency and accountabilityin
daily actions and in your work. Everyone is personally invested in

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 19 of 58

performing their work with integrity and encourages others to act with
integrity too. Academic integrity starts with individuals andpositively
influences the entire community.
The basic essence of academic integrity is contaminated by the
following dishonest acts
 Cheating: Student community resort to various modes of cheating acts such as
copying in the university examinations and adopting the unscrupulous techniques
in chasing of university examination papers and for bribing the concerned
authorities for bogus mark sheets. Nowadays, leakage of question papers prior to
the conduct of the competitive examination is a good example for this
category.
 Fabrication: This includes the unethical alteration of marks in the original mark
sheets and resorting to submit a fake or false mark sheets to gain admission in
professional colleges.
 Plagiarism: This refers to unethical duplication of data or theoretical information
from the records already published. There has been a steady increase in the
duplicated and manipulated data in the submission of project works and thesis.
 Misinterpretation: This refers to the failure to provide correct and true statements
to the concerned authorities with reference to academic activities.
 Sabotage and theft: It refers to the gross misbehavior and indiscipline among
the section of student community to resort to violent activities by damaging the
properties of educational institutions such as college laboratory equipments and
library. Similarly, stealing of worthy journals, publications and books in the library
by a few groups of students, also cause social concern among academicians.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 20 of 58

 Define Work ethics.(3 marks)

WORK ETHICS

 Industry and Society are the two systems which interact with each other and are
interdependent. Society requires industry/business system which provides
manufacturing, distribution and consumption activities. It needs investment
(capital input), labor (input), supply (raw materials), production (industries,
business organizations), marketing and distribution (transport), and consumption
(public, customer). A lot of transactions (and interactions between
these sub-stems involving people are needed for the welfare
of the society. It is here, the work ethics plays an essential role.
 Work ethics is defined as a set of attitudes concerned with the value of
work, which forms the motivational orientation. In simple terms, work ethics
means the moral value in association with thespecific accountability
of an individual towards the responsible
discharging of his duties.
 Traditionally, work ethic has been understood as a value based on hard work and
diligence. Capitalists, for example, believe in the necessity of working hard and in
consequential ability of enhancing one’s character.
 Socialists suggest that a concept of “hard work” is deluding the working class into
being loyal workers of the elite; and working hard, in itself, is not necessarily an
honorable thing, but simply a way to create greater wealth for those at the summit
of the economic pyramid.
 The term work ethics is more suitable for a person who possesses the inclination
for hard work with a sense of dedication and integrity. Work ethics has become a
crucial criteria for the proper development of an industrial organisation.
Interpersonal capability, initiative efforts and dependability are the three
essential aspects of work ethics.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 21 of 58

 Explain the basic work ethics for an organization?(7 marks)

BASIC WORK ETHICS FOR AN ORGANIZATION
 Ideally, the policies a business operates with are compassion, fairness,honor,
responsibility, and integrity. One of the best ways to communicate organizational
ethics is by training employees about company standards. Basic work ethics for
any organization should include:
• 1. Uniform rules and regulations: An ethical organizational example is the
common treatment of all staff, i.e., with the same respect, regardless of race,
culture, religion, or lifestyle, with equal chances for promotion. Therefore, small
company managers should desist from favoring any one employee, for it can
lead to lawsuits andis also highly counterproductive.
• 2. Communication of the rules and regulation to all employees:
Company policies must be clearly communicated to each employee with a
transparency at all levels of the hierarchy. Employees are the spine of all
organizations and should have a say in the goals and objectives of a firm.
•3. Respect for Employees: Respect employees and in return receive the same.
Regulations should not be so rigid, and therefore, don’t expect staff to attend
work two days before a marriage. If somebody is not well, don’t ask them to
attend office unless or until there’s an emergency.

• 4. Allow a degree of freedom to employees without constant micro-
management: Key roles of responsibility need to be establishedon the first day of

joining with responsibilities commensurate with a person’s expertise.
Employees should be inducted into training if needed.
• 5. Clear cut salary and promotion policy: Employees crib if they are underpaid.
Make sure they get what is deserved and decided in the presence of the person. A
major attrition factor is a poor appraisal, promotion prospects are ideally based on

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 22 of 58

merit, not favor. Clarity is crucial.
•6. Clear and uniform holiday schedule: It is the responsibility of human
resource professionals to prepare the holiday calendar at the beginning of the
year and circulate the same among all employees.
•7.Effects of Work Ethics within an organization: Preferably a
Work place ethic culture will ensure that employers guide and mentor staff
appropriately while managementtreats all as equal.Transparency is
essential.
 What are the core ethical elements that define the ethics of anorganization?
(14 marks)
 There are at least four elements that aim to create an ethicalbehavioral
culture of employees within an organization.
• A written code of ethics and standards (ethical code).
• Ethics training for executives, managers, and employees.
• The availability of ethical situational advice (i.e. advice lines oroffices).
• A confidential reporting system.
Step 1: Be professional about your work
 Professionalism is beyond a clean shirt, for it includes one’s values, attitude, and
demeanor. Practice being cordial and positive while refraining from gossip.
Knowing how to communicate constructively and positively, while respecting the
feelings of others is an invaluable tool. Respect others and develop a reputation
for having integrity, meaning honesty, fairness, and consistency in what you do
and say. Reliability and honesty: Work ethic is more than completing long hours
for its foundation is integrity. To develop integrity, one can:
 Act the same when people are not watching you, as when they are.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 23 of 58

 Perform consistently at the same level of quality. Be conscientious. Behonest in
all things.
 Honesty isn’t a business policy, it is a state of mind.
 Be consistent in delivering good quality work and earn good reputation:
Everything worthwhile accomplishing requires discipline.Remain focused on a
long-term goal while avoiding getting side- tracked by a short-term
gratification. To be persistent and able to follow through on assignments...
Train yourself.

• Step 2: Manage your time

 Know your strength and weaknesses (including potential distractions, so you
can avoid them): Evaluate work. Identifying one’s weaknesses and making a
plan to improve these areas builds a stronger work ethic. One way of evaluating
this is to create a list summarizing the skills and requirements of your work, and
the strengths and weaknesses. Be honest about weaknesses, and what it is that
distracts you – this is stepone in learning to manage those weaknesses.
 Set yourself deadlines for delivering even small tasks: Being able to complete
your tasks and finish what you start, is an essential part of character building. You
cannot imagine a fully mature, fully functioning person who is unable to finish
what she begins. The development of this habit is the key to long-term
success. Don’t waste time by doing stuff that is not important. Constantly
evaluate to check which things absolutely must get done.
 Prioritize tasks and set the most important ones in the morning: Complete
projects and tasks immediately. A trademark behavior of a worker with a poor
work ethic is delaying work until another day, which usually only leads to an
incomplete or late project.
 Avoid procrastination: Procrastinating is a great waste. Imagine all that could be
accomplished by eliminating procrastination from this moment on. To overcome

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 24 of 58

procrastination, first realize that it’s not the real issue. Procrastination, laziness,
bad time management, or lack of discipline, are merely symptoms of the issue. The
real reason is beneath this. You can also use the Pomodoro technique to avoid
procrastination.
 Avoid negative talk and gossip: Keep the lazy, the negative minded, and the
unproductive, at arm’s length, for it’s a psychological prison. Associate with
ambitious, hard-working people, and soon count yourself amongst them. Provide
feedback that improves situations and builds people up. Be an active listener and
keep an open mind.
Step 3: Keep a balance and deliver consistent high performance work
Do sport, sleep well, and socialize: Play is best when it’s earned, equally sleep. Earn
sleep by working hard on one’s goals in the day. A good work ethic isn’t just being
glued to a computer. It is also understanding how to take care with decent sleep,
and eating nutritiously. Take time to relax and recharge while keeping priorities
in your life clear, helps maintain a good perspective at work.
Step 4: Develop good work habits

 Steer the self-development path towards choosing to be an employee with a
strong ethic, after all, creating a habit for oneself is really a question of being an
action- minded person. The ‘doing component’ flows easily when embracing the
‘being part.’
 Create and learn habits: Values to inculcate and habitualize:
 Valuing punctuality and attendance.
 Valuing time, orderliness, neatness, and speed.
 Working smarter but not harder; being psychologically self-employed.
 Playing an internal game of working, yet enjoying the importance of relaxation
and rest.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 25 of 58

“Do it now” habit: Never leave ‘till tomorrow what can be accomplished
today.’ Good ethics habitualize attitude, action, and inevitably – consequence: how
you do, what you do in this moment.

Other Good Habits

 Concentration is the ability to stay on a task until it is completed, by
working in a straight line to get from where one is, without distraction or
diversion, to the destination, i.e., completion of the work.
• Get off to a good start.
 Clean up and get organized.
 Plan activities.
 Streamline work and emphasize the important work.
 Concentrate on one work task at a time until completion.
 Work steadily.
 Make smart use of technology.
 Be in control of office paper, work in-basket, and e-mail.
 Multitask on routine matters.
 Make better use of time.
 Explain the Core Elements of a Strong Work Ethics? (14 marks)
 It is difficult to define the elements of good work ethics, as it is such an
individualistic approach and thinking. What may be good work ethics for me may
not be the same for you.
 Much depends upon how each organization or person looks at work ethics and the
moral values that each follows. What moral values you practice in daily life will
define your attitude towards work and your work ethics. But there are a few
common elements that are universally followed and employers look for it in their

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 26 of 58

employees.
 1. Honesty: This is the core element of work ethics, all the other elements are
based upon your honesty. Be honest about your successes and failures, take credit
only where due, do not steal other’s works or ideas, and own up to your failures.
 2. Integrity: Do not let people down, try to fulfill your commitments, andbe
consistent in your thoughts, action and behavior.
 3. Impartiality/Fairness: Be fair to all, do not practice favoritism. Treat
everyone as equals.
 4. Alertness: Be aware of what is happening around and keep an eye onthings.
5. Openness: Share your ideas, results and resources with the other team
members, so that everyone has the same opportunity and know what you are
doing. Being secretive is counterproductive.
 6 Respect for others: No matter how urgent a deadline or heated that tempers
become, remain diplomatic and poised and show grace under pressure. Whether
serving a client, meeting a customer or meeting with management, do the best to
respect other’s opinions, even in stressful circumstances. It shows one values
other’s individual worth and professional contribution.
 7. Reliability and Dependability: Means being punctual for work and meetings,
delivering assignments within budget and on schedule. Be reliable about keeping
promises for reputation precedes one so that clients, customers, and colleagues do
trust in you to do all that you say you will – everyone appreciates the stability this
embodies.
 8. Determination: Obstacles cannot stop you as they are a challenge to be
overcome. Embrace challenges positively and know that your role is to solve
problems with purpose and resilience. Push on, no matter how far it is necessary to
go.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 27 of 58

 9. Dedication: Continue until the job is complete, and delivered. “It’s good
enough” is not sufficient for you and the team, as you aim to be “outstanding” in
content and quality. Put in the extra hours to get things right by attending to detail
and excellence.
 10.Accountability: Accept responsibility personally for one’s actions and
outcomes in all situations, plus avoid excuses when work does not proceed as
planned – admitting mistakes or oversights are used as a learning curve and will
not be repeated again. Employers expect employees to attain to high standards,
and they should fully support staff who accepts responsibility, instead of passing
the buck.
 11. Confidentiality: Any confidential information of documents you have should
remain confidential. You cannot discuss it or show it to anyone else, other than
the people authorized to do so.
 12. Responsibility: Take responsibility for your thoughts, actions, behavior and
work.
 13. Legality: Always work within the legal boundaries, do not break or twist the
law to fit your agenda.
 14. Competence: Improve your performance and competence by constantly
learning and including the new learning into your work.
 15. Professionalism: From how one dresses and presents oneself in the business
world, to how others are treated, professionalism is such a very broad category
that it encompasses all the elements of a work ethic.
 16. Humility: Acknowledge other’s contribution, and share credit for successes.
You have integrity and are open to learning from mentors and others, even as you
teach via your action, example, and words. Though you take the work seriously,
you are also maintaining a sense of humor about yourself.
 17. Initiative: Do not be afraid to put forth your ideas or volunteer for work.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 28 of 58

Possession of above - said qualities of work ethics of an individual or employee
would shape himself into a qualitative and competent worker. These employees
with awareness on the work ethics would contribute to an increased productivity of
an organization thus fulfilling the expectations and achievement goals of their
organizations. These days a work ethics is important in many situations. It is a skill
that can be learned by every person and has so often proved to be the path of success
for many. All businesses give a higher regard to an ethical employee, and hiring staff
with positive ethics is appreciated around the world.
 Define Service Learning? (3 marks)

SERVICE LEARNING

 Service-learning refers to learning that actively involves students in a wide
range of experiences, which often benefit others and the community, while
also advancing the goals of a given curriculum. Inmost of the universities,
service learning has been made compulsory for the students in the form of NSS.
 Service learning provides better opportunities to the student community to
understand the practical problems faced by the common public. Students are better
trained to provide assistance and counseling about education, agriculture, hygiene,
welfare schemes and health to the urban and village people. Service learning
imparts valuable guidance and career training to the students not only about the
academic curriculum but also the social commitment and moral values to become
the responsible citizens. Enough provisions have been made in the academic
curriculum and syllabi to award ranks/credits for the active participation of
students in community services.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 29 of 58

 Explain the qualities of service learning? (7 marks)

ROLE OF COMMUNITY & SCHOOL CURRICULUM IN
THEPROPAGATION OF CIVIC VIRTUES &

CHARACTERS

 By making appropriate changes in the basic pattern of academic curriculum, the
essentials of civic virtues could be actively focused to the student community.
Students should be motivated and encouraged to learn the principles of civic
virtues to show their academic excellence. When the students are exposed to the
moral values, their practical knowledge about current trends of civilization and
globalization would be much enhanced to be a dutiful citizen.
 There is a compulsory role of teachers at lower and higher education levels for
imparting the essential goal of civic virtues. They can design and formulate their
own methods to teach the basics of civic virtues and the drastic consequences in
not learning them.
 The learning and teaching procedures could be made more innovative and
purposeful by involving the parental and community associations. This would
help the students to sort out and identify the common civic problems and
interference that seriously threaten the honest efforts of the student community.
Consistent co-operation and monitoring by the academic management and teachers
would improve and strengthen the attitude and interest of the students about the
importance of civic virtues. Suitable provisions should be made to reward and
encourage the students who have shown keen interest and enthusiasm to acquire
the basics of civic virtues and their applications.

 Write a short note on respect for others? (7marks)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 30 of 58

RESPECT FOR OTHERS

 Self - respect and respect for others are the basic constituents of a typical moral
conduct and discipline that plays an important factor in the behavioral pattern and
life - style of an individual. When the youngchildren and students, tend to be aware
of this moral conduct, they are prompted to give respect to their parents, teachers,
public and elders. This type of positive behavioral trend would certainly help to
boost- up the personality and individuality of a person. Respect, also called
esteem, is a positive feeling or action shown towards someone or something
considered important, or held in high esteem or regard. It conveys a sense of
admiration for good or valuable qualities. And it is also the process of honoring
someone by exhibiting care, concern, or consideration for their needs or feelings.
 When an individual or person acquires the modest act of showing respect to
others, he/she would be entitled to get the appreciation and support from all
sections of a society for his/her well - mannered conduct. Some people may earn
the respect of individuals by assisting others or by playing important social roles.
In many cultures, individuals are considered to be worthy of respect until they
prove otherwise. Courtesies that show respect may include simple words and
phrases like "Thank you" in the West or "Namaste" in the Indian subcontinent, or
simple physical signs like a slight bow, a smile, direct eye contact, or a simple
handshake; however, those acts may have very different interpretations,
depending on the cultural context.
 State the characteristics of respect.(6 marks)

CHARACTERISTICS OF RESPECT

 1. Self-respect: Self-respect means an important virtue in the field of
engineering, medicine and public life. It forms the basic foundation for building
up other virtues such as honesty, integrity and self- confidence. It is a desirable act
of good conduct and attitude.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 31 of 58

 2. Altruism: This refers to the act of doing good to others and thus avoiding
harmful acts. The basic attitude of thinking and doing well to others is considered
to be a noble act and would raise up the personal status of an individual.
 3. Calm Composure: When individuals become excited and agitated, they must
keep themselves in a relaxed and composed manner. This good conduct of
maintaining mental stability without any physical provocation would lead to a
healthy and peaceful life without strain andstress.
 4. Daring act: Life is a mixture of pleasures and sorrows with frequent repetition
of failures and successes. An individual should be mentally prepared to take some
risks for any perfect achievement of objectives. He should be courageous enough
to take some solid steps with daring efforts to solve any critical problem.
 5. Good humour: This act of having soft behaviour with the sense of good
humour would earn admiration and appreciation from others. The behaviour of
good humour is the best medicine to keep the body in good health. The persons
who possess this character would be able to solve any conflict or confrontation
without any agitation.

How to Respect Others

 1.Listening to the other person.
 2.Being empathetic, understanding each other and putting ourselves intheir shoes.
 3.Using assertive communication that is, defending our rights while respecting
the rights of others, in an educated and non-aggressive manner.
 4.Keep in mind that our approaches, ideas, and opinions may differ from other
people and none is wrong. No one has the absolute truth.
 5.Apologizing to each other when we make mistakes.
 6.Keeping other people’s secrets.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 32 of 58

 7. Complying with and respecting laws and regulations
 8.Taking care of the common spaces and the environment.
 9.Interest in others, their everyday life and how they feel.
 10.Respecting the privacy and intimacy of others.
 11.Respecting others spaces and belongings, not to invade or use what is not ours
without permission.
 12.Respect personal space.
 13. Make sure we include rather than exclude others.
 14.Helping others when it is in our power to do so.15.Being grateful.

LIVING PEACEFULLY

 It is a reasonable ambition of every individual to lead a peaceful and healthy
life. In modern world, several philosophical advocates have suggested various
measures to have a peaceful life which is free from tension and excitement.
Peaceful mind is essential for a healthy and comfortable life. To live in peace, an
individual should have the mental contentment and satisfaction. Various social
and psychological factors such as poverty, over-ambition, jealousy and
discontentment directly affect the process of peaceful living. Social conflicts and
confrontations such as racial discrimination, religious violence and offences also
affectthe peaceful living.
 The basic concept of peaceful living is also disturbed and defeated by the failure
to follow the moral values and self-discipline. Several imbalances in the human
culture and civilization also affect the standard of peaceful living.
 To live peacefully, one should start install peace within (self). Charity begins at
home. Then one can spread peace to family, organization where one works, and
then to the world, including the environment. Only who are at peace can spread

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 33 of 58

peace. You cannot gift an article which you do not possess. The essence of
oriental philosophy is that one should not fight for peace. It is oxymoron. War or
peace can be won only by peace, and not by wars!
 Individuals are exposed to various types of stresses and strains due to their
family, communal and social factors. The constant exposures to these
psychological disturbances lead to impatience and anger thereby upsetting the
peaceful mind. Several medical reports and psychotherapists have suggested
various procedures and methods to reduce tension for restoring the peaceful life.

 Describe the qualities required for a peaceful life? (7 marks)

SUGGESTIVE MEASURES TO LEAD A PEACEFUL LIVING
 1.Development of disciplined orderliness: When an individual is subjected to
mental stress due to several factors, he could lead a peaceful life through
disciplined and civilized cultures. By developing the orderly behaviour, an
individual could regain the peaceful mind. Any uncivilized behavioural acts
finally result in the loss of peaceful mind thereby affecting the morality of that
individual.
 2. Reorientation of the personal commitment: Any unwanted involvement with
an excess burdening of the life style could cause various problems such as changes
in the personality and behaviour pattern of an individual. Excess commitments in
the social community programmes would make a person to earn the displeasures
and critical comments from others. These displeasures and unwanted arguments
would subject the concerned individual to lose patience, self-respect and balance
of mind. Finally, that person would tend to show violence and arrogance in his
behavioral activity thus losing his peaceful and contented life.
 3.Physical exercise programmes: When persons volunteer to spend considerable
time for physical exercises such as walking, jogging or playing games, they

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 34 of 58

derive mental happiness and consolation to avoid stressful and strained life.
 4.Mental exercise programmes: Several research studies have proved that
several mental exercises such as meditation and yoga could provide a magical
cure for those suffering from several health disorders. The constant practice of
meditation and yoga could tone up the mental depression and psychological
imbalances thus motivating aperson to have a peaceful life.
 5.Development of self-reliance and self-control: It has become a common
problem to understand that more individuals tend to lose their patience, when they
face domestic and professional conflicts. Loss of patience and temperament may
be caused by sudden act of irritation and provocation. As a consequence, the
concerned person enters into the state of mental discomfort and instability that
would eventually disturb the process of peaceful living. These problems could be

successfully managed by practicing the positive act of self-reliance, self-
confidence and self-control. These behavioral managements would relieve a

person from the sources of stress and confusion for therestoration of peaceful life.
 Explain the role of caring & sharing in work place? (7 marks)

CARING &SHARING

 The attitude and tendency of understanding and sharing feelings of others is the
essence of caring. The process of caring includes the personal caring, family
caring and community caring. The act of caring has become an important aspect
of human civilization and ethical conduct. The process of caring promotes and
strengthens the bond of love and affinity. Thus reflecting the magnanimous
attitude of a person. The process of caring is the basic tool of social justice and
dignified conduct. The other features of caring is better illustrated by the
examples.
 A devoted teacher should be prompt enough to help a student to solve a
mathematical problem, when the student finds it difficult. A teacher should play a
neutral role to solve a moral problem or crisis between the students thus restoring

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 35 of 58

the climate of harmony.
 Caring is feeling for others. It is a process which exhibits the interest in, and
support for, the welfare of others with fairness, impartiality and justice in all
activities, among the employees, in the context of professional ethics. It includes
showing respect to the feelings of others, and also respecting and preserving the
interests of all others concerned. Caring is reflected in activities such as
friendship, membership in social clubs and professional societies, and
through various transactions in the family, fraternity, community, country and in
international councils. In the present day context, caring for the environment
(including the fauna and flora) has become a necessity for our very survival. If we
do not care for the environment, the environment will scare us.
 What are the features of caring? (7 marks)

CHARACTERISTIC FEATURES OF CARING

 1. Caring as an essence of moral values: The process of caring is learnt and
followed in life, through moral values and virtues such as honesty,
trustworthiness and humility. When a person follows the basics of caring,
various modes of moral values are spontaneously inducted into his character, thus
making him a respected and prestigious personality.
 2.Caring as the heart of ethics: The process of caring constitutes the basic
foundation of ethical conduct and behaviour. Those individuals who respect the
ethics of caring, possess the noble qualities to work and dedicate for the welfare
of others.
 3.Caring to fulfill one’s obligations: A person who has been committed to the act
of caring, is able to understand and visualize the options and obligations of others
for the final fulfillment of a goal. Moreover, he tends to translate his thoughts into
a real action for himself and others. He becomes highly devoted to contribute his
assistance and efforts to make the life of others a peaceful and comfortable one.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 36 of 58

 4.The ultimate goal of caring: To cater the basic needs of others for their
well-being is the ultimate goal of caring. Caring enables a right person to do

anything that he wants to do for himself. The mentality and interest for the well-
being of others without any selfishness is alsothe true aspect of caring.

 5.Caring as an experienced learning: The essential features of caring could be
gradually learnt through proper experience with commitmentand dedication.
 All the practical experiences of a person are neatly consolidated to appreciate the
logics of caring. The tendency of caring gradually enhances the intensity of
learning with rich experience.

INTERACTION BETWEEN LISTENING & CARING
 Listening is identified as an important constituent in the act of caring. There is a
close interaction between listening and caring. The essence of caring remains
incomplete and meaningless without caring. The combination of listening and
caring provide a keen and unbiased senseof self-judgement to a person.
According to the available reports, the act of listening could be well
developed by the following factors.
 1.Personal acknowledgement: This includes the communication of any message
through verbal or non- verbal manner.
 2. Response to the message: A person should reciprocate to any verbal
communication. This positive response would accelerate the act of caring. In
contrast, when a person remains without any response and silent for any verbal
message, act of caring will not further develop andbecomes purposeless.
 3. The process of interpretation and summary: On receiving any verbal
communication, the person should explain the status of the message such as likes,
dislikes, pleasant and unpleasant feelings and also desires. He should be able to
brief or summarise the statements for better focusing of the ideas and views.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 37 of 58

 4.Probing approach: A person who is much interested in listening and caring,
must have the probing approach to have a clear assessment of facts thereby
avoiding the confusions, suspicisions and conflicts.
 5.Application of silence: The process of keeping silent with patience would be a
right step to promote the act of listening and caring. When a person gives a silent
hearing to any information or conversation, he plans a better strategy for
transparent discussion of the concerned matter towards taking a correct decision.
 Define Sharing.(3 marks)

SHARING

 Primarily, caring influences ‘sharing’. Sharing is a process that describes the
transfer of knowledge (teaching, learning, and information), experience
(training), commodities (material possession) and facilities with others. The
transfer should be genuine, legal, positive, voluntary, and without any
expectation in return. However, the proprietary information it should not be
shared with outsiders. Through this process of sharing, experience, expertise,
wisdom and other benefits reach more people faster. Sharing is voluntary and it
cannot be driven by force, but motivated successfully through ethical principles.
 In short, sharing is ‘charity’ For the humanity, ‘sharing’ is a culture. The
‘happiness and wealth’ are multiplied and the ‘crimes and sufferings’ are reduced,
by sharing. It paves the way for peace and obviates militancy. Philosophically, the
sharing maximizes the happiness for all the human beings. In terms of
psychology, the fear, divide, and distrust between the ‘haves’ and ‘have-nots’
disappear. Sharing not only paves the way to prosperity, early and easily, and
sustains it. Economically speaking, benefits are maximized as there is no wastage
or loss, and everybody gets one’s needs fulfilled and satisfied. Commercially
speaking, the profit is maximized. Technologically, the productivity and utilization
are maximized by sharing.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 38 of 58

 Explain the various types of sharing?(7marks)

VARIOUS TYPES OF SHARING

• 1. Sharing of technological and scientific knowledge and
resources.
• 2. Sharing of personal information.
• 3. Sharing of any achievements such as success in exams orpromotions in
professional careers.
• 4. Sharing of sympathy and condolences in terms of any tragic
eventuality.
• 5. Sharing of experiences and exposures in the field of anyprofession.
• 6. Sharing of time for maximum utility.
• 7. Sharing of loss and profits of an organization.
• 8. Sharing of job prospective for professional
standards.

 Enumerate the key steps to develop sharing.(6 marks)
KEY POINTS TO DEVELOP SHARING
 1. Motivation and willingness to earn friendships and relationships.
 2. Gaining of wealth and knowledge by more sharing.
 3. Better identification of the individual personality and personal
objectives.
 4. Avoiding excess sharing to prevent the loss of potential viability.
 5. Encouragement and promotion of mutual sharing.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 39 of 58

 6. True commitment with a sense of dedication and involvement.

 Define honesty.(3 marks)

HONESTY

 Honesty is speaking the truth. Saying things that aren't true, or thatyou think
might not be true, or that you are making up to hide the truth are all types of
lies. Lying is not honest (also called being dishonest) because you are saying
something that isn't true.
 Examples of what speaking the honest truth means:

• Honesty means you don't say things about people that aren't true.
You are not being honest if you make up rumors about someone
or if you share rumors someoneelse made up.
• Being honest means you admit to your actions, even if you'll get
in trouble. You are not being honest if you denyyou did something
wrong when you really did it.
• Honesty means you explain how a situation really happened. You
are not being honest if you say somethinghappened one way when
it really happened another way.

 Presentation of truth or open fact is the best quality or a trademark ofhonesty.
Honest persons are always respected and honoured by the society for their
truthful character. Although an honest person may face some hurdles or barriers
to achieve his target in the initial period,he will be suitably rewarded with an
ultimate success to fulfil his goal of achievement in the later period.
 Several epic poems in all international languages have focused on theimportance
of honesty to be practiced in daily life. When the honesty is incorporated into the
characters of children and youth, they can blossom in to matured people with a
strong mental willpower and good moral conduct for a bright future. The basic

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 40 of 58

essence of honesty is manifested, when the individuals respect their inner
thoughts and consciousness to perform their duties to the entire satisfaction of
theiremployers and common public.
 How honesty is exhibited?(6 marks)
 Differentiate Truthfulness & Trustworthiness.(5 marks)
Honesty is a virtue, and it is exhibited in two aspects namely,
 TRUTHFULNESS AND TRUSTWORTHINESS
 Truthfulness is to face the responsibilities upon telling truth. One should
keep one’s word or promise. By admitting one’s mistake committed (one
needs courage to do that!), it is easy to fix them. Reliable engineering
judgment, maintenance of truth, defending the truth, and communicating
the truth, only when it does ‘good’ to others, are some of the reflections of
truthfulness.
 But trustworthiness is maintaining integrity and taking responsibility for
personal performance. People abide by law and live by mutual trust. They
play the right way to win, according to the laws or rules (legally and
morally). They build trust through reliability and authenticity. They admit
their own mistakes and confront unethical actions in others and take tough
and principled stand, even if unpopular.
Honesty is mirrored in many ways. The common reflectionsare
• Beliefs (intellectual honesty).
• Communication (writing and speech).
• Decisions (ideas, discretion).
• Actions (means, timing, place, and the goals) and
• Intended and unintended results achieved.
As against this, some of the actions of an engineer that leads to
dishonesty are
• 1. Lying: Honesty implies avoidance of lying. An engineer may

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 41 of 58

communicate wrong or distorted test results intentionally or otherwise. It is
giving wrong information to the right people.
• 2. Deliberate deception: An engineer may judge or decide on matters one
is not familiar or with insufficient data or proof, to impress upon the
customers or employers. This is a self-deceit.
• 3. Withholding the information: It means hiding the facts during
communication to one’s superior or subordinate,
intentionally or otherwise.
• 4. Not seeking the truth: Some engineers accept the informationor data,
without applying their mind and seeking the truth.
• 5. Not maintaining confidentiality: It is giving right information to wrong
people. The engineers should keep information of their customers/clients or
of their employers confidential and should notdiscuss them with others.
Giving professional judgment under the influence of extraneous factors
such as personal benefits and prejudice. The laws, experience, social
welfare, and even conscience are given a go-bye by such actions. Certainly
this is a higher-order crime.

 The act of honesty could contribute not only to the credibility, but also to an
enhanced social status of an individual. Most moral and ethical theories have
advocated that an honest person could contribute to the desirable changes
in a community by the way of his two primary virtues such as truthfulness
and trustworthiness.
 Define Courage.(3 marks)
 Explain the various classification of courage? (7 marks)

COURAGE

 Courage is the tendency to accept and face risks and difficult tasks in rational
ways. Self-confidence is the basic requirement to nurture courage. Courage is
classified into three types, based on the types of risks, namely

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 42 of 58

 Physical courage,
 Social courage, and
 Intellectual courage.
 In physical courage, the thrust is on the adequacy of the physical strength,
including the muscle power and armaments. People with highadrenalin, may be
prepared to face challenges for the mere ‘thrill‘or driven by a decision to ‘excel‘.
 The social courage involves the decisions and actions to change the order,
based on the conviction for or against certain social behaviors.This requires
leadership abilities, including empathy and sacrifice, tomobilize and motivate
the followers, for the social cause.
 The intellectual courage is inculcated in people through acquired knowledge,
experience, games, tactics, education, and training. In professional ethics,
courage is applicable to the employers, employees,public, and the press.
 Look before you leap. One should perform Strengths, Weakness, Opportunities,
and Threat (SWOT) analysis. Calculate (estimate) the risks, compare with one‘s
strengths, and anticipate the end results, while taking decisions and before getting
into action. Learning from the past helps. Past experience (one‘s own or
borrowed!) and wisdom gained from self-study or others will prepare one to plan
and act with self- confidence, succeed in achieving the desired ethical goals
through ethical means. Opportunities and threat existing and likely to exist in
future are also to be studied and measures to be planned. This anticipatory
management will help anyone to face the future with courage.
 The courageous act is always associated with the disciplined character. When a
person possesses the courageous character in combination with self- discipline, he
is sure to check a success through his determined efforts. The act of courage
could infuse a positive thinking in the minds of people and enhances the power of
tolerance. Individuals with a courageous character are not discouraged and
confused over the failures. Instead, they become ensured to keep on trying and
struggling to reach the successful target with the enhanced motivation. The act of

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 43 of 58

courage strengthens the mental caliber and personal integrity of an individual for
the proper management of the critical problems without any fear and
disappointment. Courageous persons would be so determined to the act
against any social injustice or evil with the sense of moral devotion and
commitment thus not minding their personal discomfort.
 Facing the criticism, owning responsibility, and accepting the mistakesor errors
when committed and exposed are the expressions of courage. In fact, this sets
their mind to be vigilant against the past mistakes, andcreative in finding the
alternate means to achieve the desired objectives.
Prof. Sathish Dhawan, Chief of ISRO, was reported to have exhibited his courage
and owned responsibility, when the previous space mission failed, but credited
Prof. A.P.J. Abdul Kalam (now our revered President), when the subsequent
mission succeeded.
 State the features of a courageous person. (4 marks)
The courageous people own and have shown the following characteristics, in
their professions:
 Perseverance (sustained hard work),
 Experimentation (preparedness to face the challenges, that is,
unexpected or unintended results),
 Involvement (attitude, clear and firm resolve to act), and
 Commitment (willing to get into action and to reach the desired goals byany
alternative but ethical means).

Define Co-operation.(3 marks)

CO-OPERATION

 It is a team-spirit present with every individual engaged in engineering. Co-
operation is an activity between two persons or sectors that aims at integration of

operations (synergy), while not sacrificing the autonomy of either party. Further,
working together ensures, coherence, i.e., blending of different skills required,

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 44 of 58

towards common goals. Willingness to understand others, think and act
together and putting this into practice, is cooperation. Cooperation promotes
collinearity, coherence (blend), co-ordination (activities linked in sequence or
priority) and the synergy (maximizing the output, by reinforcement).
 According to professional ethics, cooperation should exist or be developed, and
maintained, at several levels; between the employers and employees, between the
superiors and subordinates, among the colleagues, between the producers and the
suppliers (spare parts), and between the organisation and its customers. The codes
of ethics of various professional societies insist on appropriate cooperation to
nourish the industry. The absence of cooperation leads to lack of communication,
misinformation, void in communication, and undue delay between supply,
production, marketing, and consumption. This islikely to demoralize and frustrate
the employees, leading to collapse of the industry over time and an economic loss
to the society.
 Enumerate the impediments to successful co-operation.(7 marks)
The impediments to successful co-operation are:
 Clash of ego of individuals.
 Lack of leadership and motivation.
 Conflicts of interests, based on region, religion, language, and caste.
 Ignorance and lack of interest.
By careful planning, motivation, leadership, fostering and rewardingteam work,
professionalism and humanism beyond the ‘divides‘, training on appreciation to
different cultures, mutual understanding ‘cooperation‘ can be developed and also
sustained.
 State the objectives of co-operation(4 marks)
OBJECTIVES OF CO-OPERATION
• Team spirit with active involvement.
• Unified and coordinated efforts.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 45 of 58

• Motivation for public welfare.
• Service mindedness with honesty and integrity without any
expectation for personal benefit.
• Sharing identical views for the common goals.
• Democratic participation with dedication for the welfare of a nation or
community. Voluntary acceptance to the outcome of co- operative efforts.
The social and political architecture of any nation is based on the concept
of co-operation. It is a worth mentioning to point out that liberation
movements in several countries including India for procuring independent
freedom from the clutches of rulers, had been achieved only through
the co- operative movement and struggle. Any social or community

conflict could be amicably settled and solved through the co-
operative movements. The legitimate interests of any subject are fully

protected without any violation by means of co- operation.

 The process of co-operation creates a strong network of bonding by which social
harmony and cultural traditions are fully protected. Right from ancient time

onwards, vedic scholars and philosophers have underlined the importance of co-
operation in the restoration of democratic rights and justice.

 It has become the moral obligation of every individual to cultivate and develop
the sense of co-operation for the betterment of community or organization with
which he is associated

 Define Commitment.( 3 marks)

COMMITMENT

 Commitment means alignment to goals and adherence to ethical principles during
the activities. One must believe in one‘s action performed and the expected end
results (confidence). Holding sustained interest and firmness, in whatever ethical
means one follows, with the fervent attitude and hope that one will achieve the
goals, is commitment.It is the driving force to realize success. Commitment means

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 46 of 58

acceptance of the responsibilities and duties and cooperation means help and
assistance. By developing team commitment and cooperation in a work team you
are assisting the team to meet its goals and objectives. Work teams that are
committed and cooperative are more likely to achieve the goals the business has
set.
There are a number of signals that indicate the work team is committed.
These include:
 maintaining or increasing quality
 reaching or exceeding production targets
 decreasing complaints from team members
 limited conflict between team members
 Fewer workplace injuries.
 There are degrees of team involvement in decision making. Your knowledge of
the skills and abilities of the team members will guide your decision about the extent
supported employees can contribute to making a decision. There are no rules for
when and how team members should be involved. It is a matter for your
judgment. The following diagram shows the degrees of involvement team
members may have. At the highest level of involvement the team identifies and
solves problems, and brings recommendations to the supervisor. At the lowest
level of involvement the team plays no role in the decision making at all.Between
these two extremes the supervisor and team may make the decision together,
or the supervisor may outline the problem and constraints for solving it (time,
money, etc) and hand it over to the teamto solve.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 47 of 58

High involvement to no involvement

 Involving team members in decision making, which can include problem solving,
should be based on whether one or more of the following is met. The need for
acceptance. The greater the need for the team to accept your decisions, the more
you should involve them.
• The effect the decision will have on the team. The more the problem or
decision affects the team, the more you should involve them. Their
involvement in implementing the decision. If the teamwill be implementing
or carrying out the decision, involve them. The ability and desire of the
group to become involved. If the team wants to be involved, consider
involving them, particularly if they have sufficient knowledge or expertise
in the issue involved. Even if they do not, it could be useful for training and
development purposes.
• The tendency for commitment is much required for the perfect completion
or execution of any personal or professional affair. Lack of commitment
and enthusiasm may not contribute to any successful achievement of any
task.
• Execution of any academic or professional task without the commitment

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 48 of 58

may not yield the expected result.
• State the characteristic features of commitment .(6 marks)
The characteristic features of commitment are mentioned asfollows.
• Consistent efforts
• Tendency of caring
• Reliable approach
• Dependable attitude
• Duty consciousness
• Sense of integrity
• Dedicated loyalty.
 Commitment is considered to be a voluntary and spontaneous act and is not
enforced by any compulsion or authoritative act. Commitment cannot be formally
registered by any act of pact or written statement. Butit is the original expression of
mental attitude of an individual for an active involvement in any task. A person
with a true sense of commitment is prepared to forgo his conveniences and
comforts for the sake of welfare of others. It is also evident to say that selfishness
is totally eradicated by the true application of commitment.
 Explain the different types of commitment? (7 marks)

DIFFERENT TYPES OF COMMITMENTS

 1. Any commitment to work or task refers to the application of mental thinking
and inclination to take up any work with a sense of perfection.
 2. Professional commitment refers to the sensible attitude of
involvement for the sustained growth of an organization.
 3. Any commitment to a customer refers to the sincere and satisfactoryservice to
the expectations of a customer.
 4. Any commitment to a friend refers to the true symbol of spirit and enthusiasm
for mutual help and service to justify the true symbol of friendship.
 Any commitment to a nation refers to the patriotic sacrifice to uphold the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 49 of 58

integrity and sovereignty of a country.
The development of tendency for commitment could induce a self- realization
and self-confidence to serve for the community or society. The common public,
students, teachers and professionals should make it as a compulsory criterion to
develop and also cultivate the act ofcommitment for the sake of both personal and
community welfare benefits. The act of commitment leads to the building up of
disciplined character and conduct. It provides the natural instinct with anticipated
efforts for the honest sharing of the problems of others.

 Define Empathy.(3 marks)

EMPATHY

 Empathy is social radar. Sensing what others feel about, without their open talk,
is the essence of empathy. Empathy begins with showing concern, and then
obtaining and understanding the feelings of others, from others‘ point of view. It
is also defined as the ability to put one‘s self into the psychological frame or
reference or point of view of another, to know what the other person feels. It
includes the imaginative projection into other‘s feelings and understanding of
other‘s background such as parentage, physical and mental state, economic
situation, and association. This is an essential ingredient for good human relations
andtransactions.
 Enumerate the features of empathy.(7 marks)
To practice ‘Empathy‘, a leader must have or develop in him, the following
characteristics
 Understanding others: It means sensing others feelings and perspectives, and
taking active interest in their welfare.
 Service orientation: It is anticipation, recognition and meeting the needs of the
clients or customers.
 Developing others: This means identification of their needs and bolstering their
abilities. In developing others, the one should inculcate in him the listening
skill‘first.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 50 of 58

 Communication : 22% reading and writing + 23% speaking + 55% listening
 One should get the feedback, acknowledge the strength and accomplishments,
and then coach the individual, by informing about what was wrong, and giving
correct feedback and positive expectation of the subject‘s abilities and the
resulting performance. Leveraging diversity (opportunities through diverse
people): This leads to enhanced organizational learning, flexibility, and
profitability.
 Political awareness: It is the ability to read political and social currentsin
an organization.
The benefits of empathy include:
 Good customer relations (in sales and service, in partnering).
 Harmonious labor relations (in manufacturing).
 Good vendor-producer relationship (in partnering.)
 Through the above three, we can maximize the output and profit, as wellas
minimizing the loss.
 While dealing with customer complaints, empathy is very effective inrealising
the unbiased views of others and in admitting one‘s ownlimitations and
failures. According to Peter Drucker, purpose of thebusiness is not to make a
sale, but to make and keep a customer.
 Enumerate the importance of listening in empathy( 7 marks)
ASSOCIATION BETWEEN LISTENING & EMPATHY

 Listening and empathy are the two important factors to build up a strong and
worthy relationship, based on the mutual exchange of views and ideas. The
proper listening enables a person to have the accurate assessment of the
conditions, situations and status of other persons for the proper future-orientated
actions. Learning also provides more clues to the person to identify the feelings of
others for mutual help.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 51 of 58

 The ultimate benefits of the association between listening and empathy are
explained as follows:
 1.It provides a green signal to the other persons about the meaningful perception
of a message and for further closed dialogues.
 2.This erodes and also corrects any misconception or misunderstanding between
the individuals there by creating transparent understanding of others
 3.This interaction promotes and improves the quality of personal
conversation between individuals regarding some sensitive andemotional topics.
 4. This interaction strengthens the bond of friendship thus ensuring forfurther
intimate exchange of personal views.
 5. This interaction contributes certain good qualities and virtues such asmutual
help, forgiveness and tolerance.
 The ideal combination of both empathy and sympathy constitutes the
important aspect of ethical code of conduct and character. This unique
combination of a character is expressed, when a person remains in a state of
calamity due to various personal and social causes. For example, when an
individual is grieved by the death of his family member, the gentle expression of
condolences by uttering a few soothing words with the sharing of his sorrowful
feelings would provide a sense of consolation and comfort to the bereaved
individual. It is the real essence of human values that the persons who are affected
by any natural or personal calamity, should be attended with the deep sense of
affectionand dedication.
 Define Self Confidence.( 3marks)

SELF-CONFIDENCE

 The term self-confidence refers to the positive attitude to face and execute
anything with capability. Self-confidence is identified as an important moral
virtue that strengthens the mental stability and will power for the successful
achievement of any task. It acts as a morale booster to motivate a person in a right
direction. It provides a person withself-courage and self-interest to think and act in

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 52 of 58

a constructive terms. The basic attitude of optimism and selfless efforts would
provide a striking force to a person for the perfect execution of any task.
 Certainty in one‘s own capabilities, values, and goals, is self-confidence. Such
people are usually positive thinking, flexible and willing to change. They respect
others so much as they respect themselves. Self-confidence is positive attitude,
wherein the individual has some positive and realistic view of himself, with respect
to the situations in which one gets involved.
 The people with self- confidence exhibit courage to get into action and
unshakable faith in their abilities, whatever may be their positions. They are not
influenced by threats or challenges and are prepared to face themand the natural or
unexpected consequences. The self-confidence in a person develops a sense of
partnership, respect, and accountability, and this helps the organization to obtain
maximum ideas, efforts, and guidelines from its employees.
 Enumerate the salient features of self confidence (7 marks)
SALIENT FEATURES OF SELF-CONFIDENCE

 1. Powerful conviction of mind.
 2. Courageous attitude to shoulder responsibility.
 3. Positive thinking with optimistic thoughts.
 4. Awareness to cater the needs of others.
 5. Capability to adapt with the changes.
 6. Bold attitude to take risky efforts.
 7. Capability to face the challenging encounters.
 8. Attitude for experimentation to understand new things.
 9. Individuality in taking bold decisions.

FEATURES OF LACK OF SELF-CONFIDENCE

 Tendency of expecting approval and consent from others.
 Indecisive approach without bold character.
 Fearful attitude for criticisms and remarks from others.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 53 of 58

 Insecure feeling without moral courage.
 Lack of precise planning without an advanced strategy.
 Arrogant attitude without any flexibility.
 Provocative behaviour towards the organisational authority.
 Examine the factors that shape the self confidence of an individual
(7 marks)

 The factors that shape self-confidence in a person are:
• Heredity (attitudes of parents) and family environment (elders),
• Friendship (influence of friends/colleagues),
• Influence of superiors/role models, and
• Training in the organization (e.g., training by Technical
Evangelists at Infosys Technologies).

KEY POINTS FOR THE CULTIVATION OF SELF-
CONFIDENCE

 Mental alertness to assess the reason for mistakes and failures.
 Flexible temperament by the mutual exchange of ideas and views.
 Well-designed strategic procedures for the proper achievement of goaland
objectives.
 Meaningful and beneficial association with the people of good moralvalues and
characters.
 Consistent planning for an accurate execution of a task.
 Ignoring the unhealthy comments and criticisms for achieving
professional excellence
 Well-planned preoccupations for purposeful objectives and goals.
 Deriving sense of satisfaction and pleasure, while executing any work.
 Ability to develop positive thinking in terms of progressive upliftmentof an
organization or company.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 54 of 58

The following methodologies are effective in developing self-
confidence in a person:

 Encouraging SWOT analysis. By evaluating their strength and
weakness, they can anticipate and be prepared to face the results.
 Training to evaluate risks and face them (self-acceptance).
 Self-talk . It is conditioning the mind for preparing the self to act, withoutany doubt
on his capabilities. This make one accepts himself while still striving for
improvement.
 Study and group discussion, on the history of leaders and innovators (e.g., Sam
Walton of Wal-Mart, USA).
The basic principles of self-confidence is expressed by the following selective
examples
 I have the potential ability of doing any task.
 I have the better exposure and capability of handling and doing anyactivity.
 I have the professional competence of executing that task.
 I have the personal integrity and honesty in my professional approach.
 Proper evaluation and assessment of one’s capability and potential
strength.
 I have a transparent and modest character to avoid the balancing byothers.
 I have a better sense of mind to appreciate the nature of work done byothers.
 Write a short note on social expectations (7 marks)
SOCIAL EXPECTATIONS

 Social expectations are ideas that we have of how someone in our social
surroundings will behave in the future or in a specific situation. When we
generate an impression of someone, these expectations are associated with the
image we generate. This helps us imagine how we have to behave or act around
them and to predict their behavior.
 This conduct of generating expectations about our relationships fulfills an

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 55 of 58

adaptive function. It’s pretty simple to guess what it is. In an artificialenvironment,
based on complex societies such as the ones most of us inhabit, foreseeing the
behavior of others allows us to adapt our own behavior. Thus, we would greatly
benefit in social interactions. Despite that this isn’t a precise process, making a
prediction and being wrong at times is better than not doing it or never guessing
correctly.
 It’s important to know that these social or behavioral expectations greatly
influence our own behavior. We don’t treat everyone alike, just as we don’t treat
the same person the same way in every situation. We can see this in many
everyday situations. Plus, we try to make others meet our expectations, either by
forcing them indirectly or altering our perception them. This process takes place in
both directions. We are also aware of the expectations others have of us. So we
also attempt to adaptour behavior in order to satisfy these ideas.

QUESTIONS
Part – A

(Three-Mark Questions)
1. Define Ethics? What is the need to study Ethics?
2. What is Engineering Ethics?
3. What is the scope of engineering ethics?
4. What is meant by human values? Explain the different types of values.
5. Define the term morals.
6. What is integrity?
7. What are the sources of values?
8. Give any three forms of academic dishonesty among the students.
9. What is meant by work ethics? List out the objectives of work
ethics.
10. Explain why ethical problems arise in a work place.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 56 of 58

11. Explain caring and sharing.
12. Define courage. Explain the different types of courage.
13. Explain the characteristics shown by a courageous person.
14. Explain the importance of ‘value of time’.
15. Define empathy? Explain the benefits of empathy.
16. Give any four qualities of work Ethics.
17. What is service learning?
18. What are the objectives of Service -Learning?
19. Define the term civic virtue?
20. Mention the salient features of civic virtues.
21. What is altruism?
22. What are the essential elements of respect?
23. What are the suggestions for peaceful living?
24. What is Caring?
25. What is sharing?
26. What is honesty?
27. What is courage?
27. What is meant by valuing time?
28. What is co-operation?
29. What are the objectives of Co-operation?
30. What is meant by commitment?
31. What is empathy?
32. What is self-confidence?
33. What are the salient features of self-confidence?
34. What is character? Bring out the different types of character.
35. What is plagiarism?
36. Define empathy and honesty.
37. Briefly explain about morals, values and ethics.
38.Interpret the two forms of self-respect.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 57 of 58

PART – B ESSAY
QUESTION
(14 marks)

1. Write a brief summary on the aspects of morals,
values andethics.
2. Explain the influence of (a) ethics and (b) education on character.
3. Briefly explain the three aspects of morals.
4. Give a brief account on the various types and sources ofvalues.
5. Briefly explain about the salient features of engineering ethics.
6. Write a brief account to the various types of integrity.
7. Explain about the various aspects of work ethics.
8. Write an account on the salient features and objectives of
Service-learning.
9.a) Classify the relationship between ethical values and law?
b) Compare between caring and sharing.
10 .Bring out the role of civic virtues in character building and civic
education.
11. Explain the various features of respect.
12.Explain the various suggestive measures for a peaceful living.
13. Explain how a person can achieve a peaceful living in the world.
14. Focus on the various features of caring.
15. Write a short account on the various aspects of honesty.
16. Define honesty. How can we identify the honesty of a person?
17. Explain some of the actions of a dishonest professional.
18. Briefly write about the beneficial aspects of time management
and their ways of implementation.
19.Explain the salient features and types of commitment.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 58 of 58

20. Bring out the importance of commitment of a person in an activity.
21. Briefly discuss the various aspects of empathy.
22. Define self-confidence. Explain the characteristics of a person
with this.
23. Write a brief note on the classical features of self-confidence and
the impact of the lack of self-confidence.
24. Explain the value ‘integrity’ and its importance in professional
life.
25. Explain how self-confidence can be developed in a person.
26. What can be the impediments to co-operation? How they can be
overcome in practice?
27. Write a short account on the various aspects of character.
28. Explain the basic principles with regard to the aspect ‘respect for others’ which can
nurture friendship and team work.
29. Explain the term integrity and its need for engineering professional,




MODULE: 5
GLOBAL ETHICS ISSUES

Multinational Corporations- Environmental Ethics- Business

Ethics- Computer Ethics -Role in Technological Development-
Engineers as Managers- Consulting Engineers- Engineers as

Expert witnesses and advisors-Moral leadership.
Define Globalization.(3)

GLOBALIZATION

Globalization means integration of countries through
commerce, transfer of technology, and exchange of information and culture. In a
way, it includes acting together and interacting economies through trade,
investment, loan, development schemes and capital across countries. In a different
sense, these flows include knowledge, science, technology, skills, culture,
information, and entertainment, besides direct human resource, tele-work, and
outsourcing. This interdependence has increased the complex tensions and
ruptures among the nations. For the engineers, the issues such as multinational
organizations, computer, internet functions, military development and
environmental ethics have assumed greater importance for their very sustenance
and progress.
Globalization usually benefits the company and the home country by becoming more
competitive in world trade. Globalization offers many advantages for the developing
counties in the way of foreign investment, new increased employment opportunities
for their citizens, opportunities for skill development, transfer of new advanced
technology and management skills and many other social benefits due to the
improvement in their economy.
On the other hand it has many negative effects. It badly affects the job security and
employment generation in the home country. In globalisation there is a possibility of
protecting the economic interests of the home country than the host country and
exploiting natural resources and labour. Many occasions the affects the cultural
diversity of the host country. Thus globalization poses many questions related to

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

many issues connected with expanding operations to other countries. Some of them
are as follows:

 Whether globalization causes for job loss in the home country?
 Whether it causes for the exploitation of resources in the host
country?
 Whether it causes for the exploitation of labour in the host country?
 How the cultural diversities are addressed?
 What will be after effect of mixing of different cultures?
GLOBALIZATION OF ENGINEERING

As more and more companies expand their operations in an international manner, the
engineer‘s professional life may come across with many physical, cultural and
political environments those belong to different countries.International trade
agreements and consideration towards international laws governing human rights
and environmental issues make the decision making process very complicate with
regard to personal and professional life. Such considerations raise new moral and
ethical questions that are relevant to engineers with regard to their profession. As
professionals, engineers are bound to follow some ethical codes so as to comply with
their obligations towards the wellbeing of the society and people where they work.

GLOBALIZATION & ENGINEERING EDUCATION

As part of this phenomena, engineering also became global. The first step in the
globalization of engineering is establishing universal criteria for engineering
education .There are many accords in the world with regard to engineering
education. India is a member country in the Washington Accord. It is an agreement
among bodies that have the authority to accredit engineering programs in their
respective countries or jurisdictions? The primary purpose of the accord is to
establish substantial agreement among the signatory countries or jurisdictions are
able to accept the qualifications of engineers graduating from accredited institutions
in other signatory countries or jurisdictions as equivalent. The engineers in the
accredited jurisdictions are expected not only to meet minimal technical standards in
their education but also to abide some code of conduct.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 3 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
ENGINEERS AS PROFESSIONALS

Generally, engineers are considered as professionals. As professionals they are
bound to follow some ethical codes that guide themselves so as to comply with their
responsibilities towards the wellbeing of the people and the sustainability of the
environment. There are several accredited associations for engineers such as
National Society of Professional Engineers (NSPE), Commonwealth Engineers
Council (CEC) The World Federation of Engineering Organizations (WFEO).All
these organizations promote ethics and professional conduct and endorses the
obligation of engineers to promote health, safety and welfare of the
public.Asprofessionals, engineers are bound to abide the code of professional ethics
applicable internationally and nationally related to multiple nations with regard to
their functional area. Hence the awareness and compliance of these diverging ethical
conditions are very important for their sustenance and progress of multinational
corporations.
Define Multinational Companies.(3)

MULTINATIONAL CORPORATIONS

Organisations who have established business in more than one country, are called
Multinational Corporation. The headquarters are in the home country and the
business is extended in many host countries. The Western organizations doing
business in the less-economically developed (developing, and overpopulated)
countries gain the advantage of inexpensive labour, availability of natural resources,
conducive-tax atmosphere, and virgin market for the products. At the same time, the
developing countries are also benefited by fresh job opportunities, jobs with higher
remuneration and challenges, transfer of technology, and several social benefits by
the wealth developed. But this happens invariably with some social and cultural
disturbance. Loss of jobs for the home country, and loss or exploitation of natural
resources, political instability for the host countries are some of the threats of
globalization.
A multinational corporation is known by various names such as: global
enterprise, international enterprise, world enterprise, transnational
corporation etc.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 4 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
Some popular examples of multinationals are given below
FOREIGNMULTINATIONAL INDIAN AFFILIATE /SUBSIDIARY
Bata Corporation Bata India
Cadbury Cadbury India
Coca-Cola Corporation Coca Cola India
Unilever Hindustan Lever
Timex Timex Watches
Colgate Palmolive Colgate India
Pepsi Corporation Pepsi India
Philips Philips India
Sony Corporation Sony India
Suzuki Maruti Suzuki
GEC GEC Alsthom
ABB ABB India

Enumerate the features of multinational corporations.(8)
Features of Multinational Corporations (MNCs)

Following are the salient features of MNCs:
(i) Huge Assets andTurnover:Because of operations on a global basis,
MNCs have huge physical and financial assets. This also results in huge
turnover (sales) of MNCs. In fact, in terms of assets and turnover, many
MNCs are bigger than national economies of several countries.
(ii)InternationalOperationsthroughaNetworkofBranches:MNCs have production
and marketing operations in several countries; operating through a network of
branches, subsidiaries and affiliates in host countries.
(iii)UnityofControl:MNCsarecharacterizedbyunityofcontrol.MNCscontrolbusinessa
ctivitiesoftheir branches in foreign countries through head office located in the home
country. Managements of branches operate within the policy framework of the
parent corporation.
(iv)Mighty EconomicPower:MNCsare powerful

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 5 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

economicentities.Theykeeponaddingtotheireconomicpower through constant
mergers and acquisitions of companies, in hostcountries.
(v)Advanced and Sophisticated Technology: Generally, a MNC has at its
command advanced and sophisticated technology. It employs capital intensive
technology in manufacturing and marketing.
(vi)ProfessionalManagement: A MNC employs professionally trained managers to
handle huge funds, advanced technology and international business operations.
(vii)Aggressive Advertising andMarketing:MNCs spend huge sums of money on
advertising and marketing to secure international business. This is, perhaps, the
biggest strategy of success of MNCs. Because of this strategy, they are able to sell
whatever products/services, they produce/generate.
(viii)Better Quality of Products:A MNC has to compete on the world level. It,
therefore, has to pay special attention to the quality of its products.

Describe the merits & demerits of MNCS from the view point of
host country.(14)

ADVANTAGES &LIMITATIONS OF MNCS
Advantages of MNCs from the Viewpoint of Host Country

We propose to examine the advantages and limitations of MNCs from the
viewpoint of the host country. In fact, advantages of MNCs make for the case in
favour of MNCs; while limitations of MNCs become the case against MNCs.
(i) EmploymentGeneration:MNCs create large scale employment
opportunities in host countries. This is a big advantage of MNCs for
countries; where there is a lot of unemployment.
(ii) Automatic Inflow of ForeignCapital:MNCs bring in much needed
capital for the rapid development of developing countries. In fact, with
the entry of MNCs, inflow of foreign capital is automatic. As
aresultoftheentryofMNCs,Indiae.g.hasattractedforeigninvestmentwithseve
ral milliondollars.
(iii) Proper Use of IdleResources: Because of their advanced technical

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 6 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

knowledge, MNCs are in a position to properly utilize idle physical and
human resources of the host country. This results in an increase in the
National Income of the host country.
(iv) ImprovementinBalanceofPaymentPosition:MNCs help the host
countries to increase their exports. As such, they help the host country to
improve upon its Balance of Payment position.
(v).TechnicalDevelopment: MNCs carry the advantages of technical development 10
host countries. In fact, MNCs are a vehicle for transference of technical
development from one country to another. Because of MNCs poor host countries
also begin to develop technically.
(vi) ManagerialDevelopment: MNCs employ latest management techniques.
People employed by MNCs do a lot
ofresearchinmanagement.Inaway,theyhelptoprofessionalizemanagemental
ong latest lines of management theory and practice. This leads to
managerial development in hostcountries.
(vii) End of LocalMonopolies: The entry of MNCs leads to competition in
the host countries. Local monopolies of host countries either start
improving their products or reduce their prices. Thus MNCs put an end to
exploitative practices of local monopolists. As a matter of fact, MNCs
compel domestic companies to improve their efficiency and quality.

InIndia,manyIndiancompaniesacquiredISO-
9000qualitycertificates,duetofear of competition posed byMNCs.

(viii) Improvement in Standard ofLiving: By providing super quality
products and services, MNCs help to improve the standard of living of
people of host countries.
(x)Promotionofinternationalbrotherhoodandculture:MNCs integrate economies
of various nations with the world economy. Through their international dealings,
MNCs promote international brotherhood and culture; and pave way for world
peace and prosperity.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 7 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
Limitations of MNCs from the Viewpoint of Host Country
(i)Danger for DomesticIndustries:MNCs, because of their vast economic
power, pose a danger to domestic industries; which are still in the process of
development. Domestic industries cannot face challenges posed by MNCs.
Many domestic industries have to wind up, as a result of threat from MNCs.
Thus MNCs give a setback to the economic growth of host countries.
(ii)Repatriation ofProfits:(Repatriation of profits means sending profits
to their country):MNCs earn huge profits. Repatriation of profits by MNCs
adversely affects the foreign exchange reserves of the host country; which
means that a large amount of foreign exchange goes out of the host country.
(iii)No Benefit to PoorPeople:MNCs produce only those things, which
are used by the rich. Therefore, poor people of host countries do not get,
generally, any benefit, out of MNCs.
(iv)Danger to Independence: Initially MNCs help the Government of the
host country, in a number of ways; and then gradually start interfering in the
political affairs of the host country. There is, then, an implicit danger to the
independence of the host country, in the long-run.
(v)DisregardoftheNationalInterestsoftheHostCountry:MNCs invest in
most profitable sectors; and disregard the national goals and priorities of the
host country. They do not care for the development of backward regions;
and never care to solve chronic problems of the host country like
unemployment and poverty.
(vi)Misuse of
MightyStatus:MNCsarepowerfuleconomicentities.Theycanaffordt
obearlossesforalongwhile, in the hope of earning huge profits-once
they have ended local competitionand achieved monopoly. This
may be the dirty strategy of MNCs to wipe off local competitors
from the host country.
(vi)Careless Exploitation of NaturalResources:MNCs tend to
use the natural resources of the host country carelessly. They cause

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 8 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

rapid depletion of some of the non-renewable natural resources of
the host country. In this way, MNCs cause a permanent damage to
the economic development of the host country.
(vii)Selfish Promotion of AlienCulture:
NCstendtopromotealiencultureinhostcountrytoselltheirproducts.Th
eymake people forget about their own cultural heritage. In India,
e.g. MNCs have created a taste for synthetic food, soft drinks etc.
This promotion of foreign culture by MNCs is injurious to the
health of peoplealso.
(viii)ExploitationofPeople,inaSystematicManner: MNCs join
hands with big business houses of host country and emerge as
powerful monopolies. This leads to concentration of economic
power only in a few hands. Gradually these monopolies make it
their birth right to exploit poor people and enrich themselves at the
cost of the poor working class.
MULTINATIONAL CORPORATIONS IN INDIA

MNCs have been operating in India even prior to Independence, like Singer,
Parry, Philips, Unit- Lever, Proctor and Gamble. They either operated in the form
of subsidiaries or entered into collaboration with Indian companies involving sale
of technology as well as use of foreign brand names for the final products. The
entry of MNCs in India was controlled by existing industrial policy statements,

MRTPAct,andFERA.Inthepre-
reformperiodtheoperationsofMNCsinIndiawererestricted.

New Industrial Policy 1991 and Multinational Corporations
The New Industrial Policy 1991, removed the restrictions of entry to
MNCs through various concessions. The amendment of FERA in 1993
provided further concession to MNCs in India.
At present MNCs in India can—
(i) Increase foreign equity up to 51 percent by remittances in foreign
exchange in specified high priority areas. Subsequently MNCs are free to

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 9 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
own a majority share in equity in mostproducts.
(ii) BorrowmoneyoracceptdepositwithoutthepermissionofReserveBankofIndi
a.
(iii) Transfer shares from one non-resident to anothernon-resident.
(iv) Disinvest equity at market rates on stockexchanges.
(v) Go for 100 percent foreign equity through the automatic route in
Specified sectors.
(vi) Deal in immovable properties inIndia.
(vii) Carry on in India any activity of trading, commercial or industrial
except a very small negativelist.
Thus, MNCs have been placed at par with Indian Companies and would
not be subjected to any special restrictions under FERA.
CRITICISMS AGAINST MNCS IN INDIA

The operations of MNCs in India have been opposed on the
followinggrounds:
(i) They are interested more on mergers and acquisitions and not on freshprojects.
(ii) They have raised very large part of their financial resources from
within the country.
(iii) They supply second hand plant and machinery declared obsolete in
their country.
(i v) They are mainly profit oriented and have short term focus on quick
profits. National interests and problems are generally ignored.
(v) They use expatriate management and personnel rather than
competitive Indian Management.
(vi) Though they collect most of the capital from within the country, they
have repatriated huge profits to their mothercountry.
(vii) They make no effort to adopt an appropriate technology suitable to
the needs. Moreover, transfer of technology proves verycostly.
(viii) Once an MNC gains foothold in a venture, it tries to increase its
holding in order to become a majorityshareholder.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 10 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

(ix) Further,oncefinancialliberalizationsareinplaceandfreemovementisallo
wed, MNCs can destabilize theeconomy.
(x) They prefer to participate in the production of mass consumption and
non- essentialitems.

INTERNATIONAL HUMAN RIGHTS

To know what are the moral responsibilities and obligations of the
multinational corporations operating in the host countries, let us discuss with
the framework of rights ethics. Common minimal rights are to be followed to
smoothen the transactions when the engineers and employers of MNCs have to
interact at official, social, economic and sometimes political levels. At
international level, the organizations are expected to adopt the minimum levels
of
• (a) values, such as mutual support, loyalty, and reciprocity,
• (b) the negative duty of refraining from harmful actions such as violence and
fraud, and
• (c) basic fairness and practical justice in case of conflicts.
The ten international rights to be taken care of, in this context are:
• 1. Right of freedom of physical movement of people
• 2. Right of ownership of properties
• 3. Freedom from torture
• 4. Right to fair trial on the products
• 5. Freedom from discrimination on the basis of race or sex. If such
discrimination against women or minorities is prevalent in the host country, the
MNC will be compelled to accept. MNCs may opt to quit that country if the
human rights violations are severe.
• 6. Physical security. Use of safety gadgets have to be supplied to the workers
even if the laws of the host country do not suggest such measures.
• 7. Freedom of speech and forming association
• 8. Right to have a minimum education
• 9. Right to political participation

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 11 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• 10. Right to live and exist (i.e., coexistence). The individual liberty and sanctity
of the human life are to be respected by all societies.
Evaluate the technology transfer & appropriate technology.
(8)

TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER

It is a process of moving technology to a new setting and implementing it there.
Technology includes hardware (machines and installations) and the techniques
(technical, organizational, and managerial skills and procedures). It may mean
moving the technology applications from laboratory to the field/factory or from
one country to another. This transfer is effected by governments, organizations,
universities, and MNCs. Thus there happens a transfer or movement of
technology and associated skills from one country to another that finally
improves the development process of the host country.
For example, when a developing country permits a foreign country to
manufacture a particular model of aircraft to host country, the MOU between
the countries provides for the technology transfer after a particular period or
certain number of production units into the host country. Here the parent
company trains the local people to handle the technology and associate them in
production process. After the specified period the parent company transfers the
technology (both machines and installations and the operating and managing
skills) to the host country. Thereafter the host company can be able to produce
that model of aircraft freely.

USE OF APPROPRIATE TECHNOLOGY

The MNCs are expected to identify,transfer, and implement the appropriate
technology matching to the new situations .Technology includes both hardware
and software that includes technical, organizational and managerial skills and
procedures. Many factors like economic, social and engineering have
determinant role in choosing and implementing appropriate technology.
Availability and nature of resources, physical conditions, capital opportunity
costs and the human value system that includes traditions, beliefs, religion, also
influence the decision about the right kind of technology.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 12 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

For example, the interest of small farmers in our country with regard to use of
power tillers rather than high-powered tractors or sophisticated harvesting
machines and the social security job conditions are to be considered while
thinking about importing a new technology for the appropriateness. The term
appropriate is value based and it should ensure fulfilment of the human needs
and protection of the environment.
RESPECTING CULTURAL DIFFERNECES & CULTURAL

RELATIVISM

One of the toughest area of ethical concern is the accommodation of different
cultures with the business domain. Every time an MNC expands its operation
to a host country it has to address a new culture that is different from home
country. Then the question is whether the company follows the adage ―When in
Rome, do as the Romans‖. Different cultures have different moral norms and
practices. The actions of corporation and individuals that are accepted by law,
custom and other values of a society can be morally right in that society. But it
may not be acceptable to another society by custom, values, and even law. This
situation is known as Cultural Relativism.
When multinational companies assume that their moral values depend on the
culture in which they operate, they practice ethical relativism. Ethical
relativisms means morality is relative. That is, these companies apply different
ethical and moral standards according to the physical locations of their
operations .It means the corporation and the engineers functioning inn other
countries must understand their law ,customs and beliefs and act in line with
those prevailing in that country.
If the organizations practice laws of the home country, without any changes or
adjustments to the host country it referred to ethical absolutism.This style is
also problematic irrespective of the goodness is something relational. Hence,
the way out for MNCs to overcome the situation is to follow ethical rationalism
that matches with the context, as a compromise.Every moral judgement has to
be made in relation to the prevailing factors locally,without sticking on rigid

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 13 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

rules.Then the moral decisions will, be realistic, matching with the context,
culture and customs of other countries.

Explain the tree guide lines that business person should
follow while doing business in other countries?(6)
The three guide lines that keep you on the right path when doing business

in other countries

1. Adhere to Universal moral standards: The first obligation of any
multinational company is to follow universal moral standards.Although the
culture of people of different places differ in determiningwhat constitutes for
right and wrong, there are some universal moral views those are shared in
common. For example committing murder without substantial reason is
considered as wrong everywhere .But all societies consider that killing another
person without substantial reason or committing a rape or bribery is a crime
and prohibits such acts through laws. Moral standards include prohibitions
against stealing, obligations to care for children and the elderly, avoidance of
exploitation of natural resources etc.
2. Keep trust and honesty as basic principles:MNCs should comply with
certain level of trust and honesty. Trust is an essential ingredient for any
business enterprise to survive in a long term basis. In any transaction whether it
is providing goods or services as suppliers or purchasing materials as
manufacturers or paying the employees, enterprises should keep trust worthy
dealings. The employers should provide fair pay, safety measures to the
employees and develop trust among the employees towards the organization.
We can nurture trust through honest dealings as honesty acts as moral currency
of business.
3. Value Human Rights: Multinational business should respect human
liberties. So ethical companies take the responsibility to defend and promote
human rights of the people in the home country as well as the host countries.
Thus the task of multinational businesses is to address and respect the cultural
differences of people and nations and adhering to the universal ethical norms.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 14 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

The absence of an effective monitoring system may lead to unethical
practices,moral breaches form the side of business enterprises.

Define Environmental ethics.(3)

ENVIRONMENTAL ETHICS

There exists a direct co-relation between the living organisms and the surrounding
environment. The dynamic survival of all living organisms including man, is much
dependent on the environmental factors such as composition (if atmospheric air,
temperature, light and soil texture. When these ecological factors are influenced by
an external agent such as air or water or soil pollution, the ecological imbalance
appears. This in turn, drastically alters and affects human population and other living
organisms in the biosphere. These factors form the fundamental basis for the
introduction and implementation of a modern concept called "environmental
ethics".
Environmental Ethics deal with issues related to the rights of individuals that are
fundamentaltolifeandwell-being. Theseconcernnotonlytheneedsofeachperson
today, but also those who will come after us. It also deals with the rights of others
living creatures that inhabit theEarth.Globalization and industrialization have
impacted the environment on a very large
scale.Thelongtermeffectsoftheenvironmentareusuallyneglectedunlessitisgross and
immediateeffect.We are getting habituated to the ill-effects of pollution and
industrial negligence shows on our environment. The aftermath can be seen in
acid rains, water and land contamination, effect on crops and food sources, the
cattle getting affected, the
dryingoflakesandcanals,floods,drought,tsunamisandearthquakesduetodrilling of
underground wealth, the effect on marine being, the effect on ozone and the
melting of snow mountains due to global warming, etc. The aftermath can be an
alarming call for the required environmentalchanges.
ENGINEERS &ENVIRONMNETAL ETHICS

Engineers must develop the positive attitude to have the mental orientation and
assessment about their ethical obligations that they are presumed to fulfil in

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 15 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

contributing their best efforts to keep the environment clean. While taking up any
challenging careers, engineers should evaluate to what extent their professional
assignments would directly interfere with and harm the surrounding environment.
They must have the insights in designing and formulating their productive plans
which will not either crucially led to the environmental degradation or
deterioration.Engineersneedtoshowsomeresponsibilitytowardstheenvironmentandsho
uldbe ethical in their approach and find mitigating solutions for the protection of
environment. Hence engineers in the past were not bothered about the degradation of
environment, in their activities .Presently most of the activities associated with engineering are
governed by several legislations related to environmental considerations.Now engineers are
bound to follow many code of conducts, eco-friendly tools, machines processes and projects
which ensures environmental diversity.These include measures such as
1.Ensure protection of environment
2. Prevent the degradation of environment
3.Slowdown the exploitation of the natural resources, so that future
generations can also survive in this planet.
The American Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE) code of ethics has specifically requires
that engineers shall hold paramount the safety ,health and welfare of the public and shall
strive to comply with the principles of sustainable development in the performance of
professional duties .The term sustainable development emphasizes on the investment
,orientation of technology ,development and functioning of organizations without denying
the present needs of people and ensuring for the future generations also to meet their needs.
Engineers, by virtue of their responsibility as professionals, are expected to follow
some ethical principles irrespective of whether there are legal obligations or not
1. Impact assessment on environment and human wealth: One of the major effect of
technology is the creation of wastage that results in pollution of land, water, air and even
space. Detailed study is necessary to assess the extent of negative impacts of implementing
new technology on environment and human health.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 16 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

2. Establish standards/acceptable level pollution: Study and to fix the tolerable and
actual pollution levels.In some cases such ashazardous pollutants the recommended
approach is to access the cost benefit in deciding the permissible level of pollution .But
CBA (Cost Benefit Analysis) should be based on maximizing human well-being. But in
some other cases cost is not relevant in fixing the level of pollution such as water pollution.
The resource Conservation and Recovery Act of USA requires that standards regulating
hazardouswaste be based solely on the protection of public health and the environment.
3.Countermeasures: Engineers should study on the available alternatives to
reduce/eliminate the bad effects of technology or the measures to protect from the bad
effects.
4.Environmnetalawareness:Many of the problems associated with technology and
engineering can be avoided /reduced by taking precautions .Proper steps to educate people
on the environmental issues ,practices and remedies can solve the problems effectively.
Organizationsshouldsupporttheactivitiesthatpromoteenvironment protection.
The environment ethics include −
 The study of moral issues concerning theenvironment
 Moral perspectives, beliefs and attitudes concerning thoseissues.
Ethical Guidelines to Work with Earth

Variousethicistsandphilosophersproposedthefollowingethicalguidelinestowo
rk with the earth (Miller1996).

Ecosphere andEcosystems

1. Weshouldnotdepleteordegradetheearth‘sphysical,chemicalorbiologicalcapita
l, which supports all life and all human economic activities.
2. We should try to understand and cooperate with rest of thenature.
3. We should work with rest of the nature to sustain the ecologicalintegrity,
biodiversity and adaptability of the earth‘s life support systems.
4. Whenwemustalternaturetomeetourneedsorwants,weshouldchoosemetho
ds that do the least possible harm to us and other livingthings.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 17 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

5. Beforewealternature,
weshouldcarryoutanEnvironmentalImpactAssessment to evaluate
proposed actions and discover how to inflict the minimum short – and
long-term environmentalharm.
Species and Cultures
1. Everyspecieshasarighttoliveoratleaststruggletolive.Simplybecauseitexists.
2. Weshouldworktopreserveasmuchoftheearth‘sgeneticvarietyaspossible
because it is the raw material for all future evolution.
3. We have the right to defend ourselves against individuals of species
that do us harm and to use individuals of species to meet our vital needs
but we should strive not to cause premature extinction of any wildspecies.
4. The best way to protect species and individuals of species is to protect
the ecosystem in which they live and to help restore those we
havedegraded.
5. No human culture should become extinct because of ouractions.
Individual Responsibility:
1. Weshouldnotinflictunnecessarysufferingorpainonanyanimalweraiseorhu
nt for food or use for scientific or otherpurposes.
2. We should use no more of the earth‘s resources than we need and not
wastesuchresources.
3. We should leave the earth as good as—or better—than we foundit.
4. We should work with the earth to help heal ecological wounds we
haveinflicted.

Explain human centered Environmental ethics with

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 18 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

nature centered ethics?(8)
Conclude the features of Ecocentric & Biocentric ethics.
(6)
TWO WORLD VIEWS ON ENVIRONMENTAL ETHICS

(a) Anthropocentric Worldview:

This view is guiding most industrial societies. It puts human beings in the
center giving them the highest status. Man is considered to be most
capable for managing the planet earth.
The guiding principles of this view are:
1. Man is the planet‘s most important species and is in the in- charge of
the rest of thenature.
2. Earth has an unlimited supply of resources and it all belongs tous.
3. Economic growth is very good and more the growth, the better it is,
because it raises our quality of life and the potential for economic growth
isunlimited.
4. A healthy environment depends upon a healthyeconomy.
5. The success of mankind depends upon how good managers we are for
deriving benefits for us fromnature.
(b) Eco-centricWorldview:
This is based on earth-wisdom. The basic beliefs are as follows:
1. Nature exists not for human beings alone, but for all thespecies.
2. The earth resources are limited and they do not belong only to humanbeings.
3. Economic growth is good till it encourages earth-sustaining
development and discourages earth-degradingdevelopment.
4. A healthy economy depends upon a healthyenvironment.
5. Thesuccessofmankinddependsuponhowbestwecancooperatewiththerest
of the nature while trying to use the resources of nature for ourbenefit.

Explain the major environmental issues faced by the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 19 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

world? (14)

ENVIRONMENTAL ISSUES

• 1. ACID RAIN: In most of the countries across the world, acid rain has
become the serious environmental problem due to intensive advancements in
industrializations. The continuous burning of fossil fuels such as petroleum
products (automobile exhaust) are identified as the maximum contributors as
the causative agents for acid rain. The above-said factors continuously release
abundant concentrations of nitrogen and sulphur oxides (NO2 and SO2) into the
atmosphere. These oxides react with moisture to form sulphuric acid and nitric
acid (HNO3 and H2SO4). These acids, when descending down to earth along
with rain water, produce corrosive reactions on animals, green plants and all
dwelling buildings.
2. PRESENCE OF ASBESTOS IN ATMOSPHERIC AIR AND DRINKING
WATER: In 1955, an ore processing mining company commenced its huge plant
to produce an iron ore called taconite at Silver Bay, Minnesota, USA. The nearby,
Lake Superior was heavily polluted with taconite contamination, due to the
continuous discharge of the effluent from the plant. The taconite contamination
eventually led to the drastic depletion of O2 in that aquatic system and had further
resulted in the massive killing of fishes. Moreover, asbestos-like fibers were found
to have heavily infiltrated into the drinking-water supplies from Lake Superior,
thus causing serious water contamination. The Federal government of Minnesota
State filed legal dispute in the court of law and the Reserves taconite plant was
finally directed to shift over to another disposed land site.
3. PLASTIC WASTE DISPOSAL:In our country, several crores of plastic bottles
are used as containers for water and oil, and plastic bags are used to pack different
materials ranging from vegetables to gold ornaments. Hardly any of these are
recycled. They end up in gutters, roadsides, and agricultural fields. In all these
destinations, they created havoc. The worse still is the burning of plastic materials
in streets and camphor along with plastic cover in temples, since they release toxic

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 20 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

fumes and threaten seriously the air quality. Cities and local administration have to
act on this, collect and arrange for recycling through industries.
• 4.e-WASTE DISPOSAL: The parts of computers and electronic devices
which have served its useful life present a major environmental issue for all the
developing countries including India. This scrap contains highly toxic elements
such as lead, cadmium, and mercury. Even the radioactive waste will lose 89% of
its toxicity after 200 years, by which time it will be no more toxic than some
natural minerals in the ground. It will lose 99% of its remaining toxicity over the
next 30,000 years. The toxic chemical agents such as mercury, arsenic, and
cadmium retain toxicity undiminished for ever. But these scraps are illegally
imported by unscrupulous agencies to salvage some commercially valuable
inputs. Instead of spending and managing on the scrap, unethical organizations
sell them to countries such as India. This is strictly in violation of the Basel
Convention of the United Nations Environment Program, which has banned the
movement of hazardous waste.
• A recent report of the British Environment Agency, has revealed that the
discarded computers, television sets, refrigerators, mobile phones, and
electrical equipments have been dispatched to India and Pakistan in large
quantity, for ultimate disposal in environmentally-unacceptable ways and at
great risk to the health of the labour. Even in the West, the electronic junk has
been posing problems.
• Strong regulation including
• (a)pressure on industries to set up disassembling facilities,
• (b) ban on disposal in landfill sites,
• (c) legislation for recycling requirements for these junk and
• (d) policy incentives for eco-friendly design are essential for our country. The
European Union through the Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment
(WEEE) directive has curbed the e-waste dumping by member countries and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 21 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

require manufacturers to implement methods to recover and recycle the
components.
• 5.INDUSTRIAL WASTE DISPOSAL:There has been a lot of complaints
through the media, on
• (a) against the Sterlite Copper Smelting Plant in Thuthukkudi (1997) against
its pollution, and
• (b) when Indian companies imported the discarded French Warship
Clemenceau for disposal, the poisonous asbestos compounds were expected to
pollute the atmosphere besides exposing the labour to a great risk, during the
disposal. The government did not act immediately. Fortunately for Indians, the
French Government intervened and withdrew the ship, and the serious threat
was averted.
• 6.GLOBAL WARMING:Over the past 30 years, the Earth has warmed by 0.6
°C. Over the last 100 years, it has warmed by 0.8 °C. It is likely to push up
temperature by 3° C by 2100, according to NASA‘s studies. The U.S.
administration has accepted the reality of global climate change, which has
been associated with stronger hurricanes, severe droughts, intense heat waves
and the melting of polar ice. Greenhouse gases, notably carbon dioxide emitted
by motor vehicles and coal-fired power plants, trap heat like the glass walls of
a greenhouse, cause the Earth to warm up. Delegates from the six countries —
Australia, China, India, Japan, South Korea and US met in California in April
2006 for the first working session of the Asia- Pacific Partnership on Clean
Development and Climate. These six countries account for about half of the
world‘s emissions of climate-heating greenhouse gases.
• Only one of the six, Japan, is committed to reducing greenhouse gas emissions
by at least 5.2 per cent below 1990 levels by 2012 under the Kyoto Agreement.
About 190 nations met in Germany in the middle of May 2006 and tried to
bridge vast policy gaps between the United States and its main allies over how
to combat climate change amid growing evidence that the world is warming

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 22 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

that could wreak havoc by stoking more droughts, heat waves, floods, more
powerful storms and raise global sea levels by almost a meter by 2100.
• 7.DEPLETION OF OZONE LAYER: The ozone layer protects the entire
planet from the ill-effects of ultraviolet radiation and is vital for all living
organisms in this world. But it is eaten away by the Chloro-fluro-carbons
(CFC) such as Freon emanating from the refrigerators, air conditioners, and
aerosol can spray. This has caused also skin cancer to sun-bathers in the
Western countries. Further NO and NO2 gases were also found to react with
the ozone. Apart from engineers, the organizations, laws of the country and
local administration and market mechanisms are required to take up concerted
efforts to protect the environment.
What is Business Ethics. (3)

BUSINESS ETHICS

• The term  ̳Business Ethics‘ refers to the system of moral principles and rules of
the conduct applied to business. Business being a social organ shall not be
conducted in a way detrimental to the interests of the society and the business
sector itself. Every profession or group frames certain do‘s and do not‘s for its
members. The members are given a standard in which they are supposed to
operate. These standards are influenced by the prevailing economic and social
situations. The codes of conduct are periodically reviewed to suit the changing
circumstances.

DEFINITIONS: BUSINESS ETHICS

• Business Ethics is generally coming to know what is right or wrong in the work
place and doing what is right. This is in regard to effects of products/services
and in relationship with the stake holders.‖ —Cater Mcnamara
• ―Business ethics in short can be defined as the systematic study of ethical
matters pertaining to the business, industry or related activities, institutions and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 23 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

beliefs. Business ethics is the systematic handling of values in business and
industry.‖ — John Donaldson
• There is no unanimity of opinion as to what constitutes business ethics. There
are no separate ethics of business but every individual and organ in society
should abide by certain moral orders.
• Business ethics should take into consideration the following factors:
• A business should aim to have fair dealing with everyone dealing with it.
• Ethics should be fixed for everyone working in the organisation at any level
and their implementation should be linked with reward- punishment system.
• Any violation of ethics should be detected at the earliest and remedial measures
taken immediately.
• Business ethics should be based on broad guidelines of what should be done
and what should be avoided.
• The ethics should be based on the perception of what is right.
What are the sources of business ethics? (6)
SOURCES OF BUSINESS ETHICS

• In every society there are three sources of business ethics-Religion, Culture and
Law. The HR manager in every organisation, thus, has to be well versed with
the unique system of values developed by these three sources.
• These sources are discussed as follows:
• 1. Religion: Religion is the oldest source of Religion is the oldest source of
ethical inspiration. There are more than ethical inspirations. 1, 00,000 religions
which exist across the whole world, but all of them are in agreement on the
fundamental principles. Every religion gives an expression of what is wrong
and right in business and other walks of life. The Principle of reciprocity
towards one‘s fellow beings is found in all the religions.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 24 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• Great religions preach the necessity for an orderly social system and emphasize
upon social responsibility with an objective to contribute to the general welfare.
With these fundamentals, every religion creates its own code of conduct.
2.Culture:Culture is the set of important understandings that members of a
community share in common. It consists of a basic set of values, ideas, perceptions,
preferences, concept of morality, code of conduct etc. which creates distinctiveness
among human groups. When we talk about culture we typically refer to the pattern of
development reflected in a society‘s pattern of knowledge, ideology, values, laws,
social norms and day to day rituals. Depending upon the pattern and stage of
development, culture differs from society to society. Moreover culture is passed from
generation to generation. Culture facilitates the generation of commitment to
something larger than one‘s individual self-interest.
• Culture encourages the members of the organisation to give priority to
organizational goals over and above their personal interests. Culture also serves
as a sense making and control mechanism that guides and shapes the attitudes
and behaviour of people. Managers have to run an industrial enterprise on the
cutting edge of cultural experience. The tension that their actions create makes
the business ethically more complex.
• 3.Law: The legal system of any country, guide the human behaviour in the
society. Whatever, ethics the law defines are binding on the society? The
society expects the business to abide by the law. Although it is expected that
every business should be law abiding, seldom do the businesses adhere to the
rules and regulations. Law breaking in business is common eg. Tax evasion,
hoarding, adulteration, poor quality & high priced products, environment
pollution etc.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 25 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
State the importance of business ethics. (7)
IMPORTANCE OF BUSINESS ETHICS

• 1.Corresponds to Basic Human Needs: The basic need of every human being
is that they want to be a part of the organisation which they can respect and be
proud of, because they perceive it to be ethical. Everybody likes to be
associated with an organisation which the society respects as a honest and
socially responsible organisation. The HR managers have to fulfill this basic
need of the employees as well as their own basic need that they want to direct
an ethical organisation. The basic needs of the employees as well as the
managers compel the organizations to be ethically oriented.
• 2.Credibility in the Public: Ethical values of an organisation create credibility
in the public eye. People will like to buy the product of a company if they
believe that the company is honest and is offering value for money. The public
issues of such companies are bound to be a success. Because of this reason
only the cola companies are spending huge sums of money on the
advertisements now-a-days to convince the public that their products are safe
and free from pesticides of any kind.
• 3.Credibility with the Employees: When employees are convinced of the
ethical values of the organisation they are working for, they hold the
organisation in high esteem. It creates common goals, values and language. The
HR manager will have credibility with the employees just because the
organisation has creditability in the eyes of the public. Perceived social
uprightness and moral values can win the employees more than any other
incentive plans.
• 4.Better Decision Making:Respect for ethics will force a management to take
various economic, social and ethical aspects into consideration while taking the
decisions. Decision making will be better if the decisions are in the interest of
the public, employees and company‘s own long term good.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 26 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• 5.Profitability:Being ethical does not mean not making any profits. Every
organisation has a responsibility towards itself also i.e., to earn profits. Ethical
companies are bound to be successful and more profitable in the long run
though in the short run they can lose money.
• 6. Protection of Society: Ethics can protect the society in a better way than
even the legal system of the country. Where law fails, ethics always succeed.
The government cannot regulate all the activities that are harmful to the
society. A HR manager, who is ethically sound, can reach out to agitated
employees, more effectively than the police.
Describe the characteristics of business ethics?(7)

CHARACTERISTICS OF BUSINESS ETHICS
• To understand business ethics, it is necessary to know it‘s important
characteristics. These are:
• 1.A Discipline: Business ethics are the guiding principles of business function.
It is the knowledge through which human behaviour is learnt in a business
situation.
• 2.Ancient Concept: Business ethics is an ancient concept. It has it origin with
the development of human civilization.
• 3.PersonalDignity:The principles of ethics develop the personal dignity. Many
of the problems of ethics arise due to not giving dignity to individual. All the
business decisions should be aimed by giving dignity to the customers,
employees, distributors, shareholders and creditors, etc. otherwise they develop
in immorality in the business conducts.
• 4.Related to Human Aspect:Business ethics studies those activities, decisions
and behaviors which are concerned with human aspect. It is the function of the
business ethics to notify those decisions to customers, owners of business,

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 27 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

government, society, competitors and others on good or bad, proper or
improper conduct of business.
• 5.Study of Goals and Means: Business ethics is the study of goals and means
for the rational selection of sacred objects and their fulfillment. It accepts the
principles of ―Pure goals inspire for pure means‖ and ―Means justifies the end‖.
It is essential that goals and means should be based on morals.
• 6.Different from Social Responsibility: Social responsibility mainly relates
to the policies and functions of an enterprise, whereas business ethics to the
conduct and behaviour of businessmen. But it is a fact that social responsibility
of business and its policies is influenced by the business ethics.
• 7.Greater than Law: Although the law approves various social decisions, but
the law is not greater than ethics. Law is usually related to the minimum
control of social customs whereas ethics gives importance to individual and
social welfare actions.
Define Computer Ethics.(3)

COMPUTER ETHICS

• The advent of computer and its vast applications are the fantastic outcome of
the scientific and technological advancements. The unmeasurable utility value
of the computers, have made a dramatic impact on business activities
throughout the world. Computers have become the most essential operative
tools in all the modern spheres of life such as engineering systems, scientific
research studies, business and marketing activities. It is unfortunate to state that
computer applications are wrongly exploited and misused for various
unethical purposes thereby creating serious law and order implications in the
human societies across the world. The unlawful and defrauding uses of
computer applications constitute fundamental basis for the creation of true
awareness on computer ethics.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 28 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• The term computer ethics refers to a specialized branch of engineering ethics
to be adopted by the computer professionals and engineers to prevent the
misuse and abuse of computer applications thereby maintaining secrecy and
the moral confidence of the users. Computer ethics is defined as
• (a) study and analysis of nature and social impact of computer technology,
• (b) formulation and justification of policies, for ethical use of computers. This
subject has become relevant to the professionals such as designers of
computers, programmers, system analysts, system managers, and operators.
• The use of computers have raised a host of moral concerns such as free speech,
privacy, intellectual property right, and physical as well as mental harm. There
appears to be no conceptual framework available on ethics, to study and
understand and resolve the problems in computer technology.Computers with
Internet raise a host of difficult moral issues, many of them connected with
basic moral concerns such as free speech, privacy, respect for property,
informed consent and harm. To evaluate and deal with these issues, a new area
of applied ethics called Computer Ethics has come up. These ethics are related
to all the computer professionals such as programmers, analysts, operators,
designers, etc. along with the users.
Explain the major types of issues in computer ethics?(7)
Discuss in detail about moral & ethical issues involved in
the use of computers and internet with examples? (14)

TYPES OF ISSUES

• 1. Computer as the Instrument of Unethical Acts:(a) The usage of computer
replaces the job positions. This has been overcome to a large extent by
readjusting work assignments, and training everyone on computer applications
such as word processing, editing, and graphics.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 29 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• (b) Breaking privacy. Information or data of the individuals accessed or erased
or the ownership changed.
• (c) Defraud a bank or a client, by accessing and withdrawing money from
other‘s bank account.
• 2. Computer as the Object of Unethical Act:The data are accessed and
deleted or changed.
• a) Hacking: The software is stolen or information is accessed from other
computers. This may cause financial loss to the business or violation of privacy
rights of the individuals or business. In case of defense information being
hacked, this may endanger the security of the nation.
• (b) Spreading virus: Through mail or otherwise, other computers are accessed
and the files are erased or contents changed altogether.  ̳Trojan horses‘ are
implanted to distort the messages and files beyond recovery. This again causes
financial loss or mental torture to the individuals. Some hackers feel that they
have justified their right of free information or they do it for fun. However,
these acts are certainly unethical.
• (c)Health hazard: The computers pose threat during their use as well as during
disposal.
• 3. Problems Related to the Autonomous Nature of Computer :(a) Security
risk:Recently the Tokyo Stock Exchange faced a major embarrassment. A
seemingly casual mistake by a junior trader of a large security house led to
huge losses including that of reputation. The order through the exchange‘s
trading system was to sell one share for 600,000 Yen. Instead the trader keyed
in a sale order for 600,000 shares at the rate of one Yen each. Naturally the
shares on offer at the ridiculously low price were lapped up. And only a few
buyers agreed to reverse the deal! The loss to the securities firm was said to be
huge, running into several hundred thousands. More important to note, such an
obvious mistake could not be corrected by some of the advanced technology

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 30 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

available. For advanced countries like Japan who have imbibed the latest
technology, this would be a new kind of learning experience.
• b) Loss of human lives: Risk and loss of human lives lost by computer, in the
operational control of military weapons. There is a dangerous instability in
automated defense system. An unexpected error in the software or hardware or
a conflict during interfacing between the two, may trigger a serious attack and
cause irreparable human loss before the error is traced. The Chinese embassy
was bombed by U.S. military in Iraq a few years back, but enquiries revealed
that the building was shown in a previous map as the building where insurgents
stayed.
• (c) In flexible manufacturing systems, the autonomous computer is beneficial
in obtaining continuous monitoring and automatic control.
COMPUTERS IN WORKPLACE
The ethical problems initiated by computers in the workplace are:
• 1. Elimination of routine and manual jobs: This leads to unemployment, but
the creation of skilled and IT-enabled service jobs are more advantageous for
the people. Initially this may require some up gradation of their skills and
knowledge, but a formal training will set this problem right. For example, in
place of a typist, we have a programmer or an accountant.
• 2. Health and safety:The ill-effects due to electromagnetic radiation, especially
on women and pregnant employees, mental stress, wrist problem known as
Carpel Tunnel Syndrome, and back pain due to poor ergonomic seating
designs, and eye strain due to poor lighting and flickers in the display and long
exposure, have been reported worldwide. Over a period of long exposure, these
are expected to affect the health and safety of the people. The computer
designers should take care of these aspects and management should monitor the
health and safety of the computer personnel.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 31 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• 3. Computer failure:Failure in computers may be due to errors in the
hardware or software. Hardware errors are rare and they can be solved easily
and quickly. But software errors are very serious as they can stop the entire
network. Testing and quality systems for software have gained relevance and
importance in the recent past, to avoid or minimize these errors.

PROPERTY ISSUES
• The property issues concerned with the computers are:
• 1. Computers have been used to extort money through anonymous telephone
calls.
• 2. Computers are used to cheat and steal by current as well as previous
employees.
• 3. Cheating of and stealing from the customers and clients.
• 4. Violation of contracts on computer sales and services.
• 5. Conspiracy as a group, especially with the internet, to defraud the gullible,
stealing the identity and to forge documents.
• 6. Violation of property rights:Is the software a property? The software could
be either a Program (an algorithm, indicating the steps in solving a problem) or
a Source code (the algorithm in a general computer language such as
FORTAN, C and COBOL or an Object code (to translate the source code into
the machine language). How do we apply the concept of property here? This
demands a framework for ethical judgments.
• Property is what the laws permits and defines as can be owned, exchanged, and
used. The computer hardware (product) is protected by patents. The software
(idea, expression) is protected by copyrights and trade secrets. But algorithms
cannot be copyrighted, because the mathematical formulas can be discovered
but not owned. The object codes which are not intelligible to human beings
cannot be copyrighted. Thus, we see that reproducing multiple copies from one

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 32 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

copy of (licensed) software and distribution or sales are crimes. The open
source concepts have, to a great extent, liberalized and promoted the use of
computer programs for the betterment of society.
Describe the ethical features involved in computer crime?
(7)

COMPUTER CRIME

• The ethical features involved in computer crime are as follows:
• Physical Security: The computers are to be protected against theft, fire, and
physical damage. This can be achieved by proper insurance on the assets.
• 2. Logical security: The aspects related are
• (a) the privacy of the individuals or organizations,
• (b) confidentiality,
• (c)integrity, to ensure that the modification of data or program are done only by
the authorized persons,
• (d) uninterrupted service. This is achieved by installing appropriate
uninterrupted power supply or back-up provisions.
• (e) protection against hacking that causes dislocation or distortion. Licensed
anti-virus packages and firewalls are used by all computer users to ensure this
protection.
• Passwords and data encryption have been incorporated in the computer

software as security measures. But these have also been attacked and bye-
passed. But this problem is not been solved completely.

Major weaknesses in this direction are:
• (a) the difficulty in tracing the evidence involved and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 33 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• (b)absence of stringent punishment against the crime. The origin of a threat to
the Central Government posted from an obscure browsing center, remained
unsolved for quite a long time. Many times, such crimes have been traced, but
there are no clear cyber laws to punish and deter the criminals.
PROFESSIONAL RESPONSIBILITY

• The computer professionals should be aware of different conflicts of interests
as they transact with other at different levels. The IEEE and Association for
Computing Machinery (ACM) have established the codes of ethics to manage
such responsibilities.

COMPUTER ETHICAL CODES

• The ten commandments of Computer Ethics, created in 1992 by the Computer
Ethics Institute consists of the following −
One should never use a computer:

• To harm the people (anti-social activities)
• To interfere with other’s work (illegal manipulations)
• To snoop into other’s files (malware)
• To steal a computer/data (hacking)
• To bear false witness (manipulation and morphing)
• To use/ copy a software you didn’t pay for (like illegal
downloads and
• usages)
• To use or copy other’s software without compensations
(illegal pirated
• versions)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 34 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
• To use other’s intellectual output inappropriately (violating
IPR)
• Doing without thinking of social consequences of the program
being written (libeling)
• Always use a computer ensuring consideration and respect
towards fellow beings.

• An engineer who is responsible in developing a tool program is not entitled
to take that program, when he or she goes for a new job, without the direct
concurrence of the first employer.Computer system analysts must have the
moral commitment and accountability, when their programs develop errors
thereby affecting the safety and basic rights of the people.The engineers
working as project leaders should be obliged to have the necessary
corrections in the programs that might cause any injustice or property
damage to the customer or consumer.However, these ethics are facing lax in
today‘s world. A very small section of concerned individuals seems to be
following these ethics. A large section seems to be violating these ethics.
With this, there is an unprecedented increase in cybercrime.
Explain the role of computers in technological
development? (7)
ROLE OF COMPUTERS IN TECHNOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT
 In this section, we will discuss the role of Computers in Technological
Development. The limitations of Internet usage and free speech are to be
known clearly by every netizen. In this digital era, the morals expected from a
human being are the basic tools that control the unethical and sleazy manner of
handling the internet.Internet which is now a global network of networks,
initially used the infrastructure of the telephone system and is now being
handled by many telecommunication systems by wire, fiber or wireless
systems.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 35 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

 The Internet provides a spring of new ways to be in contact with other people
and with sources of information. It has also created greater convenience in
ordering consumer items, paying bills and social experiments trading stocks
and bonds. Like other major, it also has raised a host of new issues. One set of
issues centers on free speech, including control of obscene forms of
pornography, hate speech, spam which is unwanted commercial speech and
rebel. Computers contribute to greater centralization or decentralization insofar
as human decision makers direct them.
 There come issues which call for trouble wherein, computers are used in
embezzlement and other forms of stealing money or financial assets. The issues
concerning theft of software and information is again a similar one. The
computers are centrally involved when an unauthorized person uses a telephone
computer system to obtain private phone numbers or when maliciously alters or
scrambles the programming of a telephone computer. In today‘s world,
malicious people have come up with not one but various ways of exploiting
money, goods, services, assets, etc. through the computers and internet. The
Internet besides easing our work has also paved way to gather an individual‘s
confidential details easily.
 The two main factors that make computers troublesome are their speed and
geographical coverage, which allows the masses to be victimized further. The
difficulty lies in tracing the underlying transactions to apprehend the thieves.
This problem is compounded when the communication lines linking the
computers involved cross national boundaries.
 The most commonly discussed cases of computer abuse are instances such as
• The stealing or cheating by employees at work.
• The stealing by non-employees or former employees.
• The stealing from or cheating clients and consumers.
• The violation of contracts for computers sales or services.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 36 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• The many conspiracies to use computer networks to engage in
widespread fraud.

 Alarmingly, the Internet has led to an explosion of identity theft, in which
personal information is obtained and used to forge documents and commit
fraud.
Examine the privacy & anonymity related issues with
computer? (7)

PRIVACY & ANONYMITY

The data transmission and accessibility have improved tremendously by using
the computers, but the right to privacy has been threatened to a great extent.
Some issues concerned with the privacy are listed hereunder:
• 1. Records of Evidence: Service records or criminal records and the details of
people can be stored and accessed to prove the innocence or guilty. Records on
psychiatric treatment by medical practitioners or hospital, or records of
membership of organizations may sometime embarrass the persons in later
years.
• 2.Hacking:There are computer enthusiasts who wilfully or for fun, plant virus
or ―Trojan horses‖ that may fill the disc space, falsify information, erase files,
and even harm the hardware. They breakdown the functioning of computers
and can be treated as violation of property rights. Some hackers opine that the
information should be freely available for everybody. It is prudent that the right
to individual privacy in limiting the access to the information on oneself,
should not be violated. Further any unauthorized use of personal information
(which is a property), is to be considered as theft. Besides the individual
privacy, the national security, and freedom within the economy are to be
respected. The proprietary information and data of the organizations are to be
protected so that they can pursue the goals without hindrance.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 37 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• 3.Legal Response:In the Indian scene, the Right to Information Act 2005
provides the right to the citizens to secure access to information under the
control of public authorities, including the departments of the central
government, state governments, government bodies, public sector companies
and public sector banks, to promote transparency and accountability of public
authorities.
• 4. Anonymity: Anonymity in the computer communication has some merits as
well as demerits. While seeking medical or psychological counselling or
discussion (chat) on topics, such as AIDS, abortion, gay rights, the anonymity
offers protection (against revealing their identity). But frequently, anonymity is
misused by some people for money laundering, drug trafficking and preying
upon the vulnerable.
Examine the role of engineers as managers.(8)
ENGINEERS AS MANAGERS

• Engineers possess the inherent ability to provide proper leadership in guiding
the organizations and corporates for the achievement of successful prospects.
During their academic curriculum, the engineering graduates are moulded to
develop prospective responsibilities and career managements which are the
essential requirements to become efficient managers and administrators. They
are also imparted with orientation skills to cope with any abnormal situations in
their careers.
• An engineer, whether he works individually or works for a company, has to go
through some ethical issues, mostly under conditions such as, conceptualization
of a product, issues arising in design and testing departments, or may be on the
issues involving the manufacturing, sales and services. An Engineer is
responsible in promoting ethics in an organization, through framing
organizational policies, responsibilities and by personal attitudes and
obligations.Suppose, an issue occurs which might lead to a conflict, an

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 38 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

engineer or say a professional should respond pertaining to specific morals and
professional ethics.
• An engineer should be able to work as a manager in such situations, resolving
conflicts according to priorities, keeping the organizational benefits in mind.
The issue must be resolved without hurting anyone‘s feelings and by
developing a mutual understanding with subtlety. Not only the engineers who
act as managers or the managers alone will share the responsibility, but there
lies some social responsibility to stakeholders, customers and employers of a
company. They act to develop wealth as well as the welfare of the society.
• Ethicists project the view that the manager‘s responsibility is only to increase
the profit of the organization, and only the engineers have the responsibility to
protect the safety, health, and welfare of the public. But the manager, though an
engineer or not, has the ethical responsibility to produce safe and good
products (or useful service), while showing respect for fellow human beings
including his employees, customers and the public. Hence, the objective for the
managers and engineers is to produce valuable products that are also profitable.
The characteristics of engineers as managers are:
• 1. Promote an ethical climate, through framing organization policies,
responsibilities and by personal attitudes and obligations.
• 2. Resolving conflicts, by evolving priority, developing mutual understanding,
generating various alternative solutions to problems.
• 3. Social responsibility to stakeholders, customers and employers. They act to
develop wealth as well as the welfare of the society. Ethicists project the view
that the manager‘s responsibility is only to increase the profit of the
organization, and only the engineers have the responsibility to protect the
safety, health, and welfare of the public. But managers have the ethical
responsibility to produce safe and good products (or useful service), while
showing respect for the human beings who include the employees, customers

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 39 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

and the public. Hence, the objective for the managers and engineers is to
produce valuable products that are also profitable.
• Engineers possess the technological skills and professional excellence by
which they transform themselves into sensitive area of managing the corporate
companies. Moreover, several local and multinational companies are quite
aware of the potential capabilities of engineers, whom they believe would
quickly understand the business techniques of any corporate body, than the
non-engineering graduates and their competent qualities in the finding of
suitable remedies for problems. Interestingly, graduate engineers become
convinced by the attractive offers of incentives and higher emoluments and
prestigious placement positions made by corporate companies.
Define Managing conflicts.(3)

MANAGING CONFLICTS

• It is the common feature that several corporate companies face crucial
problems with respect to the settlement of conflicts. These management
disputes and conflicts should be amicably settled and resolved by the
intervention of company managers who have been endowed with the
administrative skills and tactful decisions. Sometimes, managers should
exercise their commanding positions with enough force for the smooth
settlement of claims and conflicts.A conflict is a result of differences in
opinions. Conflicts generally arise where the work is shared among more than
one members. In fact, the situations of conflicts should be tolerated with
patience, understood impartially and resolved by the participation by all the
concerned.
When a project is distributed among a few members, the conflicts that
generally occur are :
• The schedule based conflicts might occur at different levels of execution of a
project, depending upon the priorities and limitations at each level.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 40 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• The prioritizing of projects or departments which can be arrived from end
requirements may change from time to time.
• The deficiency of personnel availability for certain project completion in due
time may also lead to a conflict.
• Conflicts that occur over technical, economic, and time factors such as cost,
time, and performance level.
• Conflict arising in administration such as
authority,responsibility, accountability, and logistics required.
• Conflicts of personality, human psychology and ego problems.
• Conflict over expenditure and its deviations.
• Picking out on the personnel creating may keep others away from the problem
and doesn‘t affect everyone. Such personnel can be trained again or given
precautions.
• The interest of the personnel doing a project should be focused on the ethical
attitudes and morals but not on their positions. In addition, the conflicts
between the personnel, can be solved by the manager who has more ways to
solve it. The evaluation of the results should be based on certain specified
objectives such as efficiency, quality, and customer satisfaction.
MOST OF THE CONFLICTS CAN BE RESOLVED BY FOLLOWING
THE PRINCIPLES LISTED HERE:
• 1.People: Separate people from the problem. It implies that the views of all
concerned should be obtained. The questions such as what, why, and when the
error was committed is more important than to know who committed it.
• 2. Interests: Focus must be only on interest i.e., the ethical attitudes or motives
and not on the positions (i.e., stated views). A supplier may require commission
larger than usual prevailing rate for an agricultural product. But the past

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 41 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

analysis may tell us that the material is not cultivated regularly and the
monsoon poses some additional risk towards the supply. Mutual interests must
be respected to a maximum level. What is right is more important than who is
right!
• 3. Options: Generate various options as solutions to the problem so that there
is no time lag in decision making. This helps a manager to try the next best
solution should the first one fails.
• 4. Evaluation:The evaluation of the results should be based on some specified
objectives such as efficiency, quality, and customer satisfaction. More
important is that the means, not only the goals, should be ethical.
Discuss a) Consulting engineers. (6)

CONSULTING ENGINEERS

• The consulting engineers work in private. There is no salary from the
employers. But they charge fees from the sponsor and they have more freedom
to decide on their projects. Still they have no absolute freedom, because they
need to earn for their living.The consulting engineers differ from the salaried
engineers of an organization. These consulting engineers work in private and
are paid per advice they offer or for the service they provide in a field of
specialized knowledge or training. Consultants are individuals who typically
work for themselves but may also be associated with a consulting firm.
• Consultants can play a multi-faceted role; for example, they function as
advisors, fixers, bosses, generalists, stabilizers, listeners, advisors, specialists,
catalysts, managers or quasi-employees. Bringing in an expert can save time,
effort and money. It has been estimated that approximately 3/4 of all
companies call upon consultants at one time or another. Many companies claim
that they receive a higher return for their invested dollars by using consultants
for specific tasks.A Consulting Engineer should maintain the ethical values in
the profession, such as giving proper information without any ambiguities for

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 42 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

advertisements, the allowance of small individual companies to participate in
bidding and also maintaining clarity in the contingency fee which is previously
agreed. The greater amount of job freedom enjoyed by consulting engineers as
opposed to salaried engineers leads to wider areas of responsible decision
making concerning safety.
THE CONSULTING ENGINEERS HAVE ETHICAL
RESPONSIBILITIES DIFFERENT FROM THE SALARIED
ENGINEERS, AS FOLLOWS:
• 1. ADVERTISING: The consulting engineers are directly responsible for
advertising their services, even if they employ other consultants to assist them.
But in many organisations, this responsibility is with the advertising executives
and the personnel department. They are allowed to advertise but to avoid
deceptive ones. Deceptive advertising such as the following are prohibited:
• (a) By white lies.
• (b) Half-truth, e.g., a product has actually been tested as prototype, but it was
claimed to have been already introduced in the market. An architect shows the
photograph of the completed building with flowering trees around but actually
the foundation of the building has been completed and there is no real garden.
• (c) Exaggerated claims: The consultant might have played a small role in a
well-known project. But they could claim to have played a major role.
• (d) Making false suggestions. The reduction in cost might have been achieved
along with the reduction in strength, but the strength details are hidden.
• (e) Through vague wordings or slogans.
• 2. Competitive Bidding: It means offering a price, and get something in return
for the service offered. The organizations have a pool of engineers. The
expertise can be shared and the bidding is made more realistic. But the
individual consultants have to develop creative designs and build their

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 43 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

reputation steadily and carefully, over a period of time. The clients will have to
choose between the reputed organizations and proven qualifications of the
company and the expertise of the consultants. Although competent, the younger
consultants are thus slightly at a disadvantage.
• 3. CONTINGENCY FEE:This is the fee or commission paid to the
consultant, when one is successful in saving the expenses for the client. A
sense of honesty and fairness is required in fixing this fee. The NSPE Code III
6 (a) says that the engineers shall not propose or accept a commission on a
contingent basis where their judgment may be compromised. The fee may be
either as an agreed amount or a fixed percentage of the savings realized. But in
the contingency fee-agreements, the judgment of the consultant may be biased.
The consultant may be tempted to specify inferior materials or design methods
to cut the construction cost. This fee may motivate the consultants to effect
saving in the costs to the clients, through reasonably moral and technological
means.
• 4. SAFETY AND CLIENT’S NEEDS:The greater freedom for the consulting
engineers in decision making on safety aspects, and difficulties concerning
truthfulness are the matters to be given attention. For example, in design-only
projects, the consulting engineers may design something and have no role in
the construction.

• Sometimes, difficulties may crop-up during construction due to non-
availability of suitable materials, some shortcuts in construction, and lack of

necessary and adequate supervision and inspection. Properly-trained
supervision is needed, but may not happen, unless it is provided. Further, the
contractor may not understand and/or be willing to modify the original design
to serve the clients best. A few on-site inspections by the consulting engineers
will expose the deficiency in execution and save the workers, the public, and
the environment that may be exposed to risk upon completion of the project.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 44 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

The NSPE codes on the advertisement by consultants provide some
specific regulations. The following are the activities prohibited in
advertisement by consultant:
• 1. The use of statement containing misrepresentation or omission of a
necessary fact.
• 2. Statement intended or likely to create an unjustified expectation.
• 3. Statement containing prediction of future (probable) success.
• 4. Statement intended or likely to attract clients, by the use of slogans or
sensational language format.
Discuss: Engineers as Expert Witnesses (6)
Discuss about role of engineers as expert witness. (7)
ENGINEERS AS EXPERT WITNESSES

• Frequently engineers are required to act as consultants and provide expert
opinion and views in many legal cases of the past events. They are required to
explain the causes of accidents, malfunctions and other technological behavior
of structures, machines, and instruments, e.g., personal injury while using an
instrument, defective product, traffic accident, structure or building collapse,
and damage to the property, are some of the cases where testimonies are
needed. The focus is on the past.
The engineers, who act as expert-witnesses, are likely to abuse their
positions in the following manners:
• 1.HiredGuns:Mostly lawyers hire engineers to serve the interest of their
clients. Lawyers are permitted and required to project the case in a way
favorable to their clients. But the engineers have obligations to thoroughly
examine the events and demonstrate their professional integrity to testify only
the truth in the court. They do not serve the clients of the lawyers directly. The

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 45 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

hired guns forward white lies and distortions, as demanded by the lawyers.
They even withhold the information or shade the fact, to favor their clients.
• 2.MoneyBias:Consultants may be influenced or prejudiced for monitory
considerations, gain reputation and make a fortune.
• 3.EgoBias:The assumption that the own side is innocent and the other side is
guilty, is responsible for this behavior. An inordinate desire to serve one‘s
client and get name and fame is another reason for this bias.
• 4.SympathyBias:Sympathy for the victim on the opposite side may upset the
testimony. The integrity of the consultants will keep these biases away from the
justice. The court also must obtain the balanced view of both sides, by
examining the expert witnesses of lawyers on both sides, to remove a probable
bias.

DUTIES

• 1.The expert-witness is required to exhibit the responsibility of confidentiality
just as they do in the consulting roles. They cannot divulge the findings of the
investigation to the opposite side, unless it is required by the court of law.
• 2.More important is that as witness they are not required to volunteer evidence
favorable to the opponent. They must answer questions truthfully, need not
elaborate, and remain neutral until the details are asked for further.
• 3.They should be objective to discover the truth and communicate them
honestly.
• 4.The stand of the experts depends on the shared understanding created within
the society. The legal system should be respected and at the same time, they
should act in conformance with the professional standards as obtained from the
code of ethics.
• 5.The experts should earnestly be impartial in identifying and interpreting the
observed data, recorded data, and the industrial standards. They should not

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 46 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

distort the truth, even under pressure. Although they are hired by the lawyers,
they do not serve the lawyers or their clients. They serve the justice. Many a
time, their objective judgments will help the lawyer to put up the best defense
for their clients.
• 6.Where expert evidence refers photographs ,plans, calculations, analyses
,measurements ,survey reports or other similar documents ,these must be
provided to the opposite party at the same time as the exchange of reports.
ENGINEERS AS ADVISORS IN PLANNING AND POLICY MAKING
• Public planning and policy-making are the two significant aspects that
promote technological advancements and achievements in all countries.
Several segments of our communities such as economists, sociologists,
engineers and other professionals are involved in both public planning and
policy-making. Engineers are associated with both of these processes which
directly depend upon the inputs of public funds. The merits and demerits of any
project such as transport, housing land reforms and energy sector, are to be
actively considered as the basic part of policy-making. In contrast, planning
requires technical information from qualified technologists about the risks and
advantages of a specific project.The engineers are required to give their view
on the future such as in planning, policy-making, which involves the
technology. For example, should India expand nuclear power options or
support traditional energy sources such as fossil fuels or alternative forms like
solar and wind energy? In the recent past, this topic has created lot of
fireworks, in the national media.
• Generally engineers with high experience and expertise act as advisors .An
engineer has freedom to accept an offer to provide advice on a project in which
he alone cannot asses the project wholly because the project has some areas out
of his knowledge .In such cases the advisor should engage another qualified
person to assess that part of the project and his contribution should be limited
to his expertise.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 47 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

Various issues and requirements for engineers who act as advisors are:
• 1.Objectivity: The engineers should study the cost and benefits of all possible
alternative means in objective manner, within the specified conditions and
assumptions.
• 2.Study All Aspects: They have to study the economic viability (effectiveness),
technical feasibility (efficiency), operational feasibility (skills) and social
acceptability, which include environmental and ethical aspects, before
formulating the policy.
• 3.Values:Engineers have to posses the qualities, such as (a) honesty, (b)
competence (skills and expertise), (c) diligence (careful and alert) (d) loyalty in
serving the interests of the clients and maintaining confidentiality, and (e)
public trust, and respect for the common good, rather than serving only the
interests of the clients or the political interests.
• 4.Technical Complexity: The arbitrary, unrealistic, and controversial
assumptions made during the future planning that are overlooked or not
verified, will lead to moral complexity. The study on future is full of
uncertainties than the investigations on the past events. On the study of energy
options, for example, assumptions on population increase, life style,
urbanization, availability of local fossil resources, projected costs of generating
alternative forms of energy, world political scenario, world military tensions
and pressures from world organizations such as World Trade Organization
(W.T.O.) and European Union (EU) may increase the complexity in judgment
on future.
• 5.NationalSecurity: The proposed options should be aimed to strengthen the
economy and security of the nation, besides safeguarding the natural resources
and the environment from exploitation and degradation.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 48 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

Explain the various played by engineers who work as
advisors? (7)
1. HiredGuns: This model highlights the client‘s wishes and acts accordingly.
All the other factors are given less priority. Assumptions about uncertainties
are inclined in a direction favorable to the client‘s case.
• 2.Value-Neutral Analysts:This model expresses the idea of being neutral and
the avoidance of any form of advocacy towards anyone. The cost-benefit
analyses if made, are to be done according to the value criteria, explicitly.
• 3.Value-Guided Advocates:This model advocates the idea that it is the
responsibility of engineers to keep the public good in mind and maintain
honesty about both technical facts and the values that guide their studies.
Define moral leadership. (3)
Justify the need for moral leadership in today’s business
environment. (3)

MORAL LEADERSHIP

 Engineers provide many types of leadership in the development and
implementation of technology, as managers, entrepreneurs, consultants,
academics and officials of the government. Moral leadership is not merely the
dominance by a group. It means adopting reasonable means to motivate the
groups to achieve morally desirable goals. This leadership presents the
engineers with many challenges to their moral principles. It has been an
interesting discussion that engineers take up several types of leadership similar
to other professionals such as corporate consultants, academicians and
government officials. Engineers are best suited to be 'efficient moral leaders'
to set an exemplary models both in their technical professions and community
societies.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 49 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

 Engineers, within their communities and professions contribute to
technological process, as managers, business entrepreneurs, corporate
consultants, academics and government officials they provide many forms of
leadership in developing and implementing technology. Leadership can be
understood as success in moving a group collectively, towards goals.Moral
leaders, are the individuals who direct, motivate, organize, creatively manage,
or in other ways move groups towards morally valuable goals. Leaders might
be in position of authority within a corporation, or they might not be.
Leadership can be shown by individuals participating at all levels of
organizations.

MORALLY CREATIVE LEADERS

• Moral leaders are morally creative. This does not mean that they discover or
improvise new moral values from scratch. Moral values are the product of
centuries and millennia of gradual development, not instantaneous invention.
Moral creativity consists in identifying the most important values that apply in
a particular situation, bringing them into focus through effective
communication within groups and forming workable commitments to
implement them.Moral creativity is achieving success through new ways of
thinking with standard moral values. This is achieved by identifying new
possibilities for applying, extending and putting values into practice rather than
inventing new values for temporary comforts. But, this requires fresh moral
insights with deeper commitments grounded in integrity.

PARTICIPATION IN PROFESSIONAL SOCIETIES

• Professional Societies do more than just promoting continuing education for
their members. They also serve to unify a profession, and to speak and act on
behalf of it. Professional societies provide a forum for communicating,
organizing and mobilizing change within and by large groups, which has a
moral dimension. After few incidents, many of the tensions existed in

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 50 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

professional societies are because of the uncertainties about their involvement
in moral issues.
• Effective professional activity whether in Engineering or any other profession,
requires a substantial degree of trust from clients and the public. Total absence
of such trust would undermine the possibility of making contracts, engaging in
cooperative work, exercising professional autonomy free of excessive
regulation and working under humane conditions. Building and sustaining that
trust is an important responsibility shared by all engineers. It is also an area
where moral leadership within professional societies is really important.

LEADERSHIP IN COMMUNITIES

• In communities and groups, the issues that bother and that are important should
be informed to everyone. But the stronger obligations arise for those who by
professional background are well grounded in specific issues as well as for
those who have time to train themselves as Public advocates. It shows that
there is certainly a need for moral leadership in identifying and expanding the
areas of possible good that can be achieved.

IDEALS OF VOLUNTARY SERVICE

• The need for moral leadership in Engineering, emphasizes the need for
involvement in professional societies and in community service. The leadership
should have substantial involvement in professional societies which, in addition
to furthering technical knowledge and representing engineers collectively, help
in establishing high standards of moral integrity within the profession. The
moral leadership should also have some involvement in community service.
Moral leadership does not consist of moral elitism and dominance, but instead
moral creativity in helping to guide, organize and stimulate groups toward
morally desirable goals.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 51 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

Moral leadership is essentially required for the Engineers, for the reasons
listed as follows:
• 1. It is leading a group of people towards the achievement of global and
objectives. The goals as well as the means are to be moral. For example, Hitler
and Stalin were leaders, but only in an instrumental sense and certainly not on
moral sense.
• 2. The leadership shall direct and motivate the group to move through morally
desirable ways.
• 3. They lead by thinking ahead in time, and morally creative towards new
applications, extension and putting values into practice.  ̳Morally creative‘
means the identification of the most important values as applicable to the
situation, bringing clarity within the groups through proper communication,
and putting those values into practice.

• 4. They sustain professional interest, among social diversity and cross-
disciplinary complexity. They contribute to the professional societies, their

professions, and to their communities. The moral leadership in engineering is
manifested in leadership within the professional societies. The professional
societies provide a forum for communication, and canvassing for change within
and by groups.
• 5. Voluntarism: Another important avenue for providing moral leadership
within communities, by the engineers is to promote services without fee or at
reduced fees (pro bono) to the needy groups. The professional societies can
also promote such activities among the engineers. This type of voluntarism (or
philanthropy) has been in practice in the fields of medicine, law and education.
But many of the engineers are not self-employed as in the case of physicians
and lawyers. The business institutions are encouraged to contribute a
percentage of their services as free or at concessional rates for charitable
purposes.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 52 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

• 6. Community service: This is another platform for the engineers to exhibit
their moral leadership. The engineers can help in guiding, organising, and
stimulating the community towards morally- and environmentally-desirable
goals. The corporate organizations have come forward to adopt villages and
execute many social welfare schemes, towards this objective.
Examine the importance of engineers as moral leaders. (7)
ROLE OF ENGINEERS AS MORAL LEADERS
• 1.They work for more goals: Engineers are applying their specialized
knowledge and skills to improve the technologies with a purpose of improving
the wellbeing of the people and society ,a morally motivated goal.
• 2.They choose morally desirable ways:Engineers lead the team members by
providing support and guidance in a creative manner and motivate them in their
job in morally desirable ways, adhering the ethical standards.
• 3.They add to moral creativity:Moral creativity refers to achieving success
through new ways of thinking with moral standards. Moral creativity consists
of identifying the most important values, bringing them into focus through
effective communication and bring clarity among the group members and
finally putting those values into practice.
• 4.Add to Professional Trust: Moral leadership of engineers within the
professional groups can bring trust towards their profession and professional
groups. Effective professional activity requires a good level of trust from the
clients and the public. Engineers as moral leaders can build and sustain a good
level of trust among the clients.
• 5. Philanthrophy and Community Development: Engineers as moral leaders
can contribute at large in voluntarily to develop the weaker sections of
population in areas like housing, sanitation, infrastructure development and
provide drinking water.They can also support communities in making
awareness about environment,pollution, bio diversity and such issues that

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 53 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

threatens human life and the entire eco system.In addition to this,many
voluntary organisations are adopting villages for improving the basic needs of
rural people as a part of their social responsibility.
SAMPLE CODE OF CONDUCT

Name any three professional societies and their role relevant
to engineers. (3)
• The professional societies for engineers have formulated few codes of ethics
which are expected to be followed by an engineer of the particular discipline.
Following are a few societies that look into the discipline in Engineering −
• NSPE − National Society of Professional Engineers
• IEEE − The Institute of Electrical and Electronics engineering
• AIChE− American Institute of Chemical Engineers
• ASCE − American Society of Civil Engineers
• ASME − American Society of Mechanical Engineers
• ACM/IEEE/CS − Joint Task Force on Software Engineering Ethics and
Professional Practices.

• All these societies have proposed different codes of ethics expecting adherence
from the Engineers, to the highest standard of ethical conduct. This not only
helps the societies but also the Engineers.The NSPE (National Society of
Professional Engineers) has formulated codes as engineering has a direct and
vital impact on the quality of life for all the people. Accordingly, the services
provided by engineers require honesty, impartiality, fairness and equity and
must be dedicated to the protection of the public health, safety and welfare.
The fundamental things to be kept in mind, while engineers fulfill their
professional duties are the following −
• Hold paramount the safety, health and welfare of the public.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 54 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
• Perform services only in area of their competence.
• Issue public statements only in an objective and truthful manner.
• Act for each employer or client as faithful agents or trustees.
• Avoid deceptive acts.
• Conduct themselves honorably, responsibly, ethically and lawfully so as to
enhance the honor, reputation and usefulness of the profession.
All the other societies have proposed the code of ethics to be followed in their
respective disciplines, by the engineers. The professional ethics should be
accompanied by moral concerns, in acting responsibly towards the profession
while being in ethical limits.
The Codes of Ethics promote and sustain the ethical environment and
assist in achieving the ethical goals in the following manner:
• It creates an environment in a profession, where ethical behavior is the basic
criterion.
• It guides and reminds the person as to how to act, in any given situation.
• It provides support to the individual, who is being pressurized or tortured by a
superior or employer, to behave unethically.
• Apart from professional societies, companies and universities have framed their
own codes of ethics, based on the individual circumstances and specific
mission of the organizations.

QUESTIONS
Part-A (3mark questions)

1. Global issues are a big challenge to Engineers -Discuss.
2. Discuss multinational corporation from ethical point of view:
3. What is meant by international rights on Global issues?

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 55 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

4. Write any four international rights guidelines suggested by
Donaldson.
5. What is technology transfer and appropriate technology?
6. What is environmental ethics?
7. Explain how the environmental degradations are minimized.
8. Discuss cost-oblivious approach.
9. Discuss the following
(a) Acid rain (b) Global warming
10.How do you internalize the costs of environmental degradation?
11.What is technology assessment
12.What are the four types of ethics under environmental degradation?
13.What do you mean by Eco centric ethics?
14.Discuss: Computer Ethics.
15.Name different types of problems in computer ethics.
16.List the ethical problems by computers in workplace.
17.What are the merits and demerits of anonymity in computer organization?
18.What are the important issues of computer ethics?
19.What is hacking in computer ethics?
20.What is Autonomous computers?
21.Write any two computer ethical codes.
22.What is the role of engineers in defense industry?
23.Discuss: Engineers as Managers.
24.Define Ethical climate.
25.What is managing conflict?
26.List any three types of conflicts that are frequently reported by the engineering
managers.
27.What are the suggestive measures that are used for solving managerial
conflicts?
28.Discuss: Consulting Engineers.
29.Consulting Engineers for advertising: - Discuss.
30.What is competitive bidding in consulting Engineers?

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 56 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

31.Define contingency fee.
32.Differentiate consulting engineers with salaried engineers.
33.Engineers as Expert witnesses Discuss.
34.Highlight the issues of engineers as expert witness.
35.What are the factors that will motivate an Engineer to be more conscious and
vigilant about his crucial role of expert witness?
36.What is abuse in expert witnesses?
37.What are the types of biases that are contributed by the ethical abuses?
38.Explain 'moral leadership'.
39.Discuss the participation of professional societies in moral leadership
40.Name any four professional engineering society's that framed the codes of
ethics.
41.Write any two codes of ethics in the area of safety, health and welfare of the
public.
42.List the features of human rights.
43.Define  ̳technology transfer‘
44.Define appropriate technology.
45.What are the duties of an engineer as an experimenter in environmental ethics?
46. Give the reasons for an engineer to involve in weapons development.
47.List the ethical responsibilities of consulting engineers.
48.List the provision of NSPE code on the advertisement by consultant.
49.Differentiate ethical relativism &ethical absolutism.
50.Differentiate technology transfer & appropriate technology.

PART – B
ESSAY (14 marks)

1. Briefly discuss the role of multinational corporations in global issues.
2. Does globalization solve the global issues? Why or why not
3. Explain the role of engineers as managers.
4. Explain the meaning and relevance of environmental ethics?
5. Write a brief account on the various aspects of internal rights of multinational
companies with the emphasis on the promotion of morally just measures.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 57 of 57

MODULE:5 GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES

6. Briefly explain the association of technology transfer and appropriate
technology with the multinational corporations.
7. Highlight the features of different types of environmental ethics with suitable
examples.
8. Write briefly about the salient features of computer ethics.
9. Write a brief account on the involvement of engineers in weapons
development.
10.Briefly discuss the various aspects of engineers as managers.
11.Briefly explain the important responsibilities of consulting engineers.
12.How you can justify the statement 'engineers could efficiently act as expert
witnesses and advisers'.
13.Explain the role of engineers as moral leaders in professional societies.
14.What are the different aspects of engineering profession in providing
voluntary service?
15. Write a brief account on "sample code of conduct".
16. Explain the active participation of a various professional societies
in codes of Ethics.
17.Discuss on the pros and cons of multinational companies from the point of view
of ethics.
18. Discuss on the engineer‘s role in weapon development.
19.Explain the anthropocentric view on environmental ethics? How far it is
different eco-centric world view.
20. Explain the various environmental issues faced by the world.
21.Describe the different types of issues found in computer ethics?
22.List any three types of conflicts that are frequently reported by the engineering
managers.
23.What are the suggestive measures that are used for solving managerial
conflicts?
24. State the importance of moral leadership in engineering profession.
25. Explain the role of engineers as moral leaders.
26.Explain the role of computers in technological development.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 1 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 5
UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS

MODULE: 5
GLOBAL ETHICAL ISSUES
SHORT ANSWER (3 MARKS)
1. Conclude the features of Biocentric ethics.
2. Name any three professional societies and their role relevant to engineers
3. What is business ethics?
4. List any three characteristics of Business ethics.
5. List any three ethical responsibilities of consulting engineer.
6. What is environmental ethics?
8. Justify the need for moral leadership in today’s business environment
9. Describe the various requirements for engineers who act as advisors.
10. List out the importance of business ethics.

ESSAY

11. Describe the two world views on Environmental ethics. (8)
12. Explain the different types of issues in computer ethics? (6)
13. Explain the features advantages and limitations of MNCs? (14)
14. Discuss in detail about the moral and ethical issues involved in the use
of computers and internet with examples. (14)
15. Discuss the following in detail

a) Engineers as Consultants b) Engineers as expert witness (14)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 5
16. Explain the characteristics of Business ethics? (7)
17. Explain the role of computers in technological development? (7)
18. Explain the advantages & limitations of MNCs? (14)
19. Explain human centred Environmental ethics with nature centred
ethics. (7)
20. Explain the different types of issues in computer ethics? (7)
21. Discuss about role of engineers as expert witness. (7)
22. What are the various conflict situations faced by a project manager
managing a work site? (7)
23. Evaluate the technology transfer & appropriate technology. (8)
24. Discuss about computer & internet ethics. (6)
25. Investigate the causes and effect of acid rain with a case study. (8)
26. Conclude the features of ecocentric & Biocentric ethics. (6)
MODULE: 2

ENGINEERING ETHICS & PROFESSIONALISM

Senses of Engineering Ethics - Variety of moral issues- Types of inquiry-
Moral dilemmas –Moral Autonomy – Kohlberg’s theory- Gilligan’s theory-
Consensus and Controversy-Profession and Professionalism- Models of professional

roles-Theories about right action –Self-interest-Customs and Religion- Uses of
Ethical Theories.

ENGINEERING ETHICS

Define Engineering ethics. (3 marks)
Ethics in engineering is the ability as well as responsibility of an engineer to judge his
decisions from the context of the general wellbeing of the society. It is the study of moral
issues that confront engineers and engineering organizations when some crucial decisions
are taken. Engineering research and practice requires that the task being performed
considers all the pros and cons of a certain action and its implementation. Professional
engineering bodies like, IEEE, ASME, IEI etc., have evolved comprehensive ethics codes
relevant to their respective professions, based on the rich experience of their members.
Independent organizations like NSPE have prepared value based ethical codes applicable to
all engineering professions.
 Ethics in engineering is the ability as well as responsibility of an engineer to judge his
decisions from the context of the general wellbeing of the society. It is the study of moral
issues that confront engineers and engineering organizations when some crucial decisions
are taken.
 Engineering research and practice requires that the task being performed considers all the
pros and cons of a certain action and its implementation. Professional engineering bodies
like, IEEE, ASME, IEI etc., have evolved comprehensive ethics codes relevant to their
respective professions, based on the rich experience of their members. Independent
organizations like NSPE have prepared value based ethical codes applicable to all
engineering professions.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 42

Explain the factors that influence the ethical standards? (7 marks)
ETHICAL STANDARDS IN ENGINEERING ARE INFLUENCED BY MANY FACTORS
1. Engineering as an experimentation for the good of mankind is a notable factor
involving far reaching consequence,
2. Ethical dilemmas make engineering decisions relatively difficult to make.
3. Risk and safety of citizens as a social responsibility is a prime concern of an
engineer,
4. Technological advancement can be very demanding on the engineering skill in the
global context,
5. Moral values and responsible conduct will play a crucial role in decision making.

PROFESSIONAL ETHICS

• Profession is a commitment to a designated and organized occupation by virtue of being
an authority over a body of knowledge with requisite skills acquired through specialized
training. An occupation becomes a profession when a group of people sharing the same
occupation work together in a morally acceptable way with members setting and following
a certain ethics code.
• A professional is a practitioner belonging to a specific profession. Professional ethics, as
opposed to personal values and morality, is a set of ethical standards and values a
practicing engineer is required to follow. It sets the standards for professional practice, and
is only learned in a professional school or while practicing one‘s own profession. Today, it
is an essential part of professional education because it helps students deal with issues they
will face.

PROFESSIONAL CODE OF ETHICS

• A code of ethics prescribes how professionals are to pursue their common ideal so that
each may do the best at a minimal cost to oneself and those they care about. The code is to
protect each professional from certain pressures (for example, the pressure to cut corners

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 3 of 42
to save money) by making it reasonably likely (and more likely then otherwise) that most
other members of the profession will not take advantage. A code is a solution to a
coordination problem. A professional has obligations to the employer, to customers, to
other professionals- colleagues with specific expectations of reciprocity.
The scope of professional ethics envelopes diverse activities like
1. Engineering as a social experimentation
2. Engineers responsibility for safety
3. Role of engineers, managers, consultants etc.
4. Rights of engineers
5. Moral reasoning and ethical theories
6. Responsibility to employers
7. Global issues and concerns
Define Senses of engineering Ethics. (5 marks)

SENSES OF ENGINEERING ETHICS

• The word ethics has different meanings but they are correspondingly related to each other.
In connection with that, engineering ethics has also various senses which are related to one
another.
• There are two different senses (meanings) of engineering ethics, namely the Normative
and the Descriptive senses. The normative sense includes:

• Knowing moral values, finding accurate solutions to moral problems and
justifying moral judgments in engineering practices,
• Study of decisions, policies, and values that are morally desirable in the
engineering practice and research, and
• Using codes of ethics and standards and applying them in their transactions
by engineers. The descriptive sense refers to what specific individual or
group of engineers believe an act, without justifying their beliefs or actions.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 4 of 42

Differentiate Ethics & Engineering Ethics. (5 marks)
Comparison of the Senses of Ethics & Engineering Ethics

Explain the variety of moral/ethical issues related to engineering? (9 marks)

VARIETY OF MORAL ISSUES

• The word morality is concerned with:
 What morally ought or ought not to be given in a given situation;
 What is morally right or wrong an out the handling of the situation; and/or
 What is morally good or bad about the people, policies, and ideals involved in it?
According to the Oxford dictionary, morality means principles concerning right and wrong or
good and bad behavior. Moral reasons are required to support an act (or an ideal) to be called as
morally right act (or an ideal is
moral).It would be relevant to know why and how do moral issues (problems)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 5 of 42
arise in a profession or why dopeople behave unethically? The reasons for people including
the employer and employees, behaving unethically is listed as follows
1. Resource Crunch:Due to pressure, through time limits, availability of money or budgetary co
nstraints, and technologydecay or obsolescence. Pressure from thegovernment to complete the pro
ject in time (e.g., before theelections), reductionin the budget because of sudden war or natur
al calamity (e.g., Tsunami)andbsolescence due technology innovation by the competitor lead to
manipulation and unsafe and unethicalexecution of projects. Involving individuals in the develop
ment of goals and values and developing policies that allow for individual
diversity, dissent, and input to decision-making will prevent unethical results.
• 2. Opportunity:a)Double standards or behavior of the employers towards the
employees and the public. The unethical behaviours of World Com (in USA),
Enron (in USA as well as India) executives in 2002 resulted in
bankruptcy for those companies,
b) Management projecting their own interests more than that of their

employees. Someorganizations over-emphasize short-
term gains and results at the expense of themselves and

others,
(c) Emphasis on results and gains at the expense of the employees, and

(d) Management by objectives, without focus on empowerment and improvement o
f theinfrastructure.This is best encountered by developing policies that allow  ̳conscience
keepers‘ and whistle blowers and
appointing ombudsman, who can work confidentially with people to solve the unethical pr
oblems internally.
3. Attitude: Poor attitude of the employees set in due to
(a) Low morale of the employees because of dissatisfaction and downsizing
(b) Absence of grievance redressal mechanism,
(c) Lack of promotion or career development policies or denied promotions,
(d) Lack of transparency,

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 6 of 42

(e) Absence of recognition and reward system, and
(f) Poor working environments.
• 4. Organization oriented issues: Being an employee to firm, the engineer has to work
towards the achievement of the objectives of his/her organization. Engineers have to give
higher priority to the benefits of the organization than one ̳s own benefits. Engineers should
be able to work collectively with colleagues and other members in order to achieve firm ̳s
goals.
• 5.Clients or customers oriented issues: As we know, the purpose of any business is to reach
and satisfy the end users. Therefore the customers  ̳requirements should be met. In this regard,
engineers have a major role to play in identifying the customer voice ̳, and incorporating the
voice of the customer into the product design and manufacture. Apart from engineering
technicality issues, engineers also should face other moral and ethical issues with
clients/customers.
• 6.Law, Government and Public agencies oriented issues: The engineers should obey
and voluntarily comply with all the governmental rules and regulations related to them. They
should also respect and honestly practice all other similar laws, policies, and regulations.
• 7.Professional Societies Oriented Issues:The engineers should follow strictly the various
codes of ethics by various professional societies such as National Society of Professional
Engineers (NSPE), the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE), and American
Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME), in order to perform standard professional behavior.
Professional codes of ethics reflect basic norms ̳ of conduct that exist within a particular
profession and provide general guidance relating to a variety of issues.
• 8.Social and Environmental Oriented Issues: Since the works of engineers have a direct
and vital impact on the quality of life for all people, the engineers should be dedicate to the
protection of the public health, safety and welfare. Also engineers need to be aware their role as
agents of experimenters. They should have a united commitment in protecting the environment.
They should not involve in any unethical environmental issues such as misusing scarce
resources, and fouling environment.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 7 of 42
• 9. Family Oriented Issues: As a human being and the member of a family, the engineers
do have family obligations to take care the needs of their family members. But they should not
take any decisions for their own benefits at the cost of public, clients, or employers.
Giving ethics training for all, recognizing ethical conduct in work place,
including ethics inperformance appraisal, and encouraging open discussion on
ethical issues, are some of the directions topromote positive attitudes among the
employees .To get firm and positive effect, ethical standards must be set and
adopted by the senior management, with input from all personnel.
Thus the above discussion explains how the ethical problems often arise in the engineering
profession.
Explain the types of enquiry? (6 marks)

TYPES OF INQUIRY

• Inquiry means an investigation. Like general ethics, engineering ethics also involves
investigations into values, meaning and facts. Several moral issues constitute the strong
basis for inquiries for their identification and rectification by the concerned authorities.
These inquiries in the field of engineering ethics are of three types.
• The three types of inquiries which focus on values and facts of the moral issues, that are
prevalent in engineering ethics are:
• Normative Inquiries
• Conceptual Inquiries
• Factual or Descriptive Inquiries

1. NORMATIVE INQUIRIES

• These inquiries are mostly helpful to identify the values which guide the individuals and
groups in taking a decision. These are meant for identifying and justifying some norms and
standards of morally desirable nature for guiding individuals as well as groups. In most of
the cases, the normative questions are given below:
• How do the obligations of engineers protect the public safety in given situations?

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 8 of 42

• When should an engineer have to alarm their employers on dangerous practices?
• Where are the laws and organizational procedures that affect engineering practice on moral
issues?
• Where are the moral rights essential for engineers to fulfill their professional
obligations?
From these questions, it is clear that normative inquiries also have the theoretical goal of
justifying moral judgments.

2. CONCEPTUAL INQUIRIES

• These are meant for describing the meaning of concepts, principles, and issues related to
Engineering Ethics. These inquiries also explain whether the concepts and ideas are
expressed by single word or by phrases. The following are some of the questions of
conceptual inquiries:
• What is the safety and how it is related to risk?
• What does it mean when codes of ethics say engineers should protect the safety,
health and welfare of the public?
• What is a ―bribe‟?
• What is a ―profession‟ and „professional‟?

3. FACTUAL / DESCRIPTIVE INQUIRIES

• These help to provide fact for understanding and finding solutions to value based issues.
The engineer has to conduct factual inquiries by using scientific techniques. These help to
provide information regarding the business realities such as engineering practice, history
of engineering profession, the effectiveness of professional societies in imposing moral
conduct, the procedures to be adopted when assessing risks and psychological profiles of
engineers. The information about these facts provides understanding and background
conditions which create moral problems. These facts are also helpful in solving moral
problems by using alternative ways of resolving moral problems.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 9 of 42

• For example,
1. How were the benefits assessed?
2. What are procedures followed in risk assessment?
3.What are short-term and long- term effects of drinking water being polluted? and
4. Who conducted the tests on materials?
Define Moral Dilemma. (3marks)

MORAL DILEMMA

• Dilemmas are situations in which moral reasons come intoconflict, or in
which the application of moral values are problems, and one is not clear of
the immediate choice or solution of the problems.Moralreasons could be rights,
duties, goods or obligations.
• These situations do not mean that things had gone wrong, but theyonly indicate the pr
esence of moral complexity.This makes the decision making complex. For example, a
person promised to meet a friend and dine, but he
has to help hisuncle who is involved in an accident —one has to fix the priority.
• Moral dilemmas are situations in which two or more moral obligations, duties, rights,
goods, or ideals come into conflict with each other. The crucial feature of a moral dilemma
is that all the moral principles cannot be fully respected in a given situation. Also solving
one moral principle can create two or more conflicting applications for a particular
situation.
Explain the causes of moral dilemma? (6 marks)

CAUSES OF MORAL DILEMMAS

Moral dilemmas are situations, mostly, due to the following three problems.
• Problem of Vagueness;
• Problem of Conflicting reasons;
• Problem of Disagreement.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 10 of 42
• 1.Problem of Vagueness: Vague means not clearly expressed or perceived; not specific or
exact. For a given situation, sometimes it is unclear to the engineers to apply the most
appropriate moral considerations or principles. They may not know how and which moral
principles to be used in resolving a moral problem. This situation creates a typical moral
dilemma. Example: consider an engineer, starting a new assignment as quality inspector
checking the incoming raw materials/spare parts from the suppliers. Supplier offers (on
behalf of some festival, say, Deepavali) him an expensive DVD player as a gift. Now this
situation is a moral dilemma. Because the engineer is unclear about: what to do?; whether
to accept the gift or not?; whether the thing offered is a gift or a bribe?; will it create a
conflict of interest? Thus the problem of vagueness i.e., unclarity causes a moral dilemma.
• 2. Problem of Conflicting Reasons: This is a situation where two or more moral
problems conflicting each other, each of which seems to be correct. In other words, this is
a situation where two or more moral obligations, duties, rights or ideals come into conflict
with each other; independently each one is good and correct. But when they come together
it is very difficult choice to choose the good one. This situation is another moral dilemma.
• Example: let us examine the space shuttle Challenger explosion, focusing on the dilemma
faced by the engineering manager, Bob Lund. He had the following conflicts:
• Launching the challenger space shuttle despite there was an unknown probability that the
shuttle would explode; which will kill all the persons on the board.
• Postponing the launch, which may lead to loss of future contracts from NASA, the loss of
job to many workers, etc?
• Now, the job of Bob Lund is to make the best choice out of these two conflicts. At last,
he chose to risk the launching of shuttle. This situation is one of the good illustrations for
the moral dilemma due to the problem of conflicting reasons.
• 3.Problem of Disagreement:It is quite obvious that individuals and groups may have
different views, suggestions, interpretations, and solutions on a moral problem in
particular situations. This disagreement among individuals and groups on interpreting
moral issues will create a situation of another moral dilemma. Example: In most

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 11 of 42
corporations, there are disagreements among managers regarding whether customer can be
allowed to inspect their plants and procedures, as a confidence building measure.

STEPS IN FACING MORAL DILEMMA:
• 1.Identifying the relevant moral factors and reasons.
• 2. Collecting and gathering all the available facts which are relevant to the moral
factors while resolving.
• 3. Ranking the moral considerations or principles on the basis of importance as
applicable to the situation.
• 4. Considering alternative courses of action for resolving the problems and tracing
the full implications of each. i.e. conducting factual inquiries.
• 5.Having talked with the colleagues, friend about the problem getting their
suggestions and alternative ideas on resolving that dilemma and
• 6. Arriving at a careful and reasonable judgment or solution by taking into
consideration of all important moral factors and reasons on the basis of the facts or
truths. But it seems to be difficult.
Define Moral Autonomy.(3marks)

MORAL AUTONOMY

• Moral Autonomy is the philosophy which is self-governing or self-determining, i.e., acting
independently without the influence or distortion of others. The moral autonomy relates to
the individual ideas whether right or wrong conduct which is independent of ethical issues.
The concept of moral autonomy helps in improving self-determination. Moral Autonomy
is concerned with independent attitude of a person related to moral/ethical issues. This
concept is found in moral, ethical and even in political philosophy.
• The moral autonomy is the ability to think critically and independently about moral issues
and apply this moral thinking to situations that arise during the professional engineering
practice. It is understood that an individual personality depends on the integration of his
moral benefits and attitude. When one ̳s labor and skills are sold, then it is an illusion to
think that the person is not morally autonomous.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 12 of 42
• As an experimenter, an engineer has to undergo an extensive and updated training to form
his identity as a professional. There will be a personal involvement in one ̳s work. The
magnitude of moral autonomy to be experienced by engineering is highly influenced by
the attitude of company ̳s managements. Where there is a treat for engineers  ̳moral
autonomy, then engineers can look for moral support from their professional societies and
outside organization.
• Viewing engineering as social experimentation will promote autonomous

participation andretainone‘s professional identity.Periodical performance appraisals, tight-
time schedules and fear of foreign competition threatens this autonomy.

• The attitude of the management should allow latitude in the judgments of their engin
eers on moral issues. If management views profitability is more important than
consistent quality and retention of the customers that
discourage the moral autonomy, engineers are compelled to seek the
support from their professional societies and outside organizations for moral

support. It appears that the blue-
collar workers with the support of the union can adopt better autonomy

than the employed professionals. Only recently the legal support has been obtained
by the professional
societies in exhibiting moral autonomy by professionals in this country as well as in the W
est.
Explain the skills needed for moral autonomy? (7 marks)
MORAL AUTONOMY – SKILLS NEEDED

• 1. Ability to relate the problems with the problems of law, economics and religious
principles: It is essential to have the ability to analyze a problem and finding the relation
with the existing law or the topic of issue with the existing principles on that topic. The
ability to distinguish between both of them and finding the moral reasons.
• 2. Skill to process, clarify and understand the arguments against the moral issues: If
the issue is against some moral values or the ethical values to be followed in the society,
then clarity should be maintained about the differences and similarities. Both of these

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 13 of 42
differences and similarities are to be judged based on why they are a matter of concern and
in what aspect.
• 3. Ability to suggest the solutions to moral issues on the basis of facts: If the moral
issues are not fulfilling and needs to be, then the solutions are to be suggested according to
the moral issues based on the facts and truths of the issue. These suggestions must be
consistent and must include all the aspects of the problem. No partiality is to be allowed in
any such aspect.
• 4. Must have the imaginative skill to view the problems from all the viewpoints: After
having known about the facts and illusions of the issue, a clear understanding is attained in
viewing the problem in all kinds of viewpoints. This enables one to be able to suggest a
proper alternative solution.
• 5. Tolerance while giving moral judgment, which may cause trouble: When the whole
analysis is made considering all the viewpoints of the issue, the final output might be or
might not be pleasing to the persons involved.
Hence while declaring the judgment or the decisions taken, a detailed description of the
actions done should be given, while the actions ought to be done should be presented in a
better way, to ensure others that the decisions have been taken without any partialities
towards any party.
• Moral autonomy reflects the concept of individuality. This relates to the idea of building
one‘s self with the moral values one has while developing psychologically. To have moral
autonomy in all the aspects, one should have a lot of patience and interest. One should
adhere to the basic principles of humanity and should be strict with the Don‘ts he has in
mind and liberal with his Do‘s. The kindness towards his fellow beings is also an
important concept to be kept in mind. Inculcation of all these important qualities, enhances
the skills of Moral autonomy in a person.
• A Person must have adequate knowledge and understanding about the use of ethical
language so as to defend or support his views with others. He must have better knowledge
in understanding the importance of suggestions and better solutions while resolving moral
problems and also about the importance of tolerance on some critical situations.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 14 of 42
• Above all, one must understand the importance of maintaining moral honesty and should
be liberal to understand the human behavior under certain circumstances.
Explain Kohlberg’s theory of moral development? (7 marks)
Explain Gillian’s theory of moral development? (7 marks)
MORAL DEVELOPMENT THEORIES

KOHLBERG’S THEORY

• Lawrence Kohlberg was a professor at Harvard University during the early 1970s and was
famous for his works on developmental psychology. He conducted many studies at
Harvard University during the early 1970s and was famous for his work which is
popularly known as Kohlberg’s theory.Moral development
in human being occurs coverage
and experience

LAWRENCE KOHLBERG’S THEORY

• Kohlberg proposed that people progress in moral reasoning based on their ethical
behavior. He postulated this theory based on the thinking of younger children throughout
their growing period as adults. He conveyed that younger children make judgment based
on the consequences that might occur and the older children make judgment based on their
institutions. He believed that there are six stages of moral development which are further
classified into three levels. The following illustration shows the different levels. The
process being discussed here is about the judgment made by the thinker about the
protagonist in a given situation. The steps of the thinking process show the moral
development of the thinker.
• Kohlberg's theory is closely related with the moral autonomy in terms of

psychological theories regarding moral development. This theory was presented by tin-
combined efforts of Lawrence Kohlberg and Carol Gilligan. Kohlberg's

theory mainly emphasizes on the concept of moral development that is
distinguished by factors such as reasoning and motivation of an individual.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 15 of 42
According to Kohlberg's theory, three main levels of moral development are
recognized. They are illustrated as below:

Lawrence Kohlberg’s Theory

1.Pre-conventional Level

Pre-conventional Level

This can be understood as the first level of moral thinking, which is generally found at
Elementary school level. The thinker at this stage tends to think and behave based on the
direct consequences that might occur. There are two sub-stages in this
Avoid Punishments: A thinker at this stage generally thinks and believes that the judgments
are to be made as per the socially acceptable norms as they are said so by some higher official
(a teacher or a parent). This is a child-like obedience, in order to avoid punishments. These
thoughts are based on the idea that the protagonist should not disobey the law or rules

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 16 of 42
Self thought:A thinker at this stage, shows interest in making decisions according to the
rewards they get in exchange. This second stage is characterized by a view that right behavior
means acting in one's own best interests. In this stage, they tend to follow the rules of authority
because they believe that this is necessary to ensure positive relationships and societal order.
Right conduct is much focused in this primitive level in which motivation of individuals
occupies the primary status. This level of development is commonly observable in young
children and few adult people in order to cater their basic needs.

CONVENTIONAL LEVEL

This can be understood as the second level of moral thinking, which is generally found at
the primary and high school level. The thinker at this stage tends to think and behave based
on the want to please others. There are two sub-stages in this.
Getting people to like them: At this stage, the ideas of the society are considered. This
level can be that where the protagonist behaves on account of the moral grounds which
people decide for decision making. This decision may or may not support the law.
Whatever the result is, the thinking process is based on how to impress others or society
and on how to please the people around.
Maintain functioning in society: A thinker at this stage, considers to follow the rules for
the good of the society. The moral grounds on how people in the society will consider the
job done will be the priority, because the thinker believes that a social order is maintained
by abiding by the rules. Hence a thinker sticks to the idea that the protagonist should

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 17 of 42
follow the moral values. The thinker‘s behavior is driven by the authority while his
thinking conforms to the social order. The correct norms or conventional values are
sincerely followed in this level. Motivation of individuals to please or satisfy others and to
meet the expectations of the society is the features of conventional level. Kohlberg's theory
strongly points out that most of the adult individuals never mature much beyond this
stage.

Post-Conventional Level

Reject rigidity of laws: In this level, the thinker uses his moral thinking skills at a
commendable pace. He starts to feel for the protagonist based on moral grounds. He also
might have an opinion that the rules have to be changed according to humanitarian values.
The thinker rejects the rigidity of the existing laws and rules at this stage.
Sense of justice: This is the pinnacle stage of Moral development where the thinker feels a
sense of justice for the protagonist. The thinker has great moral values that he keeps himself
free from the external factors that might influence his thinking process.
• When an individual becomes capable of distinguishing right and wrong principles with
a welfare-minded approach, this Post conventional level is reached.
• These self-thinking individuals are named as autonomous by Kohlberg. These individuals
have the attitude of following the 'Golden rule' through moral reasons and principles.
• These personalities possess the well-balanced capability to maintain their moral integrity,
self-respect and due respect to other autonomous individuals by their matured mental
motivation. Moral responsibility combined with moral reasoning is considered to be the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 18 of 42
two unique qualities that could be cultivated through sustained training and parental
culture. These individuals who are specially trained in this direction tend to develop the
mental attitude of respecting the customary practices and rights of other people.
• According to Kohlberg's theory, only a selective set of people could reach the post
conventional level by developing moral maturity and perceptive organization.
Kohlberg had strongly emphasized in his theory that moral autonomy is the desirable
factor for achieving these three levels thereby inheriting valuable characters along with
moral responsibility and commitment towards the well-being of the society.
• Kohlberg strongly believed that the moral autonomy could be achieved through moral
reasoning and training by means of parental care and social culture. He had the further
contention that the advanced stages such as post conventional level would be suitable for
the perfect achievement of one's perspective goals But, he was not very certain about the
exact stage to specify the moral development. However, he was confident that although it
was very difficult to reach the post conventional level, moral autonomy could be cultivated
as an valuable character to acquire the moral responsibility.
GILLIGAN'S THEORY

• This is an advancement of Kohlberg‘s theory. It had been observed that Kohlberg‘s theory
was proposed based on the moral thinking of privileged white men and boys. Hence this
theory was popularized by taking both male and female thinking capabilities into account.
• Carol Gilligan, a psychological theorist was born on Nov 28, 1936 in the New York city.
She pursued her doctorate degree in Social Psychology from the Harvard University.
Gilligan was a research assistant for Lawrence Kohlberg, but she eventually became
independent and criticized some of his theories. Kohlberg‘s theory was much opposed and
criticized by Gilligan's theory. Gilligan's theory state that Kohlberg's theory was mainly
based on information collected from male - subjects and focused primarily on their
general rules and rights.
• According to Gilligan, Kohlberg seemed to have studied only privileged men and boys.
She believed that women face a lot of psychological challenges and they are not moral
widgets. The women‘s point of view on moral development involves caring which shows

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 19 of 42
its effect on human relationships. Gilligan's theory further argues that men seem to
preserve the personal relationships in solving moral problems and moral dilemmas
more than women. Strong emphasis on ethics of care against the ethics of rules and
rights is the salient feature of Gilligan's theory.
• This theory focused on the strong criticism on one of an example called Heinz's dilemma
in Kohlberg‘s theory.
• A man by name Heinz had stolen a expensive drug for treating and saving the life of his
wife who was suffering from cancer. He resorted to the final act of stealing the drug, after
his persistent and prolonged efforts failed to get the drug at the affordable and cheap cost
Gilligan's theory questioned whether the act of Heinz, was morally right or wrong.
• Hence she proposed a theory which has the same three stages of Kohlberg but with
different stages of moral development. Though the names of the stages are the same, the

stages differ in this method. The moral development in Gilligan‘s theory are based on pro-
social behaviors such as Altruism, caring and helping and the traits such as honesty,

fairness and respect.

Gilligan’s Theory

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 20 of 42

• Pre-Conventional Level

• A person in this stage cares for oneself to ensure survival. Though the person‘s attitude is
selfish, this is the transition phase, where the person finds the connection between oneself
and others

• Conventional Level

• In this stage, the person feels responsible and shows care towards other people. Carol
Gilligan believes that this moral thinking can be identified in the role of a mother and a
wife. This sometimes leads to the ignorance of the self.
• Post-Conventional Level

• This is the stage, where the principle of care for self as well as others, is accepted.
However, a section of people may never reach this level.
• According to the Carol Gilligan‘s theory of moral development, changes occur due to the
change of self rather than the critical thinking.
• It was stated that the post- conventional level of Kohlberg is not attained by women. But
Carol Gilligan researched and found that the post-conventional level of thinking is not
being easy for women to go through because they care for the relationships.

Levels of Thinking

• Carol Gilligan states that the post-conventional level of moral thinking can be dealt based

on the two types of thinking. Gilligan‘s theory is based on the two main ideas, the care-
based morality (usually found in women) and the justice-based morality (usually found in

men).

CARE-BASED MORALITY

Care-based morality is the kind of thinking found in women. This is based on the
following principles.
• More emphasis is given to inter-connected relationships and universality.
• Acting justly focuses on avoidance of violence.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 21 of 42

• Women with this are usually interested in helping others.
• More common in girls because of their connections to their mothers.
• Because girls remain connected to their mothers, they are less inclined to worry
about issues of fairness.

JUSTICE-BASED MORALITY

Justice-based morality is the kind of thinking found in men. This is based on the following
principles.
• They view the world as being composed of autonomous individuals who interact
with one another.
• Acting justly means avoiding inequality.
• Individuals with this are usually interested in protecting individuality.
• Thought to be more common among boys because of their need to differentiate
between themselves and their mothers.
• Because they are separated from their mothers, boys become more concerned with
the concept of inequality.

EXAMPLE OF GILLIGAN’S THEORY

• In order to understand Gilligan‘s theory, a popular example is usually considered. A
group of moles give shelter to a porcupine. But they are being continuously stabbed by the
porcupine‘s quills. Now, what should they do?
The Pre-conventional level of thinking states that to think for the good of oneself, either
the moles or the porcupine only can live there. The other has to leave the place.
According to the Conventional level of thinking, which brings a transition, from self to
the good of others and which might even lead to sacrifice, either the moles or the
porcupine has to sacrifice or again this leads to a stage where only moles or the porcupine
can live in the burrow.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 22 of 42
According to the Post-conventional level of thinking, which states that the good of both
the parties has to be considered, both the moles and the porcupine come to an agreement
that both will have separate places in the same burrow, where they limit to behave
themselves and will not cause any trouble to other. This helps both of them to live in the
same place with peace.
• The researchers found that the solution to this scenario is different with different
individuals; gender also plays an important role. The thinkers were observed viewing the
problem in two different perspectives, the care-based and the justice- based.
In a Justice-based perspective, the solution to the problem is viewed as a conflict
between two individual groups. Only one of them can have the property. Either moles or
the porcupine will get the place in the burrow. Hence the solution to the dilemma, is not a
resolution of the conflict, it is a verdict.
• In a Care-based perspective, the approach differs. The problem is viewed as a difficult
situation faced by both the parties together, rather than a fight between both of them.
Hence the solution is sought in a way around the problem or to remove the problem
completely. The solution may sound compromising but not damaging. The relationship
will still be the same, after the resolution.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 23 of 42
• Researchers found that Justice-based perspective is pre-dominant among males while
Care-based prospective is among females.

Differentiate Consensus & Controversy.(6 marks)

CONSENSUS &CONTROVERSY

• The provision of moral autonomy to professional engineers is the fascinating concept of
engineering ethics. When the modalities of ethical values are being implemented in
practical terms, some consensus and controversial implications and issues arise. The
harmonious interaction between engineers and managements and in turn between
engineers and public individuals is the crucial factor for the manifestation of consensus
and controversy. When individuals carry out the practices of moral autonomy, they may
not be able to obtain similar results and effects as that of other people.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 24 of 42
• Proper provisions should be made available for teaching the essence of engineering ethics
and the responsible engineering. Particularly, authority should be inducted both in
classrooms of engineering teachings and engineer's work place. Authority of teachers on
students and authority of managers on engineers, would much focus on the values of moral
autonomy and ethics. A common line of agreement should be reached on the specific role
of authority. More precautionary steps need to be taken for not degrading and diluting the
agreement by the strong emphasis of moral autonomy of individuals in expressing their
moral views.The moral judgment may lead to conflicts if they are not delivered properly
without hurting the feelings of the persons involved. There are two stages after the
judgment. The stages are described below −
• CONSENSUS

• This is that state where people come into agreement with the judgment given by getting
convinced with the moral reasons. This will leave the persons with a feel that justice has
been done, the verdict may favor any party.

• CONTROVERSY

• This is that state where the persons involved in an issue are not satisfied by the verdict and
might feel that it was decided on partial interests. This will leave the people with a sense
of dissatisfaction that justice was not done, which might lead to another conflict.
• Literally, consensus means  ̳agreement  ̳, and controversy means  ̳disagreement
• Some controversial conflicts are due to arise between autonomy and authority,
when powers of authority are encroached and abuses. Certain cases of abuses of authority
occur inheritably, when the discussions of students are discouraged by a section of
teaching faculties. Such sensitive issues confronted by the authorities, could be easily
sorted out by proper planning strategies to maintain the concept of moral autonomy and
also the balanced academic atmosphere inside the classrooms of institutions.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 25 of 42

Differentiate Profession & Professionalism? (4 marks)

PROFESSION & PROFESSIONALISM

• The words ―Profession‖ and ―Professionalism‖ are often referred in the moral issues. It is
true to admit that any individual who possesses the true sense of commitment,
involvement and dedication, could mould into a competent professional. Especially,
engineering professionals with, personnel creativity and accountability are liable to be
subjected to the public scrutiny. Their professional competence and integrity are doubted
and questioned in terms of any technological failure thereby affecting their dominant
images.
• The term profession refers to a job or occupation and the term professional refers to any
activity to earn for living. Players, workers, drivers and engineers come under the
category of professionals, since they derive income sources unlike the case of amateur
people. Certain common criteria that are to the fulfilled to be a professional, are as
follows:
• Advanced expertise: The criteria of a profession is to have sound knowledge in both
technical aspects and liberal arts as well. In general, continuing education and updating
knowledge are also important. Application of knowledge requires technical skill,
theoretical background, discretionary judgment and strategic planning. Continuous
exposure to advancements in the technical curriculum is basically required for acquiring
a thorough knowledge.
• Self-regulation : An organization that provides a profession, plays a major role in setting
standards for the admission to the profession, drafting codes of ethics, enforcing the
standards of conduct and representing the profession before the public and the
government.
• Public good: Any occupation serves some public good by maintaining high ethical
standards throughout a profession. This is a part of professional ethics where each
occupation is intended to serve for the welfare of the public, directly or indirectly to a
certain extent.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 26 of 42

Membership Criteria

• Since any professional individual is subjected for any screening for any lapses or disputes,
the following criteria have been put forth in US for professional engineers.
• A bachelor's degree from any distinguished institution that is recognized and approved by
the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, is the basic requirement.
• Working in a well-recognized organization is preferable.
• Some technical training should be acquired in a registered and licensed engineering
institute after graduation.
• Discharge of duties with moral concern and is essential responsibility as per the
specified code of engineering ethics is essential.
• Because of the above mentioned criteria, engineering professionals with technical skill and
knowledge are duly respected with higher emoluments and other social benefits. It is
observed that engineering profession is not given the dignified status as that of medicine
in several countries such as US. Several countries have stipulated strict norms that the
engineering professional, whose jobs are directly concerned with public safety should be
registered as Professional Engineers (PE).

PROFESSIONALS

• A person who is paid for getting involved in a particular profession in order to earn a
living as well as to satisfy the laws of that profession can be understood as a Professional.
The basic concept of professionalism is closely linked with independence and freedom
that are free from any compulsion. The definition of a professional is given differently by
different experts in the field. Let us see the following definitions.
• “Only consulting engineers who are basically independent and have freedom from
coercion can be called as professionals.” − Robert L. Whitelaw
• ―Professionals have to meet the expectations of clients and employers. Professional
restrains are to be imposed by only laws and government regulations and not by personal
conscience.‖ − Samuel Florman

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 27 of 42

PROFESSIONALISM

• Professionalism covers comprehensively all areas of practice of a particular profession. It
requires skills and responsibilities involved in engineering profession. Professionalism
implies a certain set of attitudes. The art of Professionalism can be understood as the
practice of doing the right thing, not because how one feels but regardless of how one
feels. Professionals make a profession of the specific kind of activity and conduct to which
they commit themselves and to which they can be expected to conform. Moral ideals
specify virtue, i.e., desirable feature of character. Virtues are desirable ways of relating to
other individuals, groups and organizations. Virtues involve motives, attitudes and
emotions.
• According to Aristotle, virtues are the “acquired habits that enable us to engage
effectively in rational activities that defines us as human beings.”
Explain the various professional ideals & virtues? (9 marks)

PROFESSIONAL IDEALS & VIRTUES

• The virtues represent excellence in core moral behavior. The essentials for any
professional to excel in the profession are behavior, skills and knowledge. The behavior
shows the moral ideology of the professional.
• The moral ideals specify the virtue, i.e., the desirable character traits that talk a lot about
the motives, attitude and emotions of an individual.
• Public spirited virtues Proficiency virtues
• Team work virtues Self-governance virtues
The virtues mentioned above show the professional responsibility of an individual. Hence,
the professionalism that comes in with these virtues is called Responsible
Professionalism. Let us now understand each virtue in detail.
PUBLIC-SPIRITED VIRTUES

• An engineer should focus on the good of the clients and the public at large, which means
no harm should be done intentionally. The code of professional conduct in the field of

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 28 of 42
engineering includes avoiding harm and protecting, as well promoting the public safety,
health and welfare. Maintaining a sense of community with faith and hope within the
society and being generous by extending time, talent and money to professional societies
and communities, an engineer can maintain the public-spirited virtue. Finally, justice
within corporations, government and economic practices becomes an essential virtue that
an engineer should always possess.

PROFICIENCY VIRTUES

• These refer to the virtues followed in the profession according to the talent and intellect of
an engineer. The moral values that include this virtue are competence and diligence. The
competence is being successful in the job being done and the diligence is taking care and
having alertness to dangers in the job. Creativity should also be present in accomplishing
the assigned task.

TEAMWORK VIRTUES

• These virtues represent the coordination among team members which means working
successfully with other professionals. These include cooperative nature along with loyalty
and respect towards their organization, which makes the engineers motivate the team
professionals to work towards their valuable goals.

SELF-GOVERNANCE VIRTUES

• These virtues are concerned with moral responsibilities which represent integrity and self-
respect of the person. The integrity actually means the moral integrity which refers to the

actions, attitude and emotions of the person concerned during his professional period. The

self-governance virtues center on commitment, courage, self-discipline, perseverance, self-
respect and integrity. The truthfulness and trustworthiness which represent his honesty are

the crucial moral values to be kept up by a professional.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 29 of 42

Explain the various professional roles played by an engineer? (6 marks)
MODELS OF PROFESSIONALROLES (PROFESSIONAL ROLES TO BE

PLAYED BY AN ENGINEER)

• It is understood that an engineer has to play many roles while exercising his professional
obligations. Some of the professional roles or models are given below:
• Engineers as Saviors: It is believed that engineers hold the key for any improvements in
society through technological developments. Thus some people consider engineer as a
savior because they redeem society from poverty, inefficiency, waste and the hardships
drudgery of manual labor.
• Engineers as Guardians: Engineers know the direction in which technology should
develop and the speed at which it should move. Thus many people agree the role of
engineers as guardians, as engineers guard the best interests of society.
• Engineers as Bureaucratic Servants: The engineers ̳ role in the management is to be the
servant who receives and translates the directives of management into solid
accomplishments. Thus the engineers act as a bureaucratic servants i.e., loyal
organizations set by the management.
• Engineers as Social Servants: As we know, engineers have to play the role of social
servants to receive society ̳s directives and to satisfy society ̳s desires.
• Engineers as Social Enablers and Catalysts: Besides merely practicing the
management ̳s directives, the engineers have to play role of creating a better society. Also
they should act as catalysts for making social changes. Sometimes engineers have to help
the management and the society to understand their needs and to make decisions about
desirable technological development.
• Engineers as Game Players: In actual practice, engineers are neither servants nor
masters of anyone. In fact, they play the economic game rules, which may be effective at a
given time.
Like managers, the engineers ̳aim is also to play successfully within the organization and
moving ahead in a competitive world.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 30 of 42

THEORIES ABOUT RIGHT ACTION

• An engineer with ethics is a person who is expected to possess the moral integrity with
rich ethical values. The ethics are mainly divided into two categories depending upon the
morality of humanity.
Explain the various types of ethical theories? (9 marks)
TYPES OF ETHICAL THEORIES

• Depending upon the ethics a person is intended to follow, four theories were postulated by
four different philosophers. These theories help to create the fundamentals of obligation
suitable and applicable to professional and personal conduct of a person in his everyday
life.

• 1. GOLDEN MEAN THEORY: The Golden Mean ethical theory was proposed by
Aristotle. According to this the solution to a problem is found by analyzing the reason and
the logic. A ―Mean value of solution‖ which will be between the extremes of excess and
deficiency. For example, the solution to the problem of environment pollution is neither by
avoiding industrialization and civilization, nor by neglecting the environment completely.
A mean solution that will work towards controlling the pollution and protecting the
environment will also help.
Problem in Application: The application of this theory varies from one person to another
with their powers of reasoning and the difficulty in applying the theory to ethical
problems.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 31 of 42
What is Golden Mean?:The Golden Mean virtue can be understood as the virtue of
reaching a proper balance between extremes in conduct, emotion, desire and attitude. This
theory phrased by Aristotle states that virtues are tendencies to find the golden mean
between the extremes of too much (excess) and too little (deficiency) with regard to
particular aspects of our lives. The most important virtue is practical wisdom, i.e.,
morally good judgment, which enables one to discern the mean for all the other virtues.
There are internal goods such as products, activities and experiences should never clash
with the external goods such as money, power self-esteem and prestige. The standards of
excellence enable internal goods to be achieved. The external goods when extremely
concerned, though by individuals or by organizations, threaten the internal goods.
• 2. RIGHTS-BASED ETHICAL THEORY: The Rights based ethical theory was
proposed by John Locke. According to this theory, the solution to a problem is by realizing
that every person has a right to live. Live and let live is the philosophy behind this theory.
The rights of a person towards life, health, liberty, possession, etc. are taken care of under
this theory.
• For example, any action in terms of Capital punishment, Jails, Income taxes and Medical
charges etc. come under this category.
• Problem in Application: One rights of a person may be in conflict with rights of the
other.
• What does it mean?:Rights-based ethics is the recognition of human dignity at its most
basic form. The ethics refer to the basic human rights whether they are positive or
negative. Everyone has a right to live, liberty and the pursuit of happiness. Beauchamp and
Childress, authors and ethical theorists, have defined the term "right" to be a "justified
claim that individuals and groups can make upon other individuals or upon society; to
have a right is to be in a position to determine by one's choices, what others should do or
need not do." The natural law states that human laws are defined by morality and not by
some authority. This law is derived from the belief that human morality comes from
nature. Any action done by a person that would prevent a fellow being from living a good
and happy life, is considered immoral or unnatural. Any law should have some morals.
Moral duty is the obligation to act based on ethical beliefs.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 32 of 42
• 3.DUTY-BASED ETHICAL THEORY: The duty-based ethical theory was proposed by
Immanuel Kant. According to this theory, every person has a duty to follow which is
accepted universally, with no exceptions.
• An example of this can be expecting all to be honest, kind, generous and peaceful.
• Problem in Application: The universal application of this theory can be misleading.
• What are these ethics?: Kant observed that everyone is bound to follow some moral
laws. It is the choice we make to be morally sound though we have chances to do
anything. This theory can also be called as Deontological theory or the Absolutist theory.
According to this, it is our duty to obey the categorical imperative rules. To have good
will, is to perform one‘s duty for the sake of duty and for no other reason. The categorical
imperative law states that ―Act only according to that maxim by which you can at the same
time will that it should become a universal law.‖
Kant's theory seems to contain the following three important criteria:

• 1. Act of showing respect to persons for the principles of duty.
• 2. Application of moral principles in an universal manner.
• 3. Expression of certain actions in terms of hypothetical and moral imperatives
for duty ethics.
To be more healthy, stop overeating, to be happy, find good friendship are some of the
examples for this category.
There are four virtues that come under this law, which have to be discussed here
• Prudence: The quality of prudence states that every individual has a life that should be
respected and every individual has duties which should be done without any exception.
One should always be cautious to perform one‘s duties.
• Temperance: Temperance is the voluntary self-restrain from the attractions. The
temptations that might lead to the violation of duties and ethics have to be restrained. No
false promises are to be made as they contradict the principles of duties.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 33 of 42
• Fortitude: Fortitude is the sense of having tolerance. No perfection can be maintained if
happiness alone is sought and no happiness is achieved if perfection alone is sought. Both
may or may not go with each other.
• Justice: Every individual is a human being with a set of intrinsic values and morals. Truth
and fairness are the aspects one should always bear in mind. People should be treated as
separate individuals but never as a mere means of existence.
A free will and a will under moral laws are one and the same. We are free only when we
act in accordance with our own best natures, while we are slaves whenever we are under
the rule of our passions and wills. There should be a universally valid will, under which
everyone can be free.
• 4. UTILITARIAN ETHICS: The Utilitarian ethics was proposed by John Stuart.
According to this theory, the happiness or pleasure of a greatest number of people in the
society is considered as the greatest good. According to this philosophy, an action is
morally right if its consequences lead to happiness of people and wrong if they lead to
their unhappiness. An example of this can be the removal of reservation system in
education and government jobs, which can really benefit the talented. But this can have an
impact on the rights of the minorities.
Problem of Application: Qualification of the benefits can be difficult.

• What are these ethics?: Consider the cost-benefit analysis in engineering. A typical cost-
benefit analysis identifies the good and bad consequences of some action or policy in a

monetary aspect. It weighs the total good against total bad and then compares the results to
similar tallies of the consequences of alternative actions or rules. This supports the idea of
maximizing benefits against cost.
There are two main types of Utilitarianism. They are as follows:
 Act Utilitarianism: The Act Utilitarianism focuses on each situation and the alternative
actions possible in the situation. Act Utilitarianism states that ―A particular action is right
if it is likely to produce the higher level of good for the most people in a given situation,
compared to alternative choices that might be made.‖ In accordance with this theory, the
good done is only considered but not the way how it is done. For example, looting the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 34 of 42
richer to feed the poor, can satisfy and make a group of poor people, happy. But looting is
not a way of morality. Hence act- utilitarianism seems to justify the wrong-doing.
 Rule Utilitarianism: The Rule Utilitarianism states that ―Right actions are those required
by rules that produce the higher level of good for the most people.‖ We need to consider a
set of rules, where they interact with each other. This was developed to clear the problem

that occurs with act-utilitarianism. Engineers with ethics should follow the rule-
utilitarianism considering the point, ―Act as faithful agents or trustees of employers‖. So,

engineers should abide by it even when an exception might happen to be beneficial. Like
in the above example, one should seek the help of law and order to prove the guilt of richer
and let see that the poor get benefitted.

TESTING ETHICAL THEORIES

• The theory should be very clear with the coherent and applicable concepts.
• The theory should be highly consistent without any internal contradiction.
• The theory should not depend upon false information and implications.
• The theory should provide a comprehensive guidance to a specific problem.
• The theory should be more suitable and applicable with certain moral convictions such
as judgments about specific and complex issues.
Explain the various uses of ethical theories? (7 narks)
USES OF ETHICAL THEORIES

Ethical theories help in the following areas
• Understanding moral dilemmas.
• Justifying professional obligations and ideas.
• Relating ordinary and professional morality.
• Ethical theories aid in identifying the moral considerations or reasons that constitute a
dilemma.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 35 of 42
• They provide a precise sense of what kinds of information are relevant to solving moral
development.
• The theories augment the precision with which we use moral terms and they provide frame
works for moral reasoning when discussing moral issues with colleagues.
• By providing frame works for development of moral arguments, the theories strengthen
our ability to reach balanced and insightful judgments in their engineering problem.
Write a note on self interest. (5 marks)

SELF-INTEREST

Self-interest is nothing but one‘s personal good. It refers to the goodness of oneself
inthelongrun.Eachoftheethicaltheoriesrecognizestheimportanceofself-respect.
Utilitarian considers one‘s own good as well as the good of others. Duty ethicists
stressesdutiestoourselvesandforwonwell-being.Ethicistsofrightsemphasizeour rights
to pursue our own good.
Virtue ethicists accent the importance of self –respect. Each of these theories insists
that the pursuit of self – interest must be balanced and kept under control by moral
responsibilities to other people. Now let us consider a view called ―ethical Egoism‖
which challenges all the ethical theories and it tries to reduce morality to the pursuit
of self- interest. It is called  ̳egoism‘, because it says that the main duty of us is to
maximize our own good.
Personal well-being generally requires taking some large interest in others. But the
rational egoist insists that the only reason for showing an interest in others is for the
sake of oneself.
Define ethical egoism.(3marks)
Ethical Egoists try to protect their positions by arguing that an ironic importance of
everyone rationally pursuing one‘s self-interest is that everyone get benefited. The
society benefits mostly when
(i) individuals pursue their private good and
(ii) (ii) corporations pursue maximum profits in a competitive free market. The

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 36 of 42
main idea here is that leads to the improvement of economy through which
benefiting everyone. Because, both the individual and the corporation know
very well that what is good for them and how best to pursue that good.
As per ethical egoism, people should always and only pursue their self – interest in a very
cautious manner to value the interest rationally on the basis of facts. Morality essentially
needs a willingness on the part of both individuals and corporations to place some
restrictions on the pursuit of private self –interests.
CUSTOMS & RELIGIONS
CUSTOMS & ETHICAL RELATIVISM

As we live in a society which is of increasingly diverse nature, it is more important to have
tolerance for various customs and outlooks. Hence the concept of ethical pluralism emerges.
It views that there may be alternative moral attitudes that are reasonable. But none of the
moral perspectives can be accepted completely by all the rational and the morally concerned
persons. Ethical pluralism allows the customs which plays an important role in deciding how
we should act. Moral values are many, varied and flexible. So, these moral values allow
considerable variation in how different individuals and groups understand and apply them
in their day-today activities. In other words, to be precise, reasonable persons always have
reasonable disagreement on moral issues, including issues in engineering ethics.
Ethical Relativism, an objectionable view, should not be confused with Ethical Pluralism.
As per Ethical relativism says that actions are morally right when they are approved by
law or custom and they are said to be wrong when they violate laws or customs. Ethical
relativism tries to reduce moral values to laws, conventions and customs o f societies.
Why is it necessary for a person to accept ethical relativism? (7 marks)
1. The laws and customs seem to be definite, real and clear – cut. They help to reduce the
endless disputes about right and wrong. Moreover, laws seem to be an objective way to
approach values. The above argument is somewhat weak. This reason underestimates the
extent to which ordinary moral reasons are sufficiently objective to make possible criticism
of individual prejudice and bias. Moreover, moral reasons allow objective criticism of the
given laws as morally inadequate. For example, the apartheid laws (racial segregation) in

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 37 of 42
south Africa. This law violated the human rights are not given any legal protections to the
majority of the blacks, but morally ought to be.
2. The second reason for accepting ethical relativism is because it believes the values are
subjective at the cultural level. They also state that the moral standards are varied from one
culture to another. The only kind of objectivity is relative to a given set of laws in a given
society. This relativity of morality encourages the virtue of tolerance of difference among
societies.
The above said argument is also confusing one. It assumes that e t h i c a l relativism is
implied by descriptive relativism. i.e., values and beliefs differ from culture to culture. There
is nothing self-certifying about the laws and beliefs. This can be explained by the following
illustration. Ethical relativism would allow that Hitler and his followers (Nazis) acted
correctly when they killed 6 million Jews, for their laws, customs, and beliefs which were
based on anti – Semitism (hostile to Jews).
So, ethical relativism refers anything but for the tolerant doctrine it pretends to be. But there is
nothing tolerant in accepting Nazi beliefs about morality admitting intolerant anti-Semitic
beliefs is not an act of tolerance.
The supporters of ethical relativism, generally say that an action is right ―for cultures‖ when
believe it as the right one.i.e., it is right ―for them‖ though not ―for us‖. So, beliefs, however
customary or widely shared, are not self-certifying whether we are talking about moral beliefs
or scientific beliefs.
3. The third reason is based on the moral relationalism or moral contextulaism. This states that
moral judgments must be made in relation to some factors which varies from case to case.
Making simple and absolute rules are impossible in this way. In most of the cases, customs
and laws are considered as morally important factors for making judgments.
All philosophers accepted this moral relationalism. But contemporary duty and right ethicists
like  ̳Kant‘ do not accept. As per their views, respecting people require some sensitiveness to
special circumstances. The virtue ethicists stress the role of practical wisdom in identifying the
facts which are relevant to assessment of conduct based on virtual manner.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 38 of 42
The ethical relativism was accepted by early cultural anthropologists because they had
a specified tendency to overstress the scope of moral difference between cultures.
Absorbed with unusual practices such as head – hunting, human sacrifices and
cannibalism (cannibal is a person who eats human flesh); these persons who shifted
their idea quickly form moral views differ greatly to ―Morality is a simply a culture as
such‖. But modern anthropologists state that all cultures by virtual show some
commitment to promote social co- operation and protect their members against
needless death and suffering. Moral differences are based only on the circumstances
and facts, not on the difference in moral attitudes. For example, we can consider the
practice of human sacrifice in the Aztecs. [Members of a former Indian people who
ruled Mexico before the 16th century]. This practice seems to be a sign of cruelty and
lack of concern for life. But a full examination of their beliefs reveals that they believed
their gods are pleased by such sacrifice to ensure the survival of their people and also it
was considered an honour for the victims. Refer to the sacrifice or placing chicken and
goat to God.

RELIGION & DIVINE COMMAND ETHICS

Moral responsibilities and religious belief are intertwined in many positive ways. First,
they are related historically. Our moral views have been shaped by the most known
central moral values within the major world religions. For example, the Judeo-Christian
tradition has been influential in Western countries like England, USA etc. Islam has
been having a great influence in Middle East countries such as Saudi Arabia, Kuwait,
Pakistan etc.Confucianism has been influential in China and Buddhism, Hinduism and
Taoism have been famous in Asian countries.
Second, most of the people still having beliefs and show some important and inevitable
psychological connections between their moral and religious beliefs. Religious views
frequently support moral responsibility by providing additional motivation for being
moral. Faith in Religions or religious hopes implies trust. This trust gives an inspiration
to be moral.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 39 of 42

15. What are the types of enquiries in Engineering Ethics?
QUESTIONS (3 Marks)

1. Define Ethics? What is the need to study Ethics?
2. What is Engineering Ethics?
3. What is the scope of engineering ethics?
4. Define Engineering Ethics.
5. Explain the importance of Ethics in engineering profession.
6. Write any two basic goals of engineering ethics.
7. What are the applications of engineering ethics?
8. Differentiate the two words ethics and morals.
9. Write the technical judgements of an Engineer.
10.What are the moral aspects of an Engineer?
11.What are the technical functions involved in ethical decisions?
12.What is Micro and Macro ethics?
13.Explain how moral issues are related with
(i)Environment (ii) Society (iii)Employee.

14.Explain the engineer's morality related with (i) Product (ii) Supplier and (iii) Employer.

16. What do you mean by factual enquiries?
17. What is bribe? Explain with an example.
18. What is normative enquiry? Explain with an example
19. Define moral dilemmas. What are the types of moral dilemmas?
20. What do you mean by vagueness?
21. What are role conflicts in conflicting reasons?
22. How to analyse the moral dilemmas?
23. What are the steps in moral dilemmas?
24. Explain the concept of moral autonomy.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 40 of 42

25. What are the factors that are influenced the moral concern.
26. Briefly explain Kohlberg‘s theory
27. What are the three levels of moral developments in Kohlberg's theory?
28. Define preconvention level.
29. What are the difficulties in Kohlberg‘s theory?
30. Explain Gilligan's theory of moral development.
31. Explain why Gilligan's theory is also called as ethics of care.
32. What do you mean by post - conventional level in Gilligan‘s theory?
33. What is consensus and controversy?
34. What is the relationship between moral autonomy and authority?
35. What is profession and professionalism?
36. What is professional organization?
37. What are the obstacles or impediments to responsibility in professionalism?
38. Explain the concept of professionalism and virtues.
39. Discuss the various theories of virtues.
40. What are the types of virtues?
41. What do you mean by intellectual virtues? What is integrity and honesty?
42. What is moral responsibility and Legal responsibility?
43. What are the types of ethical values?
44. What is ethical relativism?
45. What are the uses of ethical theories?

ESSAY (14 Marks)

1. Discuss the scope and importance of ethics in engineering profession.
2. Senses or Dimensions of Engineering ethics:-Discuss.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 41 of 42
3. What are the technical judgements and moral aspects related to engineering ethics?
Explain any three with examples.
4. Discuss in detail various aspects of moral issues.
5. Explain how Engineering profession is related with (i) Environment (ii) Society
(iii) Government.
6. What are the types of enquiries? Explain each one with example?
7. Explain the concept of moral dilemmas.
8. What are the steps that confronting moral dilemmas?
9. What is moral autonomy? What are the factors that influenced the moral concern?
10.Explain the concept of Kohlberg's theory and give the difficulties of this theory,
11.Explain how Gilligan's theory differs from Kohlberg's theory.
12.Discuss in detail on consensus and controversy.
13.Explain the concept of profession and professionalism.
14.What are the professional roles to be played by an Engineer?
15.What is virtue ethics? Explain Aristotle‘s theory of the Golden mean?
16. What are the types of virtues explain any three?
17. Explain the following :(i) Integrity (ii) Honesty (iii)Self-respect.
18. What is the concept of accountability?
19. Self-interest, customs and Religion: -Discuss.
20. What are the uses of ethical theories and justify the moral claims about safety in
engineering?
21. Explain are the virtue that depicts the professional responsibility of an individual?
22a) What are the various professional roles played by an engineer?
b). Differentiate profession and professionalism

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 42 of 42
23 .Explain Aristotle theory of Golden mean? How far it is different from Kant‘s duty based
ethics theory?
24a) Explain right based ethics theory?
b) . Differentiate Act Act Utilitarianism and Rule Utilitarianism.
25. Differntiate ethical egoism & ethical relativism.

MODULE:3

ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
Engineering as Experimentation – Engineers as responsible Experimenters- Codes
of Ethics- Plagiarism- A balanced outlook on law - Challenges case study- Bhopal

Gas tragedy

Although the launching of maiden voyage of Titanic in 1912 was regarded as the most
wonderful engineering achievement, the most pathetic and tragic accident of Titanic claiming the
lives of 1500 people on board, could reflect the technical flaws and lack of far-sighted safety
measures. Technological advancements are to be thoroughly scrutinised and potentially assessed in
terms of certain massive failures in technical design systems that have resulted in some horrifying
historical incidents like Bhopal gas tragedy in India and Chernobyl nuclear plant at Ukraine (then
USSR).
It is a justifiable statement that engineering system involves typical experimental applications,
with a unique combination of ethical moral values. Positive features of engineering technology in
terms of its huge contributions and beneficial applications for human society, clearly outweigh its
negative features in terms of wrongful and harmful applications. The experimental procedures of
engineering technology produce a direct influence on "social and cultural systems of human
society".
Engineering itself is based on the improvement of current life, whether in terms of technology or
efficiency or availability with less financial efforts. The process of engineering lets you go
through a series of different experiments when it comes to practical use. Though it is not like an
experiment in laboratory under controlled conditions, which is done while learning, an engineer
should be ready to do the same on a social scale involving human subjects.
Experimentation is the main aspect of designing process. An engineer who is ought to design the
parts of a car, will be able to understand the result only when it is tested practically. Preliminary
simulations are conducted from time to time to know how the new concept of engineering acts in
its first rough design. Materials and processes are tried out, usually employing formal
experimental techniques. Such tests serve as a basis, which help in developing the final product.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
ENGINEERING AS EXPERIMENTATION

Before manufacturing a product or providing a project, we make several assumptions and
trials, design and redesign and test several times till the product is observed to be functioning
satisfactorily. We try different materials and experiments. From the test data obtained we make
detailed design and retests. The design processing which constitutes the vital component of
engineering technology is the dynamic outcome of several experimental procedures called
experimentation. These experimental techniques involve various sequential stages of testing that
lead to the formation of specific products. The designed production are further evaluated by
subjecting them to final phase of testing processes for their viable standards.
Thus, design as well as engineering is an interactive process as illustrated in Fig.given below.

Fig.1Design as an interactive process

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 3 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

Compare & Contrast engineering experiments with standard experiments.(8)

ENGINEERING PROJECTS VS. STANDARD EXPERIMENTS

Similarities to Standard Experiments

There are so many aspects, which are of virtual for combining every type of
engineering works to make it suitable look at engineering projects as experiments. The
main three important aspects are:
1) Any engineering project or plan is put into practice with partial ignorance because
while designing a model there are several uncertainties occurred. The reason to
the fact that engineers don’t have all the needed facts available well in advance
before starting the project. At some point, both the theoretical examining and the
laboratory testing must be by-passed for the sake of completing the project.
Really, the success of an engineer is based on the his talent which is exactly being
the ability to succeed in achieving jobs with only a partial knowledge of scientific
laws about the nature and society.
2) The final outcomes of engineering projects are generally uncertain like that of
experiments what we do. In engineering, in most of the cases, the possible
outcomes may not be known and even small and mild projects itself involve
greater risks. The following uncertainties occur in the model designs
1. Model used for the design calculations
2. Exact characteristics of the material purchased.
3. Constancies of materials used for processing and fabrication.
4. About the nature of the pressure the finished product will encounter.
For instance, a reservoir may cause damage to the surroundings and affect the
eco- system. If it leaks or breaks, the purpose will not be served. A special
purpose fingerprint reader may find its application in the identification and close
observation on the disagreeing persons with the government. A nuclear reactor
may cause unexpected problems to the surrounding population leading to a great
loss to the owners. A hair dryer may give damage to the unknowing or wrong
users from asbestos insulation from its barrel.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 4 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
3) Good and effective engineering depends upon the knowledge possessed about the
products at the initial and end stages.
This knowledge is very useful for increasing the effectiveness of the current products as
well as for producing better products in future. This can be achieved by keenly observing
on the engineering jobs by the way of experimentation. This monitoring is done by
making periodic observations and tests by looking at for the successful performance and
the side effects of the jobs. The tests of the product’s efficiency, safety, cost-effectiveness,
environmentalimpactanditsvaluethatdependsupontheutilitytothesociety should also be
monitored. It also extends to the stage of client use.

Comparisons with standard Experiments
1. Experimental Control

Members for two groups should be selected in a standard experimental control,
i.e Group A and Group B. The members of the group “A‟should be given the
specialexperimentaltreatment.Thegroup„B‟donotreceivethesamethoughthey are in the same
environment. This group is called the ‘control group’
Though it is not possible in engineering but for the projects which are confirmed to laboratory
experiments. Because, in engineering the experimental subjects are human beings who are out of
the control of the experimenters. In engineering, the consumers have more control as they are the
selecting authority of a project. So in engineering it is impossible to follow a random selection.
An engineer has to work only with the past data available with various groups who use the
products.
So engineering can be viewed as a natural experiment which uses human subjects. But today,
most of the engineers do not care for the above said Experimental Control.
Explain informed consent? (7)

2. Informed Consent

Engineeringiscloselyrelatedtothemedicaltestingofnewdrugsandtechniqueson human beings as it
also concerned with human beings.
When new medicines have been tested, it should be informed to the persons

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 5 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

whoundergothetest.Theyhavemoralandlegalrightstoknowaboutthefactwhich is based on
“informed consent” before take part in the experiment. Engineering must also recognize these
rights. When a producer sells a new product to a firm which has its own engineering staff,
generally there will be an agreement regarding the risks and benefits form that testing.
Informed consent has two main principles such as knowledge and voluntariness. First, the
persons who are put under the experiment has to be given all the needed information to make an
appropriate decision. Second, they must enter into the experiment without any force, fraud and
deception. The experimenter has also to consider the fundamental rights of the minorities and
the compensation for the harmful effects of that experiment.
In both medicine and engineering there may be a large gap between the experimenter and
his knowledge on the difficulties of an experiment. This gap can be filled only when it is
possible to give all the relevant information needed for drawing a responsible decision on
whether to participate in the experiment or not.
In m e d i c i n e , before prescribing a medicine to the patient, a responsible physician
must search for relevant information on the side effects of the drug. The hospital
management must allow him to undergo different treatments to different patients and
finally the patient must be ready to receive that information from the physician. Similarly,
it is possible for an engineer to give relevant information about a product only when there
is a better co-operation by the management and quick acceptance from the customers.
List the essential conditions for a valid informed consent.(7)
The following conditions are essential for a valid informed consent
a. The consent must be given voluntarily and not by any force.
b. The consent must be based on the relevant information needed by a
rational person and should be presented in a clear and easily
understandable form.
c. The consenter must be capable of processing the information and to make
rational decisions in a quick manner.
d. The information needed by a rational person must be stated in a form to
understand without any difficulty and has to be spread widely.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 6 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
e. The experimenter’s consent has to be offered in absentia of the experimenter
b y a group which represents many experiments.
Knowledge Gained

Scientific experiments have been conducted to acquire new knowledge. Whereas
engineering projects are conducted as experiments not for getting new knowledge.
Suppose the outcomes of the experiment is best, it tells us nothing new, but merely
affirms that we are right about something. Meanwhile, the unexpected outcomes put
us search for new knowledge.
Evaluate how an engineer can be a responsible experimenter. (7 )
ENGINEERS AS RESPONSIBLE EXPERIMENTERS)

Engineers as Experimenters

An overall analysis has to be made about the bounden responsibilities of professional
engineers to society. Engineers, who are considered to be the 'technical contributors',
owe their responsibilities and commitments to managements and the public society.
Engineers are credited with the responsible duties to make the clients and public to be
conscious about the problems and risks that are involved in the projects undertaken by
them. In the process of developing a product, an engineer generally learns through
experimentation. To simply put, a trial and error method is the mostly used one to
obtain results, but that goes with some calculations. Hence, we can say that, primarily
any experiment is carried out with partial ignorance. Even the outcomes of the
experiments may not be as expected. An engineer should always be ready for the
unexpected output. The improvement of current prototype will lead to some change
which may or may not be fruitful.

Why engineers are called responsible experimenters? (7)

If at all, engineers could be regarded as 'responsible persons', it is better to highlight their
characteristic features in the following:
1. Engineers have the moral obligation to provide protection to the continued safety of human
subjects thereby respecting their sentiments and right of consent.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 7 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

2. They have total awareness of the experimental nature of the projects and are capable to
foreseeing any future side effects and risks. They have their own capabilities of rectifying
defects through their far-sighted planning strategies.
3. They are personally motivated to have a dedicated involvement in all aspects of a project.
4. They have the flexible tendency to become accountable for all the outcome of result of a
project.
5. Exhibiting their technical competence and other characteristics of
professionalism.
The above-mentioned features exhibit professional competence of engineers and firmly
emphasize the 'specific style of engineering procession.
Define Conscientiousness. (3)

CONSCIENTIOUSNESS

The term conscientiousness strictly means awareness which warrants an individual to examine
and approach the social problems in an open-minded and fair manner. It is admissible in true
sense that working atmosphere of engineers sometimes restricts their moral implications and
commitments.
Conscientious moral commitment means:
(a) Being sensitive to full range of moral values and responsibilities relevant to the prevailing
situation and
(b) the willingness to develop the skill and put efforts needed to reach the best balance possible
among those considerations. In short, engineers must possess open eyes, open ears, and an open
mind (i.e., moral vision, moral listening, and moral reasoning).This makes the engineers as social
experimenters, respect foremost the safety and health of the affected, while they seek to enrich their
knowledge, rush for the profit, follow the rules, or care for only the beneficiary. The human rights of
the participant should be protected through voluntary and informed consent.
As already pointed out, most of engineers who are the 'salaried employees' are subjected to
varieties of professional and non-professional pressures within their bureaucrat systems. Social
commitments, compulsion for livelihood and family commitments are the crucial factors which
would prevail upon the employees to become obliged to their employers. Avoidance of certain
negative qualities such as misinterpretation of scientific or engineering data, violation of patent

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 8 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

rights and breaching of trustworthiness would lead to the fulfilment of moral aspirations
by engineers.
Define Informed Consent. (3)

INFORMED CONSENT

As a responsible engineer, one should be informed of the facts so as to be conscious.
Theengineeredproductsofthecompanyshouldbeinsuchawaythattheycannever be used to
perform any illegal or unsocial activities, which
causesdestruction.Itistobeobservedthatifacompanyproducessomeproductsthatareoutoffas
hion or the items which promote wastage of energy and do not fetch in benefits, such
things are to be well explained to the employer and alternative solutions should also be
suggested by the engineers.
Define Moral Autonomy. (3)

MORAL AUTONOMY

Any person can be morally autonomous only when one is being genuine in one’s
commitment towards moral values. Moral beliefs and attitudes must be integrated into
an individual’s personality which leads to a committed action. The responsibility to
answer an unexpected result influences an engineer to involve himself personally into
the work. This leads to moral autonomy wherein, he also gains the trust of the
employer, through his commitment. Such responsible actions lead to great outcomes.
Explain the importance of accountability in professional life? (7)

ACCOUNTABILITY

Accountability can be understood as the moral responsibility that we have towards our
actions. It means a tendency to be willing to openly accept the moral examinations
towards one’s actions and being responsive to the assessment of others. The gap
between casual responsibility and moral accountability is common in any profession,
along with engineering.
Let us now consider the following instances to understand accountability −

 When a group of persons are involved in the completion of a project, then the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 9 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
accountability refers to the group minimizing the chances of acceptance of moral
responsibility towards a specificaction, where each person makes only a small
contribution to something much larger.
 The accountability is diffused within the organization and one has to accept it.
Both credit and failure need to be considered for accountability where the
workisdiffusedandtheareasofpersonalaccountabilityaredelimitedwithin the
organization.
 At times, when the engineers are pressurized to move to another project while
the current is still underway, then the accountability is limited only for meeting
schedules.
 There is always amoral involvement beyond the laid down institutional role, where the
engineers cannot separate themselves from personal responsibilities of their work.
Define Code of Ethics. (3)
Explain the role of code of ethics in the service life of a professional?
(7)
Examine its merits & demerits. (7)

CODES OF ETHICS

The engineers who are represented as professionals, and who belong to a professional society
need to have some moral responsibilities. A code of conduct is important for engineers to
remain committed to their world. The engineering societies such as AAES, ABET, NSPE,
IEEE and AICTE have framed these codes of ethics which are helpful to engineers to
strengthen the moral issues on their work. The codes of ethics play at least eight important roles
such as the following:
The ‘codes of ethics’ exhibit, rights, duties, and obligations of the members of a profession and
a professional society. The codes exhibit the following essential roles:
1. Inspiration and guidance: The codes express the collective commitment of the profession to
ethical conduct and public good and thus inspire the individuals. They identify primary
responsibilities and provide statements and guidelines on interpretations for the professionals and
the professional societies.
2. Support to engineers: The codes give positive support to professionals for taking stands on moral
issues. Further they serve as potential legal support to discharge professional obligations.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 10 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

3. Deterrence (discourage to act immorally) and discipline (regulate to act morally):The codes
serve as the basis for investigating unethical actions. The professional societies sometimes revoke
membership or suspend/expel the members, when proved to have acted unethical. This sanction
along with loss of respect from the colleagues and the society are bound to act as deterrent.
4. Education and mutual understanding: Codes are used to prompt discussion and reflection on
moral issues. They develop a shared understanding by the professionals, public, and the government
on the moral responsibilities of the engineers. The Board of Review of the professional societies
encourages moral discussion for educational purposes.
5. Create good public image: The codes present positive image of the committed profession to the
public, help the engineers to serve the public effectively. They promote more of self- regulation and
lessen the government regulations. This is bound to raise the reputation of the profession and the
organization, in establishing the trust of the public.
6. Protect the status quo:They create minimum level of ethical conduct and promotes agreement
within the profession. Primary obligation namely the safety, health, and welfare of the public,
declared by the codes serves and protects the public.
7. Promotes business interests: The codes offer inspiration to the entrepreneurs, establish shared
standards, healthy competition, and maximize profit to investors, employees, and consumers.
The engineering societies have developed two types of codes of ethics with different
approaches. They are IEEE code and NSPE code. Both these codes differ in unique respects. While,
IEEE code (Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers) deals with simple and generalized
features in a crisp manner. Whereas, NSPE Code provides much more detailed aspects. The NSPE
code which is a longer version than IEEE code, covers more useful applications with a wide range
of explanations for the use of engineers.
Apart from this, societies such as American society of civil Engineers (ASCE) and
American society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) have also contributed their shares in
emphasizing the concepts of code of ethics. Similarly, several multinational companies in USA such
as Bechtel, Hughes Aircrafts, McDonnell Douglas and Texas Instruments have also formulated
their own codes of ethics for their employees and technically graded engineers.
Advantages of Codes of Ethics
Let us now see the following advantages of codes of ethics. The codes
 Set out the ideals and responsibilities of the profession.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 11 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
 Exert a de facto regulatory effect protecting both clients and professionals.
 Improve the profile of the profession.
 Motivate and inspire practitioners, by attempting to define their priority.
 Provide guidance on acceptable conduct.
 Raise awareness and consciousness of issues.
 Improve quality and consistency.

Limitations: The codes are not remedy for all evils. They have many limitations, namely:
1. General and vague wordings: Many statements are general in nature and hence unable to solve
all problems.
2. Not applicable to all situations: Codes are not sacred, and need not be accepted without criticism.
Tolerance for criticisms of the codes themselves should be allowed.
3. Often have internal conflicts: Many times, the priorities are clearly spelt out, e.g., codes forbid
public remarks critical of colleagues (engineers), but they actually discovered a major bribery,
which might have caused a huge loss to the exchequer.
4. They cannot be treated as final moral authority for professional conduct: Codes have flaws by
commission and omission. There are still some grey areas undefined by codes. They cannot be
equated to laws. After all, even laws have loopholes and they invoke creativity in the legal
practitioners.
5. Limited members: Only a few enroll as members in professional society and non-members
cannot be compelled.
6. Even as members of the professional society, many are unaware of the codes.
7. Different societies have different codes: The codes cannot be uniform or same! Unifying the
codes may not necessarily solve the problems prevailing various professions, but attempts are still
made towards these unified codes.
8. Codes are said to be coercive: They are sometimes claimed to be threatening and forceful.

PLAGIARISM

Define Plagiarism. (3)
Plagiarism is defined in multiple ways in higher education institutions and
universities. For example:

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 12 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
 Stanford sees plagiarism as the "use, without giving reasonable and
appropriate credit to or acknowledging the author or source, of another
person's original work, whether such work is made up of code, formulas, ideas,
language, research, strategies, writing or other form."
 Yale views plagiarism as the "use of another's work, words, or ideas without
attribution" which includes "using a source's language without quoting, using
information from a source without attribution, and paraphrasing a source in a
form that stays too close to the original."
 Princeton perceives plagiarism as the "deliberate" use of "someone else's
language, ideas, or other original (not common-knowledge) material without
acknowledging its source."
 Oxford characterizes plagiarism as the use of "a writer's ideas or phraseology
without giving due credit."
 Brown defines plagiarism to be "appropriating another person's ideas or words
(spoken or written) without attributing those word or ideas to their true source".

Avoid Plagiarism

North western's "Principles Regarding Academic Integrity" defines plagiarism as
"submitting material that in part or whole is not entirely one's own work without
attributing those same portions to their correct source." Plagiarism can occur in many
forms besides writing: art, music, computer code, mathematics, and scientific work can
also be plagiarized. This document pays special attention to plagiarism in writing, but
it is important to understand that unauthorized collaboration in a math or science
assignment is also plagiarism.
In all academic work, and especially when writing papers, we are building upon the
insights and words of others. A conscientious writer always distinguishes
clearlybetweenwhathasbeenlearnedfromothersandwhatheorsheispersonally
contributing to the reader's understanding. To avoid plagiarism, it is important to
understand how to attribute words and ideas you use to their proper source.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 13 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

Guidelines for Proper Attribution

Everyone in the university needs to pay attention to the issue of proper attribution. All
of us--faculty and students together--draw from a vast pool of texts, ideas, and findings
that humans have accumulated over thousands of years; we could not
thinktoanyproductiveendwithoutit.Eventhesuddeninsightsthatappearatfirst glance to
arrive out of nowhere come enmeshed in other people's thinking. What we call
originality is actually the innovative combining, amending, or extending of material
from that pool.
Hence each of us must learn how to declare intellectual debts. Proper attribution
acknowledges those debts responsibly, usefully, and respectfully. An attribution is
responsible when it comes at a location and in a fashion that leaves readers in no doubt
about whom you are thanking for what. It is useful when it enables readers to find your
source readily for themselves. You help them along the way, just as that same source

helped you along yours. To make sure that our attributions are useful, we double-
check them whenever we can. Quite literally, it is a habit that pays. Colleagues in

every field appreciate the extra care. Nothing stalls a career faster than sloppy,
unreliable work.
Finally, an attribution is respectful when it expresses our appreciation for something
done well enough to warrant our borrowing it. We should take pride in the intellectual
company we keep. It speaks well of us that we have chosen to use the work of
intelligent, interesting people, and we can take genuine pleasure in joining our name
with theirs.
Explain the term balanced outlook on law. (3)
A BALANCED OUTLOOK ON LAW

The ‘balanced outlook on law’ in engineering practice stresses the necessity of laws and
regulations and also their limitations in directing and controlling the engineering
practice. Laws are necessary because, people are not fully responsible by themselves
and because of the competitive nature of the free enterprise, which does not encourage
moral initiatives. Laws are needed to provide a minimum level of compliance. The
necessity of laws and regulations and the limitations they have in engineering practice

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 14 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
can be understood with an overview of the laws in the Engineering profession. To live
in harmony in the society, one should learn to maintain a balance between individual
needs and collective needs of the society. The following codes are typical examples of
how they were enforced in the past:
Explain the Babylon’s Building code and The United States Steamboat
Code. (14)

I. CODE FOR BUILDERS BY HAMMURABI
Hammurabi the king of Babylon in 1758 framed the following code for the builders:
“If a builder has built a house for a man and has not made his work sound and the house which he
has built has fallen down and caused the death of the householder, that builder shall be put to death.
If it causes the death of the householder’s son, they shall put that builder’s son to death. If it causes
the death of the householder’s slave, he shall give slave for slave to the householder. If it destroys
property, he shall replace anything it has destroyed; and because he has not made the house sound
which he has built and it has fallen down, he shall rebuild the house which has fallen down from his
own property. If a builder has built a house for a man and does not make his work perfect and the
wall bulges, that builder shall put that wall in sound condition at his own cost “This code was
expected to put in self-regulation seriously in those years.

II. STEAM BOAT CODE IN USA

Whenever there is crisis we claim that there ought to be law to control this. Whenever there is a fire
accident in a factory or fire cracker’s store house or boat capsize we make this claim, and soon
forget. Laws are meant to be interpreted for minimal compliance. On the other hand, laws when
amended or updated continuously would be counterproductive. Laws will always lag behind the
technological development. The regulatory or inspection agencies such as Environmental authority
of India can play a major role by framing rules and enforcing compliance. In the early 19th century,
a law was passed in USA to provide for inspection of the safety of boilers and engines in ships. It
was amended many times and now the standards formulated by the American Society of Mechanical
Engineers are followed.
A few independent organisations such as Food and Drug Administration (FDA), Federal
Aviation Agency (FAA) and the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) came into existence in
USA for monitoring an over-all control on varieties of industries. Industries seriously complained

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 15 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

about the severe restrictions imposed by regulatory agencies. One should be aware of the fact that
the valid reasons for the enforcement of these strict and stringent laws were due to the lacunae in the
regulative laws.

PROPER ROLE OF LAW IN ENGINEERING

Good laws when enforced effectively produce benefits. They establish minimal standards of
professional conduct and provide a motivation to people. Further they serve as moral support and
defense for the people who are willing to act ethically.
Thus, it is concluded that:
1. The rules which govern engineering practice should be construed as of responsible
Experimentation rather than rules of a game. This makes the engineer responsible for the safe
conduct of the experiment.
2. Precise rules and sanctions are suitable in case of ethical misconduct that involves the violation of
established engineering procedures, which are aimed at the safety and the welfare of the public.
3. In situations where the experimentation is large and time consuming, the rules must not try to
cover all possible outcomes, and they should not compel the engineers to follow rigid courses of
action.
4. The regulation should be broad, but make engineers accountable for their decisions, and
5. Through their professional societies, the engineers can facilitate framing the rules, amend
wherever necessary, and enforce them, but without giving-in for conflicts of interest.

THE CHALLENGER CASE STUDY

List a few factual issues, conceptual issues, and moral/normative issues in the
space shuttle challenger issue.(14)
The world has known about much number of accidents. Among them, the explosion of the space
shuttle Challenger is one of the most familiar ones. Back then, this case had been reviewed
vigorously by media coverage, government reports and transcripts of hearings. This case deals
with many ethical issues which engineers faced.
It poses many questions before us. A few questions are listed below −

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 16 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
 What is the exact role of the engineer when safety issues are concerned?
 Who should have the ultimate authority for decision making to order for a
launch?
 Whether the ordering of a launch is engineering or a managerial decision?

Challenger space shuttle mainly consisted of an orbiter, two solid propellant boosters
and a single liquid-propeller booster, which was actually designed to be a reusable one.
All the boosters were ignited and the orbiter took a lift-off from the earth. But the cold
temperature caused trouble to the O-rings which were eroded. The accident took place
on 28th January 1986, due to the failure of one of the solid boosters. In the design of the
space shuttle, the main parts which needed careful design of the fields joints where the
individual cylinders were placed together.

The assembly mainly consists of tang and clevis joints which are sealed by two O-
rings, whose function is to prevent the combustion gases of the solid propellant from

escaping. The O-rings were eroded by hot gases, as these were made up of synthetic
rubber. But this was not a serious problem, as the solid rocket boosters were only for
reuse initially for the few minutes of the flight. If the erosion of the O-rings could be
restrained from completely burning out then the design of the joint would be acceptable.

In the post flight experiment in 1985, the Thiokol engineers noticed black soot and
grease on the outside of the boosters due to the leakage of hot gases blown through the
O-rings. This raised a doubt on the resiliency of the materials used for the O- rings.
Thiokol engineers redesigned the rings with steel billets to withstand the hot
gases.Butunfortunatelythisnewdesignwasnotreadybythattimeofflightin1986.

DELAY IN LAUNCH

The political conditions under which NASA operated is the main cause for unavoidable delay in
the decision to be taken for the shuttle performance. The launching date had already been
postponed for the availability of the then Vice President George Bush, the space NASA

supporter. Later, the launch further got delayedduetoaprobleminmicroswitchinthehatch-
lockingmechanism.Thecold weather problem and long discussions went on among the

engineers. The number of tele-conferences further delayed the previous testing in 1985itself.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 17 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

The O-rings required temperature bearings of 53°F whereas the challenger had temperature
bearings of only 29°F, which was far below the environment temperature at which NASA had
the previous trail. This might not be matter of concern, as the revised final decision made with
the available data then, was that there was no correlation between the temperature and the
degree at which O-rings had eroded by the blow-by gas in the previous launch. Assuming a
safety concern due to cold weather, though the data were not concluded satisfactorily, a decision
was taken not to delay further for so many reasons, and the launch was finally recommended.

UNEXPECTED CHANGE

But unexpectedly the overnight temperature at the time of launch was 8°F colder than ever
experienced. It was estimated that the temperature of the right hand
boosterwouldbeonlyat28°F.Thecameranoticedapuffofsmokecomingoutfrom the field joints as
soon as the boosters were ignited. But the O-rings were not positioned properly on their seats
due to extreme cold temperature. The putty used as heat resistant material was also too cold that

it failed to protect the O-rings. All these effects made the hot gases to burn past both the O-
rings, leading to a blow-by over an arc around the O-rings.

Thoughimmediatelyfurthersealingwasmadebytheby-productsofcombustionin the rocket
propulsion, a glassy oxide formed on the joints. The oxides which were temporarily
sealing the field joints at high temperature later were shattered by the
stressescausedbythewind.Againthejointswereopenedandthehotgasesescaped from the
solid boosters. But the boosters were attached to the large liquid fuel boosters as per the
design. This made the flames due to blow-by from the solid fuel boosters quickly to
burn through the external tank. This led to the ignition of the liquid propellant making
the shuttle exploded.
Later the accident was reviewed and investigations were carried out by the number of
committees involved and by various government bodies. President Regan appointed a
commission called the Rogers Commission which constituted of many distinguished scientists
and engineers. The eminent scientists in the commission after thorough examination and
investigations gave a report on the flexibility of the material and proved that the resiliency of the
material was not sufficient and drastically reduced during the cold launch.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 18 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

After the hearings of the commission, Thiokol engineers and NASA investigated possible causes
of the explosion, which led to a lot of arguments among the other officials that this investigating
team is trying to look for other causes, which are not at all plausible. However, the debacle
highlights how lack of responsibility and morality, improper functions, and lax performance of
duties of the engineers resulted in the failure of the launch.
Some of the factual issues, conceptual issues and moral/normative issues in the space shuttle
challenger incident are highlighted hereunder for further study.
MORAL/NORMATIVE ISSUES

1. The crew had no escape mechanism. Douglas, the engineer, designed an abort module to allow
the separation of the orbiter, triggered by a field-joint leak. But such a ‘safe exit’ was rejected as too
expensive, and because of an accompanying reduction in payload.
2. The crew were not informed of the problems existing in the field joints. The principle of informed
consent was not followed.
3. Engineers gave warning signals on safety. But the management group prevailed over and ignored
the warning.

CONCEPTUAL ISSUES

1. NASA counted that the probability of failure of the craft was one in one lakh launches. But it was
expected that only the 100000th launch will fail.
2. There were 700 criticality-1 items, which included the field joints. A failure in any one of them
would have caused the tragedy. No back-up or stand-bye had been provided for thesecriticality-1
components.

FACTUAL/DESCRIPTIVE ISSUES

1. Field joints gave way in earlier flights. But the authorities felt the risk is not high.
2. NASA has disregarded warnings about the bad weather, at the time of launch, because they
wanted to complete the project, prove their supremacy, get the funding from Government continued
and get an applaud from the President of USA.
3. The inability of the Rockwell Engineers (manufacturer) to prove that the lift-off was unsafe. This
was interpreted by the NASA, as an approval by Rockwell to launch.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 19 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION
BHOPAL GAS TRAGEDY

List a few factual issues, conceptual issues, and moral/normative issues in the
Bhopal Gas Tragedy.(14)
Bhopal’s Gas tragedy is the world’s worst industrial disaster that occurred in 1984, due to the
gas leakage from a pesticide production plant, The Union Carbide India Limited (UCIL)
located in Bhopal, Madhya Pradesh. It was believed that’s lack management and deferred
maintenance together created a situation where routine pipe maintenance caused a backflow of
water into the MIC tank, triggering the disaster.
It is a catastrophe that has no parallel in industrial history. In the early morning hours of
December 3, 1984 a rolling wind carried a poisonous grey cloud past the walk of the 'Union
Carbide Plant ‘at Bhopal, India. Union Carbide's pesticide- manufacturing plant in Bhopal,
leaked 42 tons of the deadly gas Methyl Isocyanate (MIC) into a sleeping, impoverished
community - killing 3000, injuring 200,000 people.

WHAT LED TO THE DISASTER?

In the early hours of December 3rd, 1984, a rolling wind carried a poisonous gray cloud from the
Union Carbide Plant in Bhopal, Madhya Pradesh of India. The poisonous gas released was 40tons
of MethylIsoCyanate (MIC).This particular gas is very toxic that leaked and spread throughout
the city. The residents of the city, woke up to the clouds of suffocating gas and struggled to
breath. They started running desperately through the dark streets. The victims arrived at hospitals,
breathless and blind. The people who survived had their lungs, brain, eyes, muscles affected
severely. Their gastro intestinal system, neurological, reproductive and immune systems were
also dangerously affected. By the morning, when the sun rose clearly, the roads were all filled
with dead bodies of humans and animals, the trees turned black and the air filled with foul smell.
• 1. The plant was established in 1969 in which Union Carbide Corp. shares 51% and remaining by
state authority. A chemical called Methyl Isocynate (MIC) was used as raw material to produce
pesticide hence factory stored a large amount of MIC.
• 2. On the faithful night of 2nd December, 1984 a regular maintenance activity was under
progress. During pipeline washing workers observed a leak and little attention was given with

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 20 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

casual remedial actions. But leak continued and pressure in one of the MIC tanks increased
beyond acceptance limit.
• 3. Due to water leak in tank lead by exothermic reaction, concrete tank cracked and relief valve
of plant gave away large amount of MIC in the atmosphere.
4. Now the workers understood the scale of disaster and hence tried at their level best to activate
safety system present in factory. But none of the safety system was in working condition. By that
time workers felt that nothing can stop this disaster.
5. As on the three sides of the plant people used to live in slums and hence people living in this area
were the worst sufferers. Due to delayed use of warning and alarming system, most of the people
left unwarned. As an effect of MIC gas leakage people started suffering through suffocation,
vomiting and other health problems. On the same night around 3000 people died and another 8000
people died within week and yet another 15000-20000 people died over a period of time. Still a half
a million people directly or indirectly affected due to poisonous gas.
Investigations into the tragedy show that there were many shortcomings on all levels, which

are listed as below

• 1. Union Carbide Factory did not have much information about safe storage of these highly
toxic gases.
• 2. The Medical fraternity did not have the requisite about how to deal with contamination of
this level.
• 3. The lack of co-ordination between factory and emergency services.
• 4. Lack of trained personnel in the factory along with impact of cost cutting on safety of
plant, its employees and the people living around the plant.
• 5. Location of factory in dense populated area which is against many norms.
• 6. Negligence to similar events reported by workers such as leak of Phosgene on 25th
December, 1981; another leak on 9th January 1982 from higher authority.

CASUAL FACTORS

• Three protective systems out of service.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 21 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

• Plant was understaffed due to costs.
• Very high inventory of MIC, an extremely toxic material.
• The accident occurred in the early morning.
• Most of the people killed, lived in a shanty town located very close to the plant fence.
This gruesome tragedy has greatly exposed the serious lacunae and lapses in the safety measures
taken by union carbide in the manufacturing of harmful and toxic insecticides or pesticides. The
drastic failures in fixing the moral responsibilities for this tragedy have strongly focussed on the
role of ethical values and applications to be framed by the multinational companies across the
entire world, not only for the prevention of environmental degradation but also to protect human
life.

THE FATAL EFFECTS

• As per government’s announcement, a total of 3,787 deaths occurred immediately. Around
8,000 of the survivors died within two weeks and other 8,000 or more died from acute
diseases caused due to the gas later.
• A government affidavit in 2006 stated that the gas leak incident caused 5, 58,125injuries,
including 38,478 temporary partial injuries and approximately 3,900 severely and
permanently disabling injuries. None can say if future generations will not be affected.
• Initial effects of exposure were −
• Coughing, Severe eye irritation, Feeling of suffocation, Burning sensation in the respiratory
tract, Blepharospasm, Breathlessness, Stomach pains, Vomiting
• The staff at the nearby hospitals lacked the knowhow required to treat the casualties in such
situations. To add to this, there is no antidote known for MIC. Hence, even after running to
the hospitals, the survivors could not be cured and most of them had to face death eventually.
Primary causes of deaths were – Choking, Reflexogenic Circulatory Collapse, Pulmonary
Edema, Cerebral Edema, Tubular Necrosis, Fatty Degeneration of the Liver, Necrotizing
Enteritis

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 22 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

• As an after effect of this disaster, the rate of stillbirths increased by 300% and the neonatal
mortality rate by around 200%. This came to be known as the world’s worst disaster in the
industrial sector. Since the disaster, India has experienced rapid industrialization. While some
positive changes in government policy and behavior of a few industries have taken place such
as The Environment Protection Act was passed in 1986, creation the Ministry of
Environment and Forests (MoEF) and strengthening India's commitment to the environment.
It established the importance of integrating environmental strategies into all industrial
development plans for the country.

QUESTIONS
Part-A
(3 –Mark Questions)

1. Engineering as experimentation: - Discuss.
2. What is sustained monitoring in engineering experimentation?
3. What is informed consent in social experimentation?
4. What are the essential conditions in valid consent?
5. Engineers as responsible Experimenters: - Discuss
6. Give a brief account of learning from the past mentioning two examples.
7. What do you mean by experimental control?
8. What are the characteristic features of Engineers as a responsible person?
9. Define the term "conscientiousness".
10. What is moral autonomy?
11. An Engineer requires moral justification and satisfaction- Discuss.
12. Write the salient features of accountability.
13. What are the functions of code of ethics?
14. Distinguish between code of ethics and code of conduct.
15. Explain how the codes of ethics inspire and guide the Engineers.
16. Use of ethical codes in an educational institution:-Discuss:
17. What are the Limitations of code of ethics?
18. Codes cannot serve as final authority: - Discuss.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 23 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

19. What is ‘balanced outlook on law’ stress in engineering practice?
20. What is said to be a 'regulated society'?
21. What do you mean by industrial standards?
22. What are the objectives and functional roles of standards?
23. Problems with law in engineering: - Discuss.
24. Explain how good laws and ethical conduct act as a protector of ethical engineer.
25. Discuss: Challenger case study.
26. What was the technical failure in challenger case?
27. What is meant by ‘informed consent’ when bringing an engineering product to market?
28.List a few factual issues, conceptual issues, and moral/normative issues in the space shuttle challenger
issue.

PART-B
ESSAY (14 Marks)

1. "Engineering as experimentation plays an important role in the design process". Discuss this
statement.
2. Discuss briefly about the various aspects of engineers as responsible experimenters.
3. Briefly explain the moral autonomy of engineers.
4. Compare the engineering experiments with standard experiments.
5. Write a brief account on the internal infrastructure of space shuttle challenger, with a suitable
diagram on the field joints.
6. Write a brief note on the various aspects of safety issues in the challenger case.
7. Briefly explain the negative and positive features of codes of ethics.
8. Explain role of various rules and their ethical implications in engineering profession, by citing
ancient examples of codes.
9. What are the various limitations of codes and their implications on engineering profession?
10. Explain the following (a) Learning from the past (b) Informed consent
11. What is the proper role of law in Engineering?
12. What engineering aspects make it appropriate to view engineering projects as experiments?
13. What are the main elements included in informed consent? Enumerate the conditions that would
define valid consent.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 24 of 24

MODULE: 3 ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

14. Discuss the problems with law in engineering practice.
15. What are the general features of morally responsible engineers?
16. Discuss Bhopal Gas Tragedy.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 1 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 3
UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS

MODULE: 3

ENGINEERING AS SOCIAL EXPERIMENTATION

SHORT ANSWER (3 MARKS)
1. Indicate the advantages of using standards.
2. Point out the conditions required to define a valid consent.
3. Define plagiarism
4. Give three conditions essential for valid informed consent.
5. Explain the term balanced outlook on law.
6. What are the advantages of code of ethics?
7 .List out the limitations of code of ethics.
ESSAY

8. Describe the causes and fatal effects of Bhopal Gas tragedy. (7)
9. Illustrate the role of engineers as managers. (7)
10. Evaluate the importance of accountability in a professional’s life. (6)
11. Explain the role of Codes of Ethics in the service life of a professional
Engineer.
12. What are the different roles and functions of “codes of ethics”. (14)
13. Explain the Bhopal Gas tragedy .Discuss the violation of moral,
ethics, and professional codes of standards in it.
14. Explain the Babylon’s Building code and The United States
Steamboat Code. (14)
15. Explain about Bhopal Gas Tragedy and write its cause and fatal
effect.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 3

MODULE :4

RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

Collegiality and loyalty – Managing conflict- Respect for authority- Collective
bargaining- Confidentiality-Role of confidentiality in moral integrity-Conflicts of
interest- Occupational crime- Professional rights-Employee right- IPR
Discrimination
Responsibilities and rights play an important role in any professional career because of their
close association with the development and sustained maintenance of any organisation.
Professional responsibilities and rights are the two basic criteria to be possessed by engineers
who have the moral obligations to fulfil the basic duties towards the betterment of a society or
community. The responsibilities and duties of engineers have a direct impact on the public
community with regard to the safety and risk assessment. These two criteria would enable the
engineers to become creative entrepreneurs to perform their duties with dedication and
enthusiasm. Loyalty to corporations, respect for authority, collegiality and other teamwork are a
few important virtues in the field of Engineering. Professionalism in engineering would be
threatened at every turn in a corporation driven with powerful egos. Robert Jackall, a
Sociologist criticizes professionalism saying, ―what is right in the corporation is what the guy
above you wants from you. That‘s what morality is in thecorporation.‖
In order to understand how good the ethical factors in a corporate world should be,let us consider
the following points −

 Ethical values in their full complexity are widely acknowledged and
appreciated by managers and employeesalike.
 Inanethicalcorporateclimate,theuseofethicallanguageishonestlyapplied and
recognized as a legitimate part of corporatedialogue.
 Top management sets a moral tone in words, in policies and by personal
example.
 The procedures should be followed for conflictresolution.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
The various aspects of responsibilities and rights and their interactions with other professional
factors are discussed in detail as below:
Explain how can you improve collegiality in an organisation where you are
presently employed? (7)
Differentiate collegiality & loyalty.(3)

COLLEGIALITY & LOYALTY

Collegiality and Loyalty are the two important virtues that are shown by engineers in
performing their duties. According to engineering code of ethics, collegiality is considered to be an
act that constitutes disloyalty. Craig Ihara defines the term collegiality as a kind of
connectedness based on professional commitment to thegoals and values of profession. The
national society of professional Engineers (NSPE) code states that engineers shall not attempt to
injure maliciously or falsely, directly or indirectly, professional reputation, prospects,
practice or employment of other engineers, nor untruthfully criticize other engineer's work.
Engineers who believe others are guilty of unethical or illegal practise shall present such
information to the proper authority for action. Collegiality is a kind of support to a professional
expert. It involves cooperation respect, commitment, connectedness and cooperation among
colleagues.
Define Loyalty.(3)

LOYALTY

Loyalty, in general use, is a devotion and faithfulness to a nation, cause, philosophy, country,
group, or person. Philosophers disagree on what can be an object of loyalty,as some argue that
loyalty is strictly interpersonal and only another human being can be the object of loyalty. The
definition of loyalty in law and political science is
thefidelityofanindividualtoanation,eitherone'snationofbirth,orone'sdeclared home nation by
oath(naturalization).
1. Loyaltiesdifferinbasisaccordingtotheirfoundations.Theymaybeconstructed
uponthebasisofunalterablefactsthatconstituteapersonalconnectionbetweenthe
subject tandtheobjectoftheloyalty,suchasbiologicaltiesorplaceofbirth(anotion of
natural allegiance propounded by Socrates in his political theory). Alternatively,
they may be constructed from personal choice and evaluation of criteria with a full

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
degree of freedom. The degree of control that one has is not necessarily simple;
Nathanson points out that whilst one has no choice as to one's parents or relatives,
one can choose to desertthem.
2. Loyaltiesdifferinstrength:Theycanrangefromsupremeloyalties,thatoverride all
other considerations, to merely presumptive loyalties, that affect one's
presumptions, providing but one motivation for action that is weighed against other
motivations. Nathanson observes that strength of loyalty is often interrelated with
basis."Bloodisthickerthanwater",statesanaphorism,explainingthatloyaltiesthat have
biological ties as their bases are generallystronger.
3. Loyaltiesdifferinscope.Theyrangefromloyaltieswithlimitedscope,thatrequire few
actions of the subject, to loyalties with broad or even unlimited scopes, which
require many actions, or indeed to do whatever may be necessary in support of the
loyalty. Loyalty to one's job, for example, may require no more action than simple
punctuality and performance of the tasks that the job requires. Loyalty to a family
member can, in contrast, have a very broad effect upon one's actions, requiring
considerable personal sacrifice. Extreme patriotic loyalty may impose an unlimited
scope of duties. Scope encompasses an element of constraint. Where two or more
loyalties conflict, their scopes determine what weight to give to the alternative
courses of action required by eachloyalty.
Finally,loyaltiesdifferintheattitudethatthesubjectsoftheloyaltieshave towards other
people. (Note that this dimension of loyalty concerns the subjects of the loyalty,
whereas legitimacy, above, concerns the loyalties themselves.) People may have one
of a range of possible attitudes towards others who do not share their loyalties, with
hate and disdain at one end, indifference in the middle, and concern and positive
feeling at theother.
Explain the types of loyalty? (4)
Loyalty is the faithful adherence to an organization and the employer. Loyalty to an
employer can be either of the two types :

 Agency-loyalty: Agency-loyaltyisactingtofulfilone‘scontractualdutiesto an
employer. This is entirely a matter of actions, such as doing one‘s job and not
stealing from one‘s employer, irrespective of the motive behindit.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

 Attitude-loyalty:Attitude-loyalty has a lot to do with attitudes, emotions and a
sense of personal identity as it does with actions. It can be understood that
people who work grudgingly and spitefully are not loyal; in spite of the fact
they may adequately perform all their work responsibilities and hence
manifestagency loyalty.
Define Collegiality. (3)

COLLEGIALITY

Collegiality is the term that describes a work environment where responsibility and
authority are shared among the colleagues. When Engineering codes of ethics
mentioncollegiality,theygenerallyciteactsthatconstitutedareloyalty.Thedisloyalty of
professionals towards an organization, reflects the attitude they have towards the work
environment for the salaries they are paid and the trust the company has for them.

Collegiality is the relationship between colleagues. Colleague is taken to mean a
fellow member of the same profession, a group of colleagues united in a common
purpose, and used in proper names, such as Electoral College, College of Cardinals,
and College of Pontiffs.Colleagues are those explicitly united in a common purpose
and respecting each other's abilities to work toward that purpose. A colleague is an
associate in a profession or in a civil or ecclesiastical office. Collegiality can connote
respect for another's commitment to the common purpose and ability to work toward
it. In a narrower sense, members of the faculty of a university or college are each
other's colleagues.

Sociologists of organizations use the word collegiality in a technical sense, to create a
contrast with the concept of bureaucracy. Classical authors such as Max Weber
considercollegialityasanorganizationaldeviceusedbyautocratstopreventexperts and
professionals from challenging monocratic and sometimes arbitrarypowers.

TheNationalSocietyofProfessionalEngineers(NSPE)Code,forexample,statesthat ―Engineers
shall not attempt to injure, maliciously or falsely, directly or indirectly,
theprofessionalreputation,prospects,practiceoremploymentofotherengineers.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
Engineers who believe others are guilty of unethical or illegal practice shall present
such information to the proper authority for action‖.
Examine the major elements of collegiality. (7)
The main factors that help in maintain harmony among members at a workplace is:

• ELEMENTS OF COLLEGIALITY

 Respect: In general terms it means valuing another person for the skill he has .For
example doctors hold a very high esteem in the society In engineering it means the value
given by other professionals.
 Commitment: It means a promise of accomplishing a task.In case of employees it
denotes their enthusiasm to work for the company. The success and failure of the
organization depends upon the commitment of the employees for the organization.
 Connectedness: It denotes cooperative undertaking created by sharing their skill. It is a
sense of belonging to a particular organisation. In engineering it means a sense of utility
among the engineers.
In detail, the colleagues are to be respected for their work and contribution towards the
organizational goals and should be valued for their professional expertise and their
dedication towards the social goods promoted by the profession. Commitment
observed in the sense of sharing a devotion to the moral ideals inherent in one‘s
profession.Thecoordinationamongallthemembersataworkplaceortheawareness of
participating in cooperative projects based on shared commitments and mutual
support, also encourages the quality of thework.

MANAGING CONFLICT

Conflict in any work environment is inevitable for the simple reason that whenever
people have to work together they will not always be in perfect agreement on all
issues, goals, or perceptions. From this emerges a definition of conflict — a
―disagreement between two or more organisational members or groups arising
fromthefacttheymustshareresourcesofworkactivitiesand/orfromthefactthat
theyhavedifferentstatus,goals,valuesorperceptions.‖Inshort,conflictrefersto any kind of
opposition or antagonistic intersection between two or moreparties.
Conflict is inherently neither positive nor negative. If it is managed correctly, it can be
helpful (functional) in meeting the organisational goals. If it is mishandled or not

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
managedcorrectly,itcanbedestructive(dysfunctional).Inordertomanageconflict, a
manager needs to understand why conflict arises or what are itssources?
CAUSES OF CONFLICT

Conflictcanoccurthroughouttheorganisation:betweenoneindividualandanother,
between groups, between groups and individuals and the organization. In general it
arisesduetoproblemsincommunication(e.g.,misunderstandingsduetosemantics,
unfamiliar language, or ambiguous or incomplete information), personal relationships
(e.g., incompatibility of personal goals or social values of employees with the role
behaviour required by their jobs, or organisational structure (e.g.,
powerstrugglesbetweendepartmentswithconflictingobjectivesorrewardsystems,
competition for scarce resources, or interdependence of two or more groups to achieve
certain commongoals).Conflict may also arise due to certain personality
characteristics, such as authoritarianism or dogmatism. Such conflict resolution is
difficult.
Explain the various steps in managing conflicts in a
organization?(7)

Methods for Managing Conflict

1. CollectiveBargaining: It is the process of direct negotiation on a collective or group basis
between the representativesofemployersandtheiremployeesforthesettlementofdisputes.The
mutual rights and obligations of both parties that are agreed by them through nego- tiation are
written down in the form of an agreement or contract, which is legally binding onthem.

Collective bargaining can also be defined as:
(а) Negotiations between the management and the union for agreeing on as written
agreement covering the terms and conditions of settlement of the disputed issues.
(b) A give-and-take process involving proposals and counterproposals.
(c) Introduction of an element of democracy in the field of IndustrialRelations.
Collective bargaining prevents unilateral actions related to employees, and it imposes
certain restrictions upon the employer.

2. Conciliation&Mediation: If collective bargaining fails, then this may be adopted.Conciliation
consists of a series of conferences, including informal sitting between representatives of the two

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
parties, which are designed to create a friendly atmosphere, give and take attitude with a view to
ultimately smooth out the differences.When the conferences are held with an outsider as Chairman,
the process is known as  ̳Mediation‘. In this method, the presence of a third party acts as a
moderating influenceonthetwocontendingparties.Whattheythemselvescannotsettle,maybe solved
under the influence and with the suggestions of anoutsider.
3. Arbitration: When above two methods fail, then this can be adopted. In this, a third
person is chosen as the Arbitrator by agreement between the employers and employees. He
gives a hearing to both parties and then offers his own solution of the dispute.
In case of  ̳Voluntary Arbitration‘, the obligation to abide by his decision is moral one.
Under  ̳Compulsory Arbitration‘, the parties have to abide by it under compulsion of
law.In India, a legal provision for Conciliation and Arbitration has been made in the
Industrial Disputes Act, 1947.

Unfortunately, it has been experienced that both the procedures are not popular either
with the workers or the management. However, these have been found useful in
removing industrial disputes. The Whitley Commission has recommended the
establishment of such councils for the industries in India.In pursuance of this,
Government of India established Indian Labour Conference,
StandingLabourCommitteeandIndustrialCommitteesforplantations,coal,mining and
cotton textile industries. In the same manner, joint committees for factories are
beingestablished.

CONFLICT MANAGEMENT PROCESS

When a conflict, arises whether intra-individual, inter- individual; intra-group or inter-
group in an organisation, it must be resolved as early as possible. In an organisation,

there must be someone to intervene before the situation goes worse and generally a
superior helps to improve the situation.In order to resolve the conflict effectively the
seniors or superior should handle the situation carefully and take the following steps:

1.Preliminary step — knowing theconflict;
2. Diagnosing theissue;
3. Applying any of the conflict handlingmodes.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

1. Preliminary Step

The first stage in resolving the conflict is to know the full details of the conflict. As
soon as the conflict comes to the knowledge of the senior or superior, he should
handle the conflict skillfully.The first thing to note in the stage of conflict because, if
it is in its initial stage, it requires less efforts and much efforts will be needed at
advanced stage of conflict. Even the strategies used may also differ from stage to stage
though there is hardly a relationship between the stage of conflict and
strategiesused.Before analyzing the issues involved in the conflict, it should also be
considered that the person who is being entrusted the responsibility to intervene and
resolve the conflict, should be objective enough in handling theproblem.

Though, it is very difficult to keep emotions and sentiments out of the job and attain absolute
depersonalization, yet one can be objective if he keeps an open mind. For this purpose, one
should listen to views of individuals who are in conflict though
theymaynotbefullyinagreementwithhimprovidedtheindividualconcerneddoes not carry rigid
perception. The seniors or superior must try to keep the individual‘s mindopen.

2. Diagnosing theIssue:

In diagnosing the issues, the issues involved in the conflict should be analyzed and it should be
understood what this conflict is about. How far it has already involved. Thus, the nature of
conflict should be found out. Generally, conflict may arise due to facts, goals, methods,
andvalues.Inotherwords,factsatthedisposaloftwopartiesmaydifferortheirgoalsmaydiffer
ortheirmethodstobeusedfordoingaparticulartaskmaydifferortheirviewsabout what is good, bad,
wrong or right may differ. So, the person entrusted to handle the conflict must find out what
the conflict isabout.
The next thing in diagnosing the issue is to know why these differences between the
twopartieshavearised.Thefactorsresponsibleforpromotingthedifferencemaybe
informational,perceptual,rolefactorscanthelike.Attimes,theinformationreceived by two parties
may be different and therefore they may draw different conclusions. People may also have
differentbackgrounds.
Their beliefs, attitudes, values, and cultural norms may differ and therefore their perception may
differ. An individual may have different roles in different groups of which he is a member and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
these roles may clash or the role of one individual may differ from the other individual. For
Example — A senior or superior may have an urgency of getting a particular work done but the
sub-ordinates does not think so. It may lead two persons to clash.

Once the problem is identified and what has caused the problem becomes known, the stage at
which it has already reached can be properly understood. The next important step is to develop a
strategy to deal with the situation.

3. Conflict HandlingModes

There are a number of strategies which we may adopt to resolve the conflict and the important
of them are as follows:
(a) To avoid appearance ofconflict;
(b) Not permitting conflict tosurface;
(c) Mediation;
(d)Letting the parties in conflict to settle their scores; and
(e) To solve the problemsmutually.
(a) To Avoid Appearance ofConflict: This approach suggests that such conditions and
atmosphere should be created in the organisation so that there may not be any conflict
in the organisation. If any
conflictarisesitshouldberemovedandredressedasearlyaspossible. Thissituation is
possible when the organisation is staffed with like-minded people and possibly keeps a
watch over their inter-personalrelations.They should always be submissive to their
superior and should never be aggressive or in conflict with him. If there is a difference
of opinion between the two, it should be removed or it should be ignored.
This kind of conformity and agreement may be necessary where blind faith in the
leader of the group is required. It is very common in political and religious
organisations which demand total commitment of members towardsthe goals arid
ideals of the organisation. But in this approach, the creativity of the
membersislostandtheyarenotabletoputforwardtheirideasforthesakeofsimple
conformity.
(b) Not Permitting Conflict toSurface:This strategy suggests that loyalty and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
cooperation to the group is supreme and disagreement need not be tolerated and may
be treated equivalent to disloyalty to group. People who are loyal and co-operative
should be rewarded and those, who are not should be removed or should be
punished.As soon as the conflict is known to the superior, the parties in conflict should
be warned of the serious consequences and should be ordered to sink their differences
or matters be referred to  ̳upstairs‘ or the superior should insist on his own way.
This kind of approach of repression and forcing may work where talent difference is
not so important as the pressure of the time but such suppressed differences may erupt
at any time appropriate for the organisation and may hit safe targets. This approach
does not create a satisfying situation and if the matter is allowed to brew for long, the
party concerned whose views are suppressed always looks for an opportunity
embarrassing the position of authority holder.
 Mediation: Under this approach an attempt should be made by the authority holder to
sweep outthedifferenceandtosmoothertheaffairstomakeitlookasiftheproblemnever
existed. He may exercise persuasion, highlighting the merits and demerits of their cases.
He may conciliate, mediate, bringing home to them the commonness in their view points
and if necessary even go for arbitration.
Itisquitepossiblethattheboththepartiesmayleavethecasetothesuperiortogive his judgement,
in case of failure of finding any solution of the case, then both will accepthisdecision.
Itmayalsobejustpossiblethatacompromisetakesplaceorthey may arrive at a mutually
acceptableagreement. Under this approach both parties make a shift in their stand on give
and take basis. It may be with or without the intervention of the superior. This strategy is
most commonly used.
(c) Letting the Parties in Conflict to Settle theirScores:
Sometimes,wefindthatthepartiesadoptarigidattitudeintheorganisationandare not
abletoreasonorappeal.Theyareallowedtofightouttheissues. Theyare given an opportunity to
test their strength and capacities and to bear the consequences whatsoever. In such cases it
can be possible that the party may have
therealizationofeachother‘sstrengthandleavetheirpriorities, accepttheideasand interpretation of
others and resort to bargaining. The parties, before this approach should assess the cost of
such conflicts – economical andsocial.
This approach has far reaching consequences. In case the opposition feels defeated there will

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
develop personal distance that will never be reduced. The losing party will always try to find out
ways how to take revenge. Besides such potentially disruptive consequences of this approach, it
almost necessarily places strains on the status on power system in the organization. It
acknowledges and legitimizes theheterogeneity of goals. This approach is not willingly or
frequentlyadopted.
(d) Mutual Problem Solving: When two parties are conscious about the existence of a problem
and try to resolve their difference themselves, it is called mutual problem solving or
collaborating. As bothpartiesareinterestedinfindingasolution,thereferenceshouldalwaysbemade
of the shared goals, generally the sub-ordinate goals. The perceptions of people are notrigid.
This approach is better when time pressure is not serious though it is a very time consuming
process to come across a common acceptable solution. If in the meanwhile a party loses
patience, all efforts are likely to go waste. Therefore, a solution should be resolved before a
party loses patience.
Whatever may be the approach for handling conflict, it is necessary to be sure that
communication channels are neither blocked – non broken down. Free flow of
information must be maintained otherwise lack of information or blocked
communication channels causes disruptive behaviors. As a result, the gap between the
two parties widens and then it will be irreparable. It may also be suggested that
whatever may be the nature, stage or class of conflict; it should always be regarded as
individual (and not group conflict) and analytic conflict.Inshort,
animpressionshouldnotbecreatedthattheconflicthasengulfedthewhole organization. The
approach should be problem solving and persistent persuasion of theparties.
Explain the significance of different types of Authority in an
organization?(8)

RESPECT FOR AUTHORITY

It is pertinent to understand that those who are paid by the employers are supposed to
show respect and regards to the concerned authority. In order to meet the
organizational goals, the professionals should possess respect for authority. The levels
of authority maintained by the organization provide a means for identifying areas of
personal responsibility and accountability.

Following are the major types of authority:

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
• 1. Executive Authority/Institutional Authority: The corporate or institutional right given
to a person to exercise power based on the resources of an organization.
• 2. Expert Authority: This is the possession of special knowledge, skill or competence to
perform a particular task or to give sound advice.
• 3. AcceptingAuthority:Whena person accepts someone as his or her superior then it is
known as accepting authority.
Differentiate institutional authority & Expert Authority.(4)

1. INSTITUTIONAL AUTHORITY

The basic right given to a person to exercise his discretionary power based on the resources
of the institution is known as institutional authority. This would serve to provide personal
responsibility andaccountability in order to meet the institutional duties of individuals.
Allocation of funds, resources of funds, policy decisions and supervision of projects are
some of the managerial tasks that arc included under the institutional duties. Both
institutional authority (rights) and duties which represent the two sides of the same coin,
play a major role in the successful supervision and completion of the projects.
On the other hand, the Expert Authority is

• (a) the possession of special knowledge, skills and competence to perform a job thoroughly
(expertise),
• (b) the advice on jobs, and (c) is a staff function. It is also known as  ̳authority of
leadership‘.
• These experts direct others in effective manner, e.g., advisers, experts, and consultants are
engaged in an organization for a specific term.

INSTITUTIONAL VERSUS EXPERT AUTHORITY

• It is relevant to point out that a competent person with high standard of technical
qualification would definitely serve for the upliftmentof the institution. In some
cases, incompetence of the concerned professionals seem to block the progress of
an institution. Thus, institutional authority is not equivalent to expert authority.
The term expert authority refers to the presence of special knowledge or
competent skill to execute a particular job or task. For example, medical doctors
are thought to be special authorities on health and civil engineers are
considered to be authorities on the architectural pattern or transportation.
• Define accepting authority.(3)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

3. ACCEPTING AUTHORITY

• Employee's recognition of the employer's authority need to be focused and
understood in a right sense. It is a usual phenomenon that employees mostly
accept and recognize their employer's authority thereby obeying their orders under
the coverage of institutional authority. But in some cases, employees reject the
employer's directives on certain moral grounds.
According to the goals of the company, the hierarchical authority is distributed. A
service oriented or engineer-oriented company concentrates on the quality of the
products which are decided by the engineers as they are the subject matter experts.
Whereas accompany whenitiscustomer-orientedcompany,focusesprimarilyonthe
satisfaction of the customers. Hence the goal of the company decides the power
between a General Manager and a Technical Manager or anEngineer.
Employee‘s recognition of the employer's authority need to be focussed and understood in a
right sense. It is a usual phenomenon that employees mostly accept and recognise their employer's
authority thereby obeying their orders under the coverage of institutional authority. But in some
cases, employees reject the employer's directives on certain moral grounds,
Herbert Simon in his classic text on Administrative Behaviour points out that a
subordinate accepts his employer's authority without assessing the merits of his decision to follow
his superior's directives. Generally, authority relationships are based on situations inwhich
suggestions are duly accepted without any assessment or review. Simon further focuses his view
stating that subordinates possess the tendency to act in accordance with the wishes of their
superiors. According to Simon, all employees strictly confine themselves to the zone of
acceptance to accept their employer's authority.
Define Collective Bargaining. (3)

COLLECTIVE BARGAINING

Collective bargaining is a process of negotiation between employers and a group of
employees aimed at searching agreements to regulate working conditions. The
interests of the employees are commonly presented by representative of trade union to
which the employees belong. It is the responsibility of an organization to look into the
welfare of the section of people working in it. Their issues need to be discussed. When
we discuss issues,
therecanbeissueswhichneedtobediscussedamongtheemployeesthemselvesand

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
resolutions can be found for the same. However, there can be issues which might
require the intervention of the management. In order to deal with such complex
situations, an Employee Union is formed wherein, each employee becomes a member
and a leader is elected to represent the group wheneverneeded.

The crucial questions that could be posed here are:

1. How far engineers could dedicate themselves to the highest ethical standards of
professional conduct?
2. How far engineers could act as members and supporters of union activities?
These questions could be positively answered in terms of a complete knowledge on the basic
pattern of union and its activities.
At the time of conflicts or arguments, there will arise the need for negotiation between the
parties. Conflicting situations which call for negotiation might occur on areas related to pay
scales, working hours, training, health and safety, overtime, grievance mechanisms, rights in
work places or company affairs, etc. The process of voluntary negotiations between the
employers and a group of employees to resolve the conflicts is called Collective Bargaining.
The parties often refer to the result of the negotiation as a Collective Bargaining Agreement
(CBA) or as a Collective Employment Agreement (CEA).
The underlying idea of collective bargaining is that the employer and employee relations should
not be decided unilaterally or with the intervention of any third party. Both the parties must
reconcile their differences voluntarily through negotiations, yielding some concessions and
making sacrifices in the process. Both
shouldbargainfromapositionofstrength.Thereshouldbenoattempttoexploitthe weaknesses or
vulnerability of oneparty.With such awareness, the necessity of formation of Unions was
observed in all the organizations and the idea was strengthened to form larger labor unions.
Both parties have, more or less, realized the importance of peaceful co-existence for mutual
benefit and continued progress.

Types of Collective Bargaining

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
Explain the types of collective bargaining?(8)
There are four main types of collective bargaining
 DistributiveBargaining: Inthis,oneparty‘sgainisanotherparty‘sloss.
Example − Wages
 Integrativebargaining: Inthis,boththepartiesmaygainornoneofthe
parties may face a loss. Example − Better training programs
 AttitudinalStructuring: Whenthereisbacklogofbitternessbetweenboth the
parties then attitudinal structuring is required to make smooth industrial
relations.
 Intra-organizationalBargaining: Therecanbe conflicting groupsinboth
management and unions also. So, there is need to achieve consensus in these
groups.

1. Distributive Bargaining: It involves haggling over the distribution of surplus. Under
it, the economic issues like wages, salaries and bonus are discussed. In distributive bargaining,
one party‘s gain is another party‘s loss. This is most commonly explained in terms of a pie.
Disputants can work together to make the pie bigger, so there is enough for both of them to have
as much as they want, or they can focus on cutting the pie up, trying to get as much as they can
for themselves. In general, distributive bargaining tends to be more competitive. This type of
bargaining is also known as conjunctive bargaining.
2. Integrative Bargaining: This involves negotiation of an issue on which both the parties
may gain, or at least neither party loses. For example, representatives of employer and employee
sides may bargain over the better training programme or a better job evaluation method. Here,
both the parties are trying to make more of something. In general, it tends to be more
cooperative than distributive bargaining.
This type of bargaining is also known as cooperative bargaining. The integrative
strategiesrequirethatbothmanagementandtheuniondropcombativeattitudesand adopt a genuine
interest in the joint exploration of solutions to common problems. To work effectively,
integrative bargaining must become a way of life for the two parties that include continual
efforts to improve relationships through regular discussions of problems at all levels and
willingness to attempt to settle these problems with third partyinterventions.Solutions to the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
most difficult problems can be approached by establishing special committees, whose members
are drawn from both management and labour to study the issues and determine the facts.
3. AttitudinalRestructuring: This involves shaping and reshaping some attitudes like
trust or distrust, friendliness or hostility between labour and management. When there is a
backlog of bitterness between both the parties, attitudinal restructuring is required to maintain
smooth and harmonious industrial relations. It develops a bargaining environment and creates
trust and cooperation among the parties.
4.Intra-OrganizationalBargaining:It generally aims at resolving internal conflicts. This
is a type of manoeuvring to achieve consensus with the workers and management. Even within
the union, there may be differences between groups. For example, skilled workers may feel that
they are neglected or women workers may feel that their interests are not looked after properly.
Within the management also,
theremaybedifferences.Tradeunionsmanoeuvretoachieveconsensusamong the conflictinggroups.
Describe the objectives of collective bargaining.(8)
Objectives of Collective Bargaining
i. To increase mutual confidence between the employer andemployees;
ii. To regulate terms and conditions of employment without intervention of a third
party;
iii. To create cordial environment in theestablishment;
iv. To protect the interest of the employees; through collective action and by
preventing unilateral action on the part of theemployer;
v. To raise the socio-economic attributes of theemployees.

Explain the process of collective bargaining? (7)
PROCESS OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING:

Collective bargaining is a process by which employers and employees confer in good faith and
come to an understanding about the terms and conditions of work and other related aspects. The
objective of bargaining is to settle matters on discussion tables with mutual consent and

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
cooperation.Management is usually represented by senior executives of the company and the
workers are represented by the trade union leaders and officials. Among the different methods
available for the settlement of industrial disputes and coming toa long-term understanding with
labour, collective bargaining is the most important one.

The process of collective bargaining involves six major steps:

1. Preparing forNegotiations: Preparing for negotiations involves preparation before
negotiation with the other parties to reach to an agreement Both the parties involved in
collective bargaining should prepare before going for negotiation so that there can be proper
negotiation at the time of discussion. The preparation would include the issue, parties involved,
causes, costs and impacts. This would bring confidence in the participating parties and would
result in effective negotiation. This is the first step of the process.
2.Identifying BargainingIssues: Before going for negotiation, the issue and possible
related areas for discussion are
tobeidentified.Theknowledgeregardingtheseissuesmustbecollected.Alldetailed
information should be wife the negotiator. During discussion, the confusions canbe
avoided. The negotiator on the basis of through knowledge of the issue for discussion
would proper and effective discussion and the problem solution would become very
easy.
3. Negotiations
Procedure:Thenegotiationproceduremeanshowthenegotiationwouldtakeplace.Negotiat
ion procedure is the method of negotiation. It would show that the activities are to be
performed, who would perform and sequence and timing of the activities. This would
clear the position in mind of negotiator and would bring confidence in his mind.
4.Reaching theAgreement: The negotiation process begins when the concerned parties
meet and submit their
demandonthetabletotheotherparties.Itstartswithsubmissionofthedemandsof the trade
union to the management. The negotiation starts with the submission and bargaining
takes place. Through discussion they reach to an agreement. Negotiation completes
with a mutually acceptableagreement.
5. Ratifying theAgreement: During discussion whatever they have discussed and reach
to an agreement that is to be ratified by both the parties. Once the agreement is

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
ratified, the issue of difference or conflict is over and negotiation comes to an aid.
Without acceptance of the agreement the negotiation cannot be completed.
6.Administration of theAgreement:Once the agreement is accepted and signed, the
agreement will be administered as per the terms and conditions of the agreement. In
future, the work would be performed according to the ratified agreement. If doubt is
there then the agreement in written would be referred.
If the process completes the above mentioned steps it can be said the collective
bargainingprocesshasbeencompleted. Ifnotorsomestepsnotfollowed,thenitcan be said
the bargaining process was not effective or a failure. So these steps are important in
thisprocess.
Describe the merits & demerits of collective bargaining? (7)
ADVANTAGES OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING:

The main advantages of collective bargaining are as follows:
1. EffectiveinProtectingandPromotingInterestsofWorkers: Collective bargaining has
contributed much towards protecting and promoting the
interestsofworkers,especiallyinregardtothetermsandconditionsofemployment.
Unionsinmanycountriesoftheworldhavesuccessfullycontractedagreementswith
employers, for higher wages, improved fringe benefits and cash allowances,
jobsecurity, better physical working conditions, social security benefits and so on. In
many cases, the benefits accruing to the workers through collective bargaining have
been much better than those available or expected under legislation or industrial
awards.
2.Control of Management’sAutocracy:Collective bargaining has increasingly usurped
the prerogatives traditionally enjoyed by the employers of unilaterally laying down the
terms and conditions of employment of their employees. Apart from wages, hours of
work and working
conditions,manymoresubjectshavecomewithintheambitofcollectiveagreements. Thus,
collective bargaining has tended to impose a substantial check on employers‘
autocracy in taking decision over matters of concern of theiremployees.
3.Promotion of Durable IndustrialPeace: Where the terms and conditions of
employment of employees are determined by mutual agreement and understanding

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

between the employer and the union representing the employees, the scope of further
differences over the subjects of agreement is considerably minimised. Besides, the
parties are placed in a better position to understand and appreciate their respective
problems and difficulties, which results in the development of a co-operative
environment in the enterprise.
Solution of a contentious issue imposed from outside, such as an adjudication
authority, may not satisfy either or both the parties. Besides, most collective
agreements also provide for grievance procedure for redressing grievances arising out
of the interpretation or application of collective agreements. Thus, collective
bargaining is expected to ensure durable industrial peace in enterprises.
4.ConducivetotheEnhancementofManagerialEfficiency: Collective bargaining
enables managers to understand the problems of the
employeesintherightperspective.Similarly, theunionisalsoenabledtounderstand the
genuine problems facing the management and the enterprise. Negotiations taking place
in frank and free atmosphere can reveal the areas of deficiencies in
managerialpracticesandtherebyenablemanagerstoadoptappropriatemeasuresto rectify
them. Besides, the suggestions of the trade union may provide a useful feedback.
5. Establishment of Industrial Rules and Creation of Labour
Standards:Collective bargaining has also been helpful in the establishment of
industrial rules
andcreationofusefullabourstandards.Therulesandnormsembodiedinthelabour contract
of one firm often lead to the establishment of similar rules and norms in other firms,
and the process goes on continuing.
In this way, a sort of uniformity in industrial rules and labour standards is
establishedonawidescale.Ithasbeenexperiencedthatlabourstandardsuniformly embodied
in collective agreements of several firms on major issues of concern of a large bulk of
workers such as bonus, gratuity, provident fund and soon have provided the basis for
the adoption of legislation for ensuringtheir wider coverage.
DISADVANTAGES

Collective bargaining also results in certain disadvantages to the parties to negotiate:
i. Strikes: Thestrikecreatesadilemmaforthosewhohaveacceptedtheinstitutionofcollective

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
bargaining because it is difficult to have collective bargaining without the right to
strike. At the same time strikes can inflict considerable damage on the public image.
Much attention has been given to the problem of how to maintain collective
bargaining while preventing the damage that might be inflicted upon by the strikes.No
effective solution has been foundyet.
ii. Based on Power andConflict: Collective bargaining is based on power and conflict
and does the most for the people who need it least. The stronger workers in the labor
market could protect the income of their skills while the weakest workers in the work
force have very limited ability to form unions and hence are unable to gain the
benefits of collective bargaining.
iii. Lacks Safeguards for PublicInterest: Collective bargaining does not contain
sufficient safeguards for the public interest, which might be ignored by collusion
between strong unions and employers to fix prices. In the U.S.A., where collective
bargaining is a feature of industrial relations, it is claimed that it has impeded the
economy‘s growth, imparted an upward drift to the general price level and
periodically imperilled the nation‘s health and safety
Define confidentiality?(3)

CONFIDENTIALITY

One of the most important duty of any engineering professional is to maintain the
confidentiality. Just like defense lawyers are supposed to keep client's information‘sconfidential,
medical doctors to keep the information of their patients confidential, and teachers to keep the
personal performances of students more confidential, so also, the engineers should keep the
information of their companies and employees confidential.
To understand confidentiality, we need to understand what Intellectual Property is.
Define IPR.(6)

Intellectual Property

This term is often used in the world of business. Intellectual property refers to creations of
mind such as inventions; literary and artistic works, designs; and symbols, names and images
used in commerce.The ideas and formulations in one‘s mind are put in action or may not be
done so, butthatideaistheresultofone‘sintelligenceanditcannotbestolen.Suchproblems are
mostly encountered by scientists, engineers, business people or the upcoming entrepreneurs,

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
and such. Intellectual Property, i.e., IP is protected by the law;
patents,trademarksandcopyrightsenablepeopletoearnrecognitionfromwhat they invent
orcreate.

While being associated with an organization, an engineer is expected to follow a few moral
rules and avoid affecting the intellectual properties of anyone. These when adopted by an
organization, through some agreement, it becomes the responsibility of every employee to
maintain the confidentiality throughout that project.

CONFIDENTIALITY

Whenthewordconfidentialisaddedtoanyinformation, itmeansthatitshouldnot be shared with one
and all. It is mostly a trade secret. Maintaining confidentiality and avoiding harmful conflicts of
interest are especially important aspects of teamwork andtrustworthiness.Confidentiality is that
practice which helps to keep secret all information deemed desirable to keep secret. The
maintenance of secrecy refers to the unrevealing of any data concerning the company‘s business
or technical processes that are not already in public knowledge. Every company has some
knowledge and can identify the
individualsandgroupsthatmighthaveaccesstoaparticularsetofinformation.The members of such
groups share the responsibility of maintainingconfidentiality.
TYPES OF INFORMATION

The confidential information can be understood as Privileged Information and
Proprietaryinformation.Privilegedinformationmeans―availableonlyonthebasis of
special privilege‖ such as a privilege accorded an employee working on a special
assignment.Proprietaryinformationistheinformationthatacompanyownsoris the
proprietor of, and hence is a term carefully defined by property law. It is simply called
trade secret.The patents legally protect the products from being manufactured and sold
by other competitor unless a patent holder grants permission. Whereas the trade secret,
has no such legal protection. Hence a reverse engineering can be done by analyzing a
product to estimate its manufacturing so as to duplicate it or to develop something
more than that, without any kind of permissions.
The information mainly include business trade secrets. These are generally applicable to top
management only. Data like financial budgets, forecasts, employee list and the like.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
Explain the steps taken to protect confidential information.(6)
Several steps could be taken to protect the confidential information
 Separate folders for the confidential information as per its nature should be created in
folder
 All confidential information should be kept in a locked file.
 All electronic information should be free from firewalls ,encryption and pass-words
 Never keep confidential information file on table and should be cleared off before going
home.
 Refrain from showing confidential information on the computer screen.
 All confidential information should be marked as ―Confidential‖.
 Never discuss confidential information in public
 Never use emails to transmit confidential information as there is always a threat of
hacking.
 Before disposing off the old computer wipe out the information or destroy the hard
drive.

CONFLICTS OFINTEREST

What do you mean by conflict of interest?(3)
It is situation where two different parties are in compatible. Or else is a situation where in a person
has two interests which are competing each other. A person may have different types of interests.
Such interests can be pursued according to the will, convenience and the laws prevailing. He might
have multiple interests related to the job he is doing; if he does some side business which means he
might be a competitor or he might work with a competitor, it might pose a problem for the
employer. Such an employee is usually fired from the organization. For example, a person who
wants to be loyal to his employer would like to work for long hours but his commitment towards
his wife and children makes him confused.
Thus, we can refine our definition of conflicts of interest by saying that they typically arise
when the following two conditions are met −

 The professional is in a relationship or role that requires exercising good
judgment on behalf of the interests of an employer orclient.
 Theprofessionalhassomeadditionalorsideinterestthatcouldthreatengood
judgement in serving the interests of the employer orclient.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
Differentiate conflicting interests & Conflict in interest. (6)
DILEMMA:There occurs a usual dilemma between conflicts of interest
and conflicting
interests.Togetaclearunderstandingbetweenboth,letusconsidertwoex
amples.
Example 1:Letusconsideragirlwhoneedstochoose fromamongherinterestsinordertofitin her
timetable. She wants to attend the exam in college, to attend the music class, to go out for a movie,
to deliver a seminar and also go visit her friend. As she is falling short of time, it is her interest to
choose what to do and what not. The term used to mentionthiscanbe ―Conflictinginterests
―andthiscannotbemorallywrong.
Example 2: If another instance is considered where a man works for a company, being in
some crucial position where he has access to all the confidential information and if he works as an
unofficial adviser to his wife‘s company, it would be morally wrong,
whereamoralconflictdefinitelyarises.Thiscanbetermedas ―Conflictininterests‖.Hence, the two
concepts are different.
Explain the common types of COI? (7)

COMMON TYPES OF COI

 Self-Dealing: Here the employees may take decisions that will benefit the
competitor and for which he may get some monetary benefits.
 Gift Issuance: Here the manager accepts gift from the client for doing certain
things for the company which goes against the interests of the company.
 Bribe: Abribeis a substantial amount of money or goods offered beyond a
stated business contract with the aim of winning an advantage in gaining
orkeeping the contract and where the advantage is unfair or
otherwiseunethical.
 InsiderTrading:Providing confidential information to the client in order to
gain personal mileage
 Outside employment: Part time jobs or a family that will affect productivity
of the main organization.
Attimes, ifthemoneyorgiftsofferedaresubstantialenoughtothreatenthefairness of
competitive situations, then such gifts turn out to be bribes. They cannot be
accepted as simple gratuities. Hence there is a thumb rule stating such condition

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
as, ―If the offer or acceptance of a particular gift could have
embarrassingconsequences for your company if made public, then do not accept
thegift‖.
Explain the major steps to cope up with COI? (7)
How to cope with COI
 Never ignore it and should disclose to your confidant.
 Report to institutions ethics group immediately.
 Never make important decisions when clouded with conflict
 Try to avoid such conflicts or else be prepped for dire consequences.
Best practices to cope with COI

Some of the best practices that could be implemented while coping with COI
could be :
 Written policy should be there in all companies which could be reviewed by the
board or updated the governance committee.
 Create a culture of openness rather than creating a culture of inquisition.
 Training should be provided by the company to its employees on a regular basis
in order to COI.
 Reward staff for self-reporting.
 Appoint a staff to act as watch dog to notify any such COI with free access
given to board members.
Thus, as an employee it‘s important to avoid COI. This is necessary waste time
as well as tensions. By coming out with policies and signing documents COI
coiled be prevented.
Define Occupational Crime.(3)

OCCUPATIONAL CRIME

This is a crime committed by someone while in employment. Also known as
workplace crimes, occupational crimes are defined as offenses that are committed by
someone during the course of his or her employment.
Occupationalcrimesencompassawiderangeofcriminalacts,butthemostcommon include
white collar offenses, such as embezzlement, money laundering, tax fraud, and the
misuse of company information orproperty.
Although all white collar crimes tend to come with harsh penalties, occupational
offenses are often accompanied by particularly severe consequences, including jail

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

time,heftyfines,andthelossofaprofessionallicenseorpractice,soifyouhavebeen accused
of committing an occupational crime, it is critical to contact an experienced white
collar crime lawyer who can help you present a strongdefense.
DEFINING OCCUPATIONAL CRIMES

Occupational crimes typically originate in an employee‘s unlawful use of company
information, property, funds, or data and because they usually do not involve violence,
are usually charged as white collar crimes. For instance, an accountant at a
manufacturing business who purposely withheld information about company revenue
from the IRS can be found guilty of corporate tax fraud because he or she used access
to sensitive company information, namely revenue reports, to defraud the federal
government.
Examine the common forms of occupational crime? (7)
COMMON FORMS OF OCCUPATIONAL CRIME

The most common type of occupational crimes are actually white collar offenses, or
financial crimes that are committed by employees or business professionals. It‘s
important to note that occupational crimes are not limited to those who work in the
private sector. The corruption of government officials, for example, also qualifies as
an occupational crime. Other common examples of occupational crime include:
 Embezzlement;
 Moneylaundering;
 Altering company records withoutauthorization;
 Committing taxfraud;
 Racketeering;
 Misusing company data or property; and
 Committing stock and securitiesviolations.
These types of offenses are not always committed by a single individual, but often
involve multiple employees, managers, supervisors, officers, and business owners.
Regardlessofhowmanypeoplewereinvolvedtheoffense, mostoccupationalcrimes fall
under a few different categories, including:
 Crimesoftrust, orpropertycrimesthatinvolvedeliberatecontactwithatleast
onevictimoranattempttoconcealthefactthatacrimehasbeencommitted;
 Offensesthatwerecommittedinthecourseofemployment,suchasaccepting bribes;
 Crimes committed in furtherance of business operations, but not operations that
are central to business purposes, such as misrepresentation in advertising; and
 Offenses in which crime is the central activity of the business, such as real

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

estatefraud.
Occupational crimes are particularly common in certain professions. Over-billingby
healthcare professionals, for example, is a common charge amongst medical
professionals, while public officials and law enforcement officers are more at risk of
being accused of offenses like bribery andcorruption.
Explain the rights of an engineer?(14)
Describe the professional rights of an engineer. (7)
Describe the employee rights of an engineer. (7)

RIGHTS OF AN ENGINEER

Just like an engineer has responsibilities he has the right to live freely and pursue his
legitimate interest without fear or guilt. The basic rights of engineers include the right
to live freely and pursue their legitimate interests as any human being, along with the
right to be against racial or sexual discrimination, receiving one‘s salary according to
the work, choosing of politicalactivities,etc., asotheremployees. Apart from getting
salary for the work done or choosing political affiliation an engineer has some special
rights like Professional Rights,Employee Rights, Intellectual Property Rights and
Rights Against Discrimination.
I. PROFESSIONAL RIGHTS: The rights that engineers have as professionals are called
Professional Rights. Theseprofessional rights include
 (a) The basic right of professionalconscience and moral autonomy
 (b)The right of conscientiousrefusal.
 (c)The right of professionalrecognition.
(a) Right of Professional Conscience: This is a basic right which explains that the
decisions taken while carrying on with
theduty,wheretheyaretakeninmoralandethicalmanner,cannotbeopposed.The
rightofprofessionalconscienceisthemoralrighttoexerciseprofessionaljudgement in
pursuing professional responsibilities. It requires autonomous moral judgement in trying
to uncover the most morally reasonable courses of action, and the correct courses of
action are not alwaysobvious.
There are two general ways to justify the basic right of professional conscience.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS

 The exercise of moral reflection and conscience that justifies professional
duties is necessary, with respect to thatduty.
 Thegeneraldutiestorespectpersonsandrule-utilitarianismwouldaccentthe public
good of allowing engineers to pursue their professionalduties.

(b) Right of Conscientious Refusal: The right of conscientious refusal is the right to refuse to
engage in unethical behaviour. This can be done solely because it feels unethical to the doer. This
action might bring conflicts within the authority-based relationships.
The two main situations to be considered here are −
 When it is already stated that certain act is unethical in a widely shared
agreement among all theemployees.
 When there occurs disagreement among considerable number of people
whether the act isunethical.

Hence it is understood that engineers and other professionals have a moral right to refuse the
unethical acts such as bribery, forging documents, altering test results, lying, padding payrolls
or coercing employees into acting by threatening, etc.
(c)Right to Recognition: An engineer has a right to the recognition of one‘s work and
accomplishments. An engineer also has right to speak about the work one does by maintaining
confidentiality and can receive external recognition. The right for internal recognition which
includes patents, promotions, raises etc. along with a fair remuneration, are also a part of it.
The fulfillment of right to recognition motivates the employee to be a trustful member of
the organization, which also benefits the employer. This makes the employee morally
bound which enhances the ethical nature to be abide by the professional ethics.
II.EMPLOYEE RIGHTS: An employee right can be any right, moral or legal, that
involves the status of being
anemployee.Theyinvolvesomeprofessionalrightsalso,suchastherighttobepaid according
to the salary mentioned in one‘s contract. Privacy and equal opportunity can be
considered essential rightstoo. All employees have a right to basic amenities, hygiene
and safe work place. They have the right for paid holidays, leaves, maternity leaves
etc. Also employees have the right towards safety and health. Also these rights save
the employees from discrimination based on gender, race and religion. Some of the

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
rights that are applicable to all employees include:
(a) Privacy: The right to privacy refers to the right of having a private life, off the job.
It is the right to control the access to and the use of information about oneself.The
examples of situations where the functions of employers conflict the rights of
employeeswillbewhenthejob-relatedqueriesoranyothertestsconductedinajob, includes
questions relating to personal life such as alcohol usage or sexual conduct. The
instances when a supervisor unlocks and checks the desk of his subordinate in his
absence or when the management questions about his likes, dislikes or posts on social
media regarding his personal opinions where it has nothing to do with the
company.Employers should view the relationship with their employees concerning
confidentialitythatcannotbreakthetrust.Thepersonalinformationinsuchcasesis given
based on the special professional relation andtrust.
(b)Equal Opportunity-Non-Discrimination:
Thedemeaningofapersonbasedontrivialfactorssuchasone‘ssex,race,skincolor, age or
political or religious outlook can be understood as Discrimination. Such discrimination
should never be allowed at any workplace; this is where everyone

hastobetreatedequally.Thesethingsinternallyaffecttheperson‘sself-identityand self-
respect which is pernicious within the work environment, where the work itself should

represent a person‘sself-image.
(c) Equal Opportunity – Sexual Harassment:
Intoday‘sworld,thereisanincreaseinthenumberofsexualharassmentcasesacross
theworld.Thisisquietanunfortunatescenario.Therewereanumberofcaseswhere the
charges were levied since last two decades, which kept on growing. A definition
ofSexualharassmentis,―Theunwantedimpositionofsexualrequirementsinthecontext of
a relationship of unequal power‖. Sexual harassment is a display of power and
aggression through sexual means. It takes two forms, quid pro quo and hostile work
environment.
QuidProQuoincludescaseswheresupervisorsrequiresexualfavorsasacondition for some
employment benefit (a job, promotion or raise). It can take the form of a sexual threat (of
harm) or sexual offer (of a benefit in return for a benefit). Hostile
workEnvironmentbycontrast,isanysexuallyorientedaspectoftheworkplacethat threatens
employee's rights to equal opportunity. It includes unwanted sexual proposals, lewd remarks,

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
sexual leering, posting nude photos and inappropriate physicalcontact.
(d) Equal opportunity – Affirmative Action: Affirmative action refers to the preference
given to a person or a group who was denied equal importance in the past. For example, the
women and the minority communities were not given equal treatment and were ill-treated in
the past. So to compensate that, amendments were made in recent laws to provide them special
quota for reservations in education, employment and social sectors.These preferential

treatments are made in order to compensate the previous ill-
actions.Ideallysuchcompensationshouldbegiventothosespecificindividualswho

inthepastweredeniedjobs.Butthepracticalpossibilitiesofsuchactionsarelimited.
Sexismandracismstillpermeateinoursocietyandtocounterbalancetheirinsidious impact reverse
preferential treatment is warranted in order to ensure equal opportunity for minorities
andwomen.
(e)Employment agreement: An employee is entitled for a written document duly signed by
the employer before actually starting their work. This will help them to take a legal course so
as to help resolve the dispute.
(f) Leave:An employee is entitled for leaves during the course of their work.They are four
types : Casual leave, Paid leave, Sick leave and other types of leave.
(e)Maternity Benefit: A female employee is entitled to have a maternity leave or pregnancy
leave for 26 weeks which could be availed during 26 weeks or after.In addition,maternity leave
could be availed by the male as well.
(g)Gratuity: It is the retirement benefit paid to the employees after the retirement, resignation,
death of employees.
(i): Right to get insurance: Every employee has the right to get insured under the State
Insurance Act 1948,in case of any kind of miscarriage occurring during the course of
employment.
III.Intellectual Property Rights: Intellectual property right is a type of property right which
allows the creators or owners of patents trademarks or copyrighted works to benefit from their
own work or investment. These rights enable the right person to benefit from the protection of
moral and material interests resulting from the authorship of scientific, literary or artistic
productions. These rights are outlined in the article 27 of the Universal declaration of Human
rights. It includes inventions, designs, symbols, names, images etc. It is protected by law and
enable a person to get recognition or financial benefit.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
PROTECTION OF IPR

Like the other rights, the intellectual rights also should be protected and supported.
The IPR (Intellectual property Rights) need to be protected in order to serve the
following reasons
 The creations and inventions are the paths which lead to the progress of human
development, either in technology orculture.
 These inventions should be protected legally in order to develop the
commitment and interest for morecreations.
 These intellectual properties must be protected and promoted which
indirectlypromotetheeconomicgrowththatcreatesnewjobsandindustries, and
enhances the quality and enjoyment oflife.
Describe the various methods used to protect IPR.(8)
The Intellectual property rights are protected by certain measures like patents,
trademarks, industrial designs, copyrights, etc.
(i)PATENTS:APatentisanexclusiverightgrantedforaninvention.Itprovidesthepatentown
ers with protection generally for a period of 20years. With the patent rights one can
access any material reward for their marketableinnovations. Once the patent protection
is granted, that invention cannot be commercially made, used, distributed or sold
without the patent owner‘s consent. Courts provide the legal safety for these patent
rights. Conversely, if a third party challenges the invention and is successful, the court
can declare the patent invalid.
(ii)TRADEMARKS:We often come across certain distinctive marks or signs that
identifies certain goods or services produced or provided by an individual or a
company. These trademarks ensure the belongingness of products to the authorized
owners. The owners can authorize other persons in return for some payment. The
protection offered through
thetrademarksislimitedforaperiod,butcanberenewedindefinitelyuponpayment of the
correspondingfee.These trademarks can be one or a combination of words, letters and
numerals. They may even consist of drawings or signs such as shapes, colors,

holograms, sizes or somenon-
visiblesignssuchassmell,tasteandsoundalso.Thecollectivetrademarks are owned by an

association whose members use them to indicate products with a certain level of

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
quality and who agree to adhere to specific requirements set by the association.
(iii)COPYRIGHT: Certain literary works, artisticpaintings, sculpture;computer related
programs,maps, and technical drawings are protected by copyright for atleast 50 years.Also are the
protected the rights of actors,singers,broadcasting organizationsetc. It is a legal term that
describes the rights of the creators. It gives complete benefit to owners which was initially just an
idea. He or she can sue a person who violates copyright laws.
(iv) INDUSTRIAL DESIGN: It is a professional service of creating and developing concepts and
specifications that will optimize the function which will be compatible for both the customer and
the user. In legal terms it is the ornamental aspect of the product. These could range from three
dimensional, two dimensional to lines circles. In this case the owner has every right to protect it
from being used by other parties.
(v) GEOGRAPHICAL INDICATIONS: These are the products which a sign is used to identify
the origin and possess the qualities of origin. The product should be exclusively of that particular
country of origin. For example: France and Italy have their famous brands of Champagne has a
trademark as well as it is GI tagged. It also helps the users to identify the quality as well. Such tags
are typically used for food, agricultural products, handicrafts, wine and the like.GI are protected by
various countries and its regions with a wide variety of approaches. It has been developed using
historical and economic backgrounds.
(vi)TRADESECRETS:Theseare rights to sell or license confidential matters.Such secrets will be
commercially viable and is limited to a small group.A confidential matter that gives competitive
edge and is unknown as trade secrets. It consists of two types technical information and
commercial information .It could be combination of elements as well. Some of the trade secrets
could be formulas, recipes, source code and the like. It gives a legal protection against the
unwanted competition .Trade secrets remain as long as one is able to keep it a secret, but as it
becomes public, trade secret protection ends.
WIPO:TheintellectualpropertyrightsareprotectedbyanInternationalorganizationcalled as the
World Intellectual Property Organization (WIPO) which was established in
1970.Thisorganizationwasestablishedtoensuretheprotectionofrightsofcreators and owners of
Intellectual property across the world. The inventors and authors are therefore recognized and
rewarded for theiringenuity.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
Describe the advantages of IPR? (7)

ADVANTAGES OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTYRIGHTS
Intellectual property rights are advantageous in the following ways −
 Provides exclusive rights to the creators orinventors.
 Encourages individuals to distribute and share information and data instead of
keeping itconfidential.
 Provides legal defense and offers the creators the incentive of theirwork.
 Helps in social and financialdevelopment.

INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS IN INDIA

To protect the intellectual property rights in the Indian territory, India has defined the
formation of constitutional, administrative and jurisdictive outline whether they imply
the copyright, patent, trademark, industrial designs, or any other parts of the
intellectual property rights.Back in the year 1999, the government passed an important
legislation based on international practices to safeguard the intellectual property
rights. Let us have a glimpse of the same:
 ThePatents(Amendment)Act,1999,facilitatestheestablishmentofthemail box
system for filing patents. It offers exclusive marketing rights for a time period
of fiveyears.
 TheTradeMarksBill,1999,replacedtheTradeandMerchandiseMarksAct, 1958
 TheCopyright(Amendment)Act,1999,wassignedbythePresidentofIndia.
 The sui generis legislation was approved and named as the Geographical
Indications of Goods (Registration and Protection) Bill, 1999.
 The Industrial Designs Bill, 1999, replaced the Designs Act, 1911.
 The Patents (Second Amendment) Bill, 1999, for further amending the
Patents Act of 1970 in compliance with theTRIPS.
(IV) DISCRIMINATION: It is aprejudicial treatment of different categories of people
based on race, age and sex. Workplace discrimination happens when an employee or a
job candidate is treated unfavourably .It could be age, sex, disability, pregnancy, race,
skin etc. Under the title of VII of 1964 it is unlawful to discriminate while hiring and
firing. It could be based on sex, religion, national origin etc.
Discrimination versus Harassment: Harassment is a form of discrimination. It could be

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
of various types. Un-welcoming behaviour of the co-worker, manager, client or anyone in
the workplace.
Different types of Workplace Discrimination: Workplace discrimination could be of
various types .Nepotism could be one factor where in there could be discrimination.
Work place discrimination could be of various types:
(a) Retaliation Discrimination: It‘s a common discrimination found in work place. The
employees are afraid to report as they will be exposed to bullying by the top
management.
If the so called top management has a good influence on top management then they are
afraid to speak out.
(b)RacialDiscrimination: It is common in countries like USA where racial
discrimination is quite prevalent.The person though hired but will not be given the same
salary or promotions as his or her counterpart based on race. Even celebrities have
experienced the same. Priyanka Chopra was bullied by whites in USA calling her brown.
As far as work place is concerned he may not be invited into the meetings which are quiet
discriminating.
(c)Disability Discrimination: Though people give lots of sympathy but they are
reluctant to give jobs to them. Employers are not ready to make any adjustments related
to hearing or vision as they feel that they can‘t do justice to the job. Ira Singhal IAS was
a topper in UPSC 2014 examination was denied of the post due to her 62 percent
disability owing to scoliosis which was spine related and affected both arms. Sometimes
employers also feel that appointing a disabled person will not fit into the image of the
company.
(d)Sexual Discrimination: Sexual discrimination is prevalent in workplace.Earlier
women were not allowed to vote. No they make fun oftransgender. Females are still
discriminated in workplace.Some of the workers even create a disparity in wages.In
Bollywood men are paid more as compared to women though acting skills are the same.
(e)Age Discrimination: Today majority of the seniors are unable to work because of
their age.Some employers feel that in spite of their experience and credentials they

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
cannot work like young employees.They also feel that older employees in the industry
will make industry old fashioned.Age discrimination is made in a subtle way by the
employer as they complain lack of efficacy and productivity in the company. Airhostess
often are recruited based on their age. Airline companies do not prefer older air hostess as
they feel it will affect the image of their company.
As an engineer one should be aware of the responsibilities he has towards the
organisation.It also enumerates upon the rights of the engineer.
QUESTIONS
Part-A
(3 –Mark Questions)

1. What is loyalty?
2. What is collegiality?Mention the elements of collegiality.
3. What is meant by commitment?
4. List various aspects of collegiality.
5. Mention the code of NSPE.
6. What are the senses of loyalty?
7. Mention the two conditions that determine obligatory loyalty.
8. What is misguided loyalty?
9. Mention the close interaction between professionalism and loyalty.
10. Differentiate agency loyalty and attitude loyalty.
11What is expert authority?
12. What is the objective of institutional authority?
13. Define institutional authority with example?
14. What is collective bargaining?
15. What is confidentiality?
16. How do the ethical theories justify confidentiality?
17. What are related terms?
18. What is conflicts of interest?
19. Distinguish between bribes and kickbacks.
20. Mention two of the guidelines suggested by ABET with regard to bribes.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
21. What are insider information?
22. What do you mean by proprietary information?
23.What are trademarks?
24. State the difference between bribe and gift
25. Explain conflict of interest? How can cope up with CO? Give examples
26. What is meant by occupational crime?
27. List various provisions under  ̳human rights‘
28. List the features of employee rights
29. What is meant by intellectual property rights?
30. Differentiate between  ̳Patent‘ and  ̳Trade secret’
31. What is meant by  ̳industrial design patent‘?
32. What is meant by  ̳copyright‘?
33. What do you mean by trade mark?
34. List the provisions under professional rights

PART-B
ESSAY (14 Marks)

1. Briefly explain about the interaction between collegiality and loyalty.
2. Write a brief note on misguided loyalty.
3. What is respect for authority? Explain the types of authority
4. How are conflict of interest solved? Explain with examples?
5. Write a short account on the various aspects of collective bargaining. Give any two
merits and demerits of collective bargaining.
6. Explain the common types of COI?
7. Define Collective bargaining? Explain the major steps involved in collective bargaining
8. Write a short account on the various aspects of confidentiality.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

MODULE: 4 RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
9 .Define Conflict of Interest. Explain the various steps in resolving Conflict of Interest?
10. Explain briefly about the management policies with regard to employee's rights.
11. Briefly explain about the various features of gifts andbribes.
12. Discuss briefly on the various features of occupationalcrime.
13. Explain the various aspects of professional rights.
14. Discuss in detail about employee rights?
15. Discuss the various aspects of IPR.
16. What is institutional authority? How do you correlate institutional authority, expert authority?
17. What is meant by respect to authority? How far it should be recognized by salaries
professionals as morally justified?
18. Define Occupational Crime. Explain the common forms of occupational crime.
19. Define Collective Bargaining. Explain the major types of collective bargaining?
20. Explain in detail the rights of an engineer?
21.Define IPR. Explain the six types of IPR?
22. Explain discrimination and its types.
23. Explain the different kinds of discrimination.

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 1 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 4
UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS

MODULE: 4

RESPONSIBILITIES & RIGHTS
SHORT ANSWER (3 MARKS)
1. Identify conflicts of interest with an example
2. Recall confidentiality
3. What is the significance of intellectual property rights?
4. What is the difference between bribe & gift?
5. Differentiate between copyright & trademark.
6. What is meant by occupational crime?
7. Explain collegiality & loyalty.
8. Differentiate between Patents & Trademarks.
9. What is confidentiality and why is it needed?
ESSAY

10. Explain the different steps in managing conflicts in an organization. (7)
11. Describe the major steps involved in the process of collective
bargaining. (7)
12. Exemplify conflicts of interest and conflicts in interest. (6)
13. Illustrate the various rights of an engineer as a professional. (8)
14. Discuss the methods to improve collegiality and loyalty. (7)
15. Explain collective bargaining. (7)
16. What are occupational crimes? Give examples. (8)

Downloaded from Ktunotes.in

Page 2 of 2

UNIVERSITY QUESTIONS: MODULE 4
17. How conflicts can be managed in a work place? (6)
18. Explain the methods for managing conflict? (7)
19. Explain the types of Collective Bargaining. (7)
20. Explain the steps taken for Conflict management? (14)
21. Explain the various justifications for confidentiality? (7)
22. Explain how you can improve collegiality in an organisation where you
are presently employed. (7)
23. Explain the significance of different types of Authority in an
organisation? (7)
24. Discuss about the various rights of an engineer.(7)
25. Execute collegiality with respect to commitment, respect and
connectedness.(8)
26. Identify conflicts of interest with an example. (6)
27. Explain in detail about professional rights & employee rights. (8)
